THE  NATIONAL  WINDSTORM  IMPACT

REDUCTION  PROGRAM:  STRENGTHENING

WINDSTORM  HAZARD  MITIGATION

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

JULY  24,  2008

Serial No. 110–117

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

43–529PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2008

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
DONNA  F.  EDWARDS,  Maryland
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
ANDRE´ CARSON,  Indiana

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

HON.  DAVID  WU,  Oregon,  Chairman

JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLIE  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
MIKE  ROSS,  Arizona
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia
RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

MIKE  QUEAR  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

MEGHAN  HOUSEWRIGHT  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

TIND  SHEPPER  RYEN  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

PIPER  LARGENT  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

July  24,  2008

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  David  Wu,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Tech-
nology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.  House
of Representatives ................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Phil  Gingrey,  Ranking  Minority  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Laura  Richardson,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................

Witnesses:

Dr.  Sharon  L.  Hays,  Associate  Director  and  Deputy  Director  for  Science,

White House Office of Science and Technology Policy

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Marc  L.  Levitan,  Director,  Louisiana  State  University  Hurricane  Center;
Charles P. Siess, Jr. Associate Professor, Department of Civil and Environ-
mental Engineering, Louisiana State University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Ms.  Leslie  Chapman–Henderson,  President  and  CEO,  Federal  Alliance  for

Safe Home, Inc.—FLASH

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Mr.  Timothy  A.  Reinhold,  Senior  Vice  President  of  Research  and  Chief  Engi-
neer, Institute for Business and Home Safety, Tampa, Florida ......................
Dr.  Marc  L.  Levitan,  Director,  Louisiana  State  University  Hurricane  Center;
Charles P. Siess, Jr. Associate Professor, Department of Civil and Environ-
mental Engineering, Louisiana State University ..............................................
Ms.  Leslie  Chapman–Henderson,  President  and  CEO,  Federal  Alliance  for
Safe Home, Inc.—FLASH .................................................................................

(III)

Page
2
3

8
9

9
11

11

12
14
121

121
123
132

132
134
139
140

158

160

162

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Statement  of  Timothy  A.  Reinhold,  Senior  Vice  President  of  Research  and
Chief Engineer, Institute for Business and Home Safety, Tampa, Florida ....
Letter  to  Chairman  David  Wu  and  Ranking  Minority  Member  Phil  Gingrey
from John T. Snow, Dean, College of Atmospheric and Geographic Sciences,
University of Oklahoma, Norman, dated July 29, 2008 ...................................
Wind  Storms  and  Tornadoes:  Early  Detection  and  Warning  made  possible
using CASA and MPAR Weather Radar ............................................................
Map of Tornado Reports, January 01, 2008–July 15, 2008 ..................................
Impact of Tornadoes ................................................................................................
Statement of Dr. Stephen P. Leatherman, Chair Professor and Director, Inter-
national  Hurricane  Research  Center  and  Laboratory  for  Coastal  Research,
Florida International University ........................................................................

Page

168

174

176
190
191

192

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

THE  NATIONAL  WINDSTORM  IMPACT  REDUC-
TION  PROGRAM:  STRENGTHENING  WIND-
STORM  HAZARD  MITIGATION

THURSDAY,  JULY  24,  2008

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:06  a.m.,  in  Room
2318 of the Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. David Wu [Chair-
man of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

The National Windstorm Impact

Reduction Program: Strengthening

Windstorm Hazard Mitigation

THURSDAY, JULY 24, 2008

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

The purpose of this hearing is to review the activities of the National Windstorm
Impact Reduction Program (NWIRP) and to examine the role of R&D in saving lives
and  reducing  property  losses  from  windstorms.  The  witnesses  will  also  discuss  ad-
vancements  in  wind  hazard  mitigation  and  methods  of  transferring  the  results  of
research into practice for code developers, builders, and property owners. Lastly, the
witnesses  will  provide  testimony  on  the  priorities  for  a  reauthorization  of  NWIRP,
which expires in fiscal year 2008, and any changes needed to increase the effective-
ness of the program.

2. Witnesses

• Dr.  Sharon  Hays  is  the  Associate  Director  of  the  White  House  Office  of

Science and Technology Policy (OSTP);

• Dr. Marc Levitan is the Director of the Hurricane Center at Louisiana State
University (LSU) and an Associate Professor in the LSU Department of Civil
and Environmental Engineering;

• Ms.  Leslie  Chapman-Henderson  is  the  President  and  CEO  of  the  Federal

Alliance for Safe Home, Inc. (FLASH)

• Dr. Timothy Reinhold  is  the  Senior  Vice  President  for  Research  and  Chief

Engineer at the Institute for Business & Home Safety (IBHS).

3. Brief Overview

• Hurricanes, tornadoes, thunderstorms, and other severe wind-related weather
can  claim  lives,  cause  injuries,  and  cause  billions  of  dollars  in  damages.  In
2007,  according  to  the  National  Weather  Service,  111  Americans  died  in  tor-
nadoes and thunderstorm winds, and this year, tornadoes have already killed
119 people. The economic impact of the 2004 and 2005 hurricane season alone
totaled  over  $160  billion.  As  more  people  move  to  vulnerable  coastal  areas,
these losses are expected to increase.

• The  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program  (NWIRP)  is  a  federal
program which includes the National Science Foundation (NSF), the National
Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA),  the  National  Institute  of
Standards  and  Technology  (NIST),  and  the  Federal  Emergency  Management
Association (FEMA). The objective of NWIRP is to decrease the loss of life and
property from windstorms through research and development on weather phe-
nomena  and  mitigation  techniques.  Created  in  2004,  the  program  has  re-
ceived little attention from the Administration. Expenditures for R&D related
to  NWIRP,  as  reported  by  the  Administration  were  approximately  $7.5  mil-
lion in total since FY 2004.1 This amount is well below authorized levels. The

1 This figure does not include expenditures by the National Science Foundation (NSF). Spend-

ing levels from NSF on NWIRP related activities are unavailable.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

participating agencies have also failed to coordinate the ongoing wind hazard
related R&D through other mechanisms.

• Reports  from  the  National  Research  Council  (1999)  and  RAND  (2003)  argue
that  a  well  funded,  coordinated  R&D  framework  could  reduce  wind  losses.
The  RAND  report,  commissioned  by  OSTP,  analyzed  federal  disaster-related
R&D funding and found that the majority of this money supported short-term
weather prediction. The report recommended that the balance in funding shift
toward  R&D  for  long-term  mitigation  measures.  Despite  this  recommenda-
tion,  the  federal  R&D  portfolio  has  not  been  rebalanced  to  adequately  fund
research on windstorm impacts and mitigation measures.

• Mitigation efforts can reduce losses to wind-related disasters significantly, but
these  measures  are  not  widely  adopted  in  hazard  prone  areas.  Barriers  to
adoption include high capital cost, the lack of financial incentives, and a lack
of knowledge by property owners.

4. Background

High  winds  in  hurricanes,  tornadoes,  thunderstorms,  and  other  weather  phe-
nomena  cause  significant  damage  to  buildings  and  infrastructure.  Annually,  such
weather is also responsible for an average of 124 American fatalities2 and over 1,600
injuries. Though better building practices have resulted in fewer fatalities in recent
decades (Table 1) total direct property losses in the U.S. from 1996 to 2006 are over
$160  billion  (in  2006  dollars).  Moreover,  costs  associated  with  wind-related  natural
disasters  have  doubled  or  tripled  each  decade  over  the  past  35  years.  Much  of  the
precipitous increase in property losses is due to the rise of population in vulnerable
coastal  areas.  Between  1980  and  2003,  the  number  of  Americans  living  in  coastal
counties  increased  by  28  percent.  More  than  50  percent  of  Americans  now  live  on
the coast and this upward trend is projected to continue.3 Those dwelling in manu-
factured  housing  (i.e.,  mobile  homes)  are  at  an  increased  risk  of  death,  injury,  and
property loss from high-wind storms.

In  2004,  Congress  passed  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Act  (P.L.
108–360)  which  established  NWIRP.  The  objective  of  the  program,  as  stated  in  the
enacting  legislation,  is  ‘‘the  achievement  of  major  measurable  reductions  in  losses
of life and property from windstorms’’ through a coordinated Federal effort. The Act
directs  NOAA,  NIST,  NSF,  and  FEMA  to  support  activities  to  improve  the  under-
standing of windstorms and their impacts, and to develop and encourage the imple-
mentation of cost-effective mitigation measures to reduce these impacts. The statute
charges an interagency working group (IWG)—chaired on a rotating basis by FEMA,
NSF,  NOAA,  or  NIST—to  coordinate  the  R&D  priorities,  portfolio,  and  budget.  The
program is authorized through FY 2008 (Table 2).

2 Average  calculated  from  National  Weather  Service  fatality  data  for  1996  through  2006,  ex-

3 2003 RAND Report: Assessing Federal Research and Development for Hazard Loss Reduction,

clusive of 2005 hurricane season deaths.

Charles Meade, Megan Abbott.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

As  required  by  legislation,  OSTP  submitted  an  NWIRP  implementation  plan  to
Congress in April 2006. The plan assessed programs relevant to the goals of NWIRP
across  eight  federal  agencies  and  identified  important  areas  of  research  that  were
not  covered  by  current  activities.  The  knowledge  gaps  covered  the  three  broad  cat-
egories  of  research  authorized  in  the  Act:  understanding  windstorms;  assessing  the
impacts of windstorms; and mitigating the effects of windstorms. To further the un-
derstanding  of  windstorms,  the  plan  identifies  the  need  for  research  on  the  struc-
ture of windstorms and wind behavior, instrumentation for the study of windstorms,
and  the  development  of  standards  for  deploying  instruments,  assessing  measure-
ments,  and  storing  and  sharing  data.  Research  into  assessing  the  impacts  of  wind-
storm  would  include  the  response  of  structures  to  windstorms  and  their  resilience
over  time,  and  social  science  research  on  the  impact  of  windstorm  damage  on  com-
munities,  particularly  vulnerable  populations.  For  mitigation,  research  is  needed  to
improve  building  codes  and  standards,  and  to  develop  better  decision-making  tools
for all level of government.

The  implementation  plan  also  recommends  that  an  IWG  within  the  National
Science  and  Technology  Council’s  (NSTC)  Committee  on  Environment,  Natural  Re-
sources Subcommittee on Disaster Reduction oversee the research portfolio outlined
above, with representatives from NSF, NIST, NOAA, and FEMA, as well as NASA,
the  Federal  Highways  Administration  (FHWA),  and  the  Army  Corps  of  Engineers.
These  agencies  support  mission-related  R&D  on  windstorms  and  windstorm  im-
pacts.  The  IWG  would  be  responsible  for  facilitating  communication  between  the
agencies on the best means of allocating agency resources to meet NWIRP goals and
for coordinating this federal research portfolio.

As  of  the  FY  2009  budget  request,  the  Administration  has  never  requested  fund-
ing for NWIRP. Although the implementation plan recommended an IWG coordinate
a  research  portfolio  targeted  to  the  identified  research  needs,  there  has  been  little
effort  to  do  this.  Currently  the  IWG  is  not  chaired  by  any  agency,  as  required  by
statute, nor has OSTP convened an external advisory committee to provide guidance
and feedback for the program.

Program  activities  related  specifically  to  wind-hazard  reduction  are  not  explicitly
stated  in  agency  budgets,  however,  the  Administration  reports  that  agencies  have
funded approximately $7.5 million (not including NSF) in related activities since FY
2004. These efforts are summarized below:

• NSF’s role in NWIRP is to support basic research on engineering and the at-
mospheric sciences to improve the understanding of windstorms and their im-
pacts  on  the  built  environment  and  lifelines.  To  that  end,  NSF  has  funded
research in the atmospheric dynamics that form storms and hazardous winds;
post-Hurricane Katrina grants to document and preserve data on the built en-
vironment,  perform  social  science  research,  and  to  fund  engineering  studies;
and  research  to  gain  a  better  understanding  of  evacuations  and  community
rebuilding.  Estimates  from  NSF  on  the  total  spending  related  to  NWIRP  are
unavailable,  but  the  agency  estimates  they  will  spend  $6.8  million  on  re-
search related to NWIRP in FY 2008.
• NOAA’s  role  in  NWIRP  is  to  support  atmospheric  sciences  research  to  im-
prove the understanding of windstorms and their impact on the built environ-
ment  and  lifelines.  Aligned  with  NWIRP’s  goals,  NOAA  performs  education
and  outreach  related  to  hazards  through  Sea  Grant  institutions  and  other
means; supports research and operations at the National Weather Center for
improved  prediction  and  monitoring  of  severe  storms  and  hazardous  winds;
gathers  field  data  on  hurricane  dynamics;  develops  probes  and  other  moni-
toring  equipment  for  data  collection  in  extreme  weather;  develops  decision

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

support  tools  that  map  wind-speeds;  provides  information  and  planning  as-
sistance  to  increase  community  storm  resiliency;  and  participates  on  the
U.S.–Japan Panel on Wind and Seismic Effects. NOAA reports spending of
$3.5  million  on  NWIRP  related  activities  for  the  period  of  FY  2004  to
FY  2008.  The  NOAA  FY  2009  budget  request  includes  $1  million  for  these
activities.
• NIST’s  role  in  NWIRP  is  to  support  R&D  to  improve  building  codes,  stand-
ards,  and  practices  for  design  and  construction  of  the  built  environment  and
lifelines.  Activities  that  NIST  has  engaged  in  related  to  NWIRP  include  the
development  of  software  and  procedures  to  facilitate  the  use  of  automated
wind  impact  sensors  on  buildings;  computational  tools  for  determining  real-
istic  wind  loads  on  the  built  environment;  methodologies  for  predicting  ulti-
mate  structural  capacities;  post-Hurricane  Katrina  evaluations  of  the  built
environment; providing technical information to improve codes and standards;
and  participating  on  the  U.S.–Japan  Panel  on  Wind  and  Seismic  Effects.
NIST  reports  spending  of  $2.45  million  on  NWIRP  related  activities
for  the  period  of  FY  2004  to  FY  2008.  The  NIST  FY  2009  budget  request
includes $1.4 million for these activities.
• FEMA’s  role  in  NWIRP  is  to  support  the  development  of  risk  assessment
tools  and  the  effective  mitigation  techniques,  windstorm  related  data  collec-
tion and analysis, and conduct public outreach and information dissemination
to  promote  mitigation  measures.  Activities  identified  by  FEMA  that  meet
these  goals  include:  update  and  development  of  HAZUS,  a  modeling  tool  for
communities to estimate damage, economic loss, and social impacts of storms;
Mitigation  Assessment  Teams  (MAT)  studies  of  building  performance  after
major  storms;  construction  guidance  for  building  in  vulnerable  coastal  areas
and  storm  shelters;  and  cooperation  with  NOAA  to  improve  evacuation  plan-
ning  for  hurricanes.  FEMA  reports  spending  of  $1.5  million  on  NWIRP
related activities for the period of FY 2004 to FY 2008. FEMA estimates
spending  on  these  activities  for  FY  2009  to  between  $200,000  and  $250,000.
In  2003,  the  RAND  Corporation  released  a  report  commissioned  by  OSTP  to  as-
sess  federal  spending  on  disaster-related  R&D.  The  study  found  that  the  majority
of  such  funding  goes  to  fundamental  research  into  atmospheric  and  meteorological
aspects  of  windstorms  and  other  weather.  A  significantly  smaller  portion  went  to-
ward  structural  engineering  R&D  on  buildings  and  other  infrastructure  to  increase
their  resilience  during  and  after  windstorms.  The  RAND  report  recommended  that
the  R&D  focus  shift  toward  long-term  mitigation  efforts.  The  report  stated,  ‘‘This
is  especially  relevant  for  weather  related  hazards,  for  which  R&D  is  primarily  lim-
ited  to  procurements  for  short-term  forecasting  efforts,’’  noting  that  short-term  pre-
diction efforts can have a life-safety impact but generally do not reduce property or
economic losses. A 1999 National Research Council report4 recommended that: ‘‘the
Federal  Government  should  coordinate  existing  federal  activities  and  develop,  in
conjunction  with  State  and  local  governments,  private  industry,  the  research  com-
munity,  and  other  interested  stakeholder  groups,  a  national  wind-hazard  reduction
program.  Congress  should  consider  designating  sufficient  funds  to  establish  and
support  a  national  program  of  this  nature.’’  Experts  in  mitigation  argue  that  sup-
port  for  windstorm  hazard  mitigation  could  result  in  similar  benefits  to  those  gen-
erated by the National Earthquake Hazard Reduction Program (NEHRP). This pro-
gram, created by Congress in 1978, is a coordinated interagency effort to reduce the
impact  of  earthquakes  on  the  built  environment  and  communities.  Researchers  in
both fields (wind and earthquake engineering) often point to the minor damage from
the 2001 6.8 Seattle earthquake as evidence that thirty years of funding earthquake
engineering R&D have had measurable results.5

Measures  to  mitigate  damage  from  windstorms  are  currently  available,  but  they
are  not  universally  adopted.  A  study  published  in  2008  by  the  Wharton  Risk  Man-
agement and Decision Process Center at the Wharton School of Business quantified
the impact of mitigation, showing that mitigation efforts could reduce hurricane-re-
lated  losses  by  40  to  60  percent.  Similarly,  post-storm  FEMA  MAT  reports  consist-
ently  show  that  houses  built  to  modern  codes  generally  remain  standing  through  a
storm,  compared  to  those  not  built  to  code.  A  natural  tendency  to  ignore  or  down-
play  the  risk  of  catastrophe  could  explain  the  lack  of  adoption  of  mitigation  meas-
ures  however,  other  barriers,  such  as  the  high  cost  of  implementation  and  limited

4 1999  National  Research  Council  Report:  Review  of  the  Need  for  a  Large-Scale  Test  Facility

for Research on the Effects of Extreme Wind on Structures.

5 2003 RAND Report: Assessing Federal Research and Development for Hazard Loss Reduction,

Charles Meade, Megan Abbott.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

financial  incentive  (through  reduction  in  insurance  premium,  tax  incentives,  etc.),
and  a  lack  of  understanding  of  risk  and  available  mitigation  technologies  also  pre-
vent more wide spread use of mitigation measures.

5. Issues and Concerns

• The  costs  associated  with  windstorms  are  rising,  but  little  funding  has  gone
toward  understanding  windstorms  and  their  impacts  and  developing  mitiga-
tion  measures.  Reports  from  the  National  Academies,  RAND,  and  OSTP’s
NWIRP  Implementation  Plan  strongly  recommend  a  coordinated  effort  for
R&D  to  reduce  hazards  from  windstorms.  The  limited  research  that  NSF,
NIST,  NOAA,  and  FEMA  have  supported  is  not  well  coordinated.  For  exam-
ple,  although  NIST,  FEMA,  NSF,  and  several  other  federal  agencies  dis-
patched  resources  to  examine  the  effects  of  Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita,
there is little evidence that these activities were coordinated.
• As  stated  in  the  2003  RAND  report,  to  achieve  a  reduction  in  the  massive
economic  losses  from  windstorms,  the  federal  R&D  portfolio  should  support
long-term research on hazard reduction methods. Based on the funding levels
for  NWIRP  reported  by  the  Administration,  this  type  of  research  is  not  ade-
quately  supported  at  the  federal  level.  Researchers  in  the  wind  engineering
community  point  to  a  consistent  lack  of  funding  as  a  cause  of  the  decline  in
the number of graduate students and professors in the wind engineering pro-
fession  and  as  a  hindrance  to  advancing  knowledge  that  would  have  useful
applications in reducing losses from windstorms.
• Mitigation techniques do exist to save lives and reduce damages but they are
not  universally  adopted.  Decreasing  the  cost  of  mitigation  measures  and  in-
creasing  the  education  and  outreach  to  property  owners  could  increase  the
adoption of mitigation techniques.
• The authorization for NWRIP expires this fiscal year (FY 2008). To date, the
program  has  not  been  well  implemented.  Changes  to  the  legislation  and  the
program should be considered if the reauthorized NWIRP is to be an effective
program.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairman  WU.  Good  morning,  and  welcome  to  this  morning’s
hearing  on  The  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program:
Strengthening  Windstorm  Hazard  Mitigation.  This  is  a  very,  very
important  topic.  The  Nation  has  learned  that,  and  I  have  learned
that in my own Congressional district.

Every  single  year,  severe  winds  from  hurricanes,  tornadoes,  and
thunderstorms  damage  or  destroy  thousands  of  homes  and  busi-
nesses.  They  damage  vital  infrastructure,  and  most  importantly,
they  threaten  human  life.  On  average,  60  Americans  die  in  torna-
does  each  year,  but  this  year  is  already  proving  to  be  one  of  the
deadliest  years  on  record  for  wind-related  fatalities,  with  over  100
Americans killed in tornadoes this spring alone. And we cannot for-
get  the  more  than  1,000  people  who  lost  their  lives  in  Hurricane
Katrina and the follow-on consequences.

Dollar  amounts  vary  widely  on  the  extent  of  property  damage
and  economic  losses  from  windstorms,  but  since  2004,  windstorms
have cost this country well over $160 billion.

We  in  the  Pacific  Northwest  were  reminded  last  December  that
no  part  of  the  country  is  safe  from  severe  windstorms.  On  Decem-
ber  1,  2007,  a  Pacific  storm  brought  hurricane  force  winds  and
heavy  rain  to  Oregon  and  Washington,  and  tragically,  five  people
died  in  that  storm.  Thousands  were  left  with  damaged  homes  and
flattened  communications  systems  and  electrical  grids.  Insurance
claims for Oregon alone, for non-flood-related damage in that wind-
storm,  were  over  $70  million,  and  local  and  State  officials  have
sought  $53  million  in  federal  money  to  help  repair  damaged  infra-
structure. Knowing that these types of storms will strike again, we
must do more to prevent the loss of life and property.

Today, we will discuss the National Windstorm Impact Reduction
Program,  or  NWIRP.  It  was  created  by  Congress  in  2004  to  help
reduce  devastating  losses  from  windstorms.  NWIRP  directs  four
federal  agencies,  FEMA,  NOAA,  the  National  Science  Foundation,
and  NIST,  to  conduct  coordinated  R&D  on  the  nature  of  wind-
storms, their effects, and on ways to mitigate impact. The program
also  calls  on  these  agencies  to  facilitate  technology  transfer,  to
make sure that beneficial research is put into practice.

Since  passage  of  the  enacting  legislation,  the  program  has  done,
quite frankly, little to address this very substantial problem. Unfor-
tunately, NWIRP has received little attention from the Administra-
tion,  in  terms  of  either  funding  or  coordination.  NWIRP  expires
this fiscal year, and if we are to reauthorize it, we will need to dis-
cuss how it can be changed to ensure that it meets its goals of im-
proving  the  safety  of  Americans  and  increasing  protection  from
wind  hazards.  Damage  from  storms  is  projected  to  increase  as  a
greater number of Americans move to coastal areas, and especially
those areas which are subject to violent windstorms.

We  are  not  completely  powerless  to  reduce  losses  from  wind-
storms.  Known  mitigation  techniques  can  greatly  decrease  the
amount  of  wind  damage,  in  some  cases,  by  as  much  as  50  or  60
percent.

I  look  forward  to  our  witnesses’  comments  on  improving  the  Na-
tional Windstorm Impact Reduction Program, and I also hope they
can  suggest  how  we  can  improve  the  utilization  of  existing  wind-
storm mitigation technologies and practices.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

And  at  this  point,  I  would  like  to  recognize  the  Subcommittee’s

Ranking Member, Dr. Gingrey, for his opening statement.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Wu follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN DAVID WU

Good  morning,  and  welcome  to  today’s  hearing  on  The  National  Windstorm  Im-
pact  Reduction  Program:  Strengthening  Windstorm  Hazard  Mitigation.  This  is  an
incredibly  important  topic.  Every  year,  severe  winds  from  hurricanes,  tornadoes,
and  thunderstorms  damage  or  destroy  thousands  of  homes  and  businesses,  harm
vital  infrastructure,  and,  most  importantly,  threaten  human  life.  An  average  of  60
Americans have died in tornadoes each year since 1996, but 2008 is already proving
to  be  one  of  the  deadliest  years  on  record  for  wind-related  fatalities,  with  over  100
Americans  killed  in  tornadoes  this  spring  alone.  And  we  cannot  forget  the  more
than  1,000  people  who  lost  their  lives  in  Hurricane  Katrina.  Dollar  amounts  vary
widely on the extent of property damage and economic losses from windstorms, but
since 2004, economic windstorms have cost the country well over $160 billion.

We  in  the  Northwest  were  reminded  last  December  that  no  part  of  the  country
is  safe  from  windstorms.  On  December  1st  a  Pacific  storm  brought  hurricane-force
winds  and  heavy  rain  to  the  Oregon  and  Washington  coasts.  Tragically,  five  people
died  in  that  storm.  Thousands  of  people  were  left  with  damaged  homes  and  vital
infrastructure,  including  communications  and  electrical  systems,  were  badly  dam-
aged.  Insurance  claims  for  Oregon  for  non-flood  related  damage  were  over  $70  mil-
lion  and  local  and  State  officials  have  sought  $53  million  in  federal  money  to  help
repair  damaged  infrastructure.  Knowing  that  these  types  of  storms  will  certainly
strike again, we must do more to prevent the loss of life and property.

Today  we  will  discuss  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program,  or
NWIRP.  Created  by  Congress  in  2004  to  help  reduce  devastating  losses  from  wind-
storms,  NWIRP  directs  four  federal  agencies—FEMA,  NOAA,  NSF,  and  NIST—to
conduct coordinated R&D on the nature of windstorms and their effects and on ways
to mitigate their impact. The program also calls on these agencies to facilitate tech-
nology transfer to make sure that beneficial research is put into practice. Since pas-
sage of the enacting legislation, the program has done little to address this very siz-
able problem. Unfortunately, NWIRP has received little attention from the adminis-
tration  in  terms  of  both  funding  and  coordination.  NWIRP  expires  this  fiscal  year,
and  if  we  are  to  reauthorize  it,  we  will  need  to  discuss  how  it  can  be  changed  to
ensure it meets its goals of improving the safety of Americans by increasing the pro-
tection from wind hazards.

Damage  from  storms  is  projected  to  increase  as  a  greater  number  of  Americans
move  to  coastal  areas.  However,  we  are  not  completely  powerless  to  reduce  the
losses  from  windstorms.  Known  mitigation  techniques  can  greatly  decrease  the
amount of wind damage—in some cases by as much as 50 to 60 percent.

I  look  forward  to  our  witness’  comments  on  improving  the  National  Windstorm
Impact  Reduction  program.  I  also  hope  they  can  suggest  how  we  can  improve  the
utilization of existing windstorm mitigation technologies and practices.

I now recognize the Subcommittee Ranking Member, Dr. Gingrey, for his opening

statement.

Mr.  GINGREY.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you,  and  before  I  start  my
opening  statement,  I  want  to  ask  that  Dr.  Tim  Reinhold’s  testi-
mony  be  added,  his  written  testimony,  to  the  record.  He  was  de-
layed,  detained,  snowed  in,  I  don’t  know  what  the  situation  is  in
Chicago,  rainstorms  more  likely,  but  was  not  able  to  get  here.  So,
with  unanimous  consent,  we  can  add  his  testimony  to  the  record.
(See Appendix 2: Additional Material for the Record.)

Chairman WU. Without objection, so ordered.
Mr. GINGREY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and good morning.
I  want  to  thank  you,  of  course,  for  calling  this  hearing  on  an
issue  that  unfortunately  touches  the  lives  of  the  American  people
on  an  annual  basis,  damage  and  economic  loss  from  windstorms.
Each  year,  lives  are  lost,  and  billions  and  billions  of  dollars  are
spent recovering from the destruction caused by tornadoes and hur-
ricanes.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

When the National Windstorm Impact Reduction Act was passed
four  years  ago,  the  Federal  Government  recognized  the  need  to
proactively  conduct  research  and  development  programs  to  save
lives  and  reduce  property  damage  caused  by  these  horrific  storms.
I am looking forward to hearing from today’s panel about both the
success of the National Windstorm Impact Reduction Program over
the  past  years,  as  well  as  improvements,  as  the  Chairman  said,  to
the program that can be made as we move forward.

Mr. Chairman, my home State of Georgia has had a long and no-
torious  history  with  tornadoes  and  windstorms,  with  several  inci-
dents  in  the  past  year.  In  fact,  in  March  of  2007,  tornadoes  stuck
the  towns  of  Potterville,  North  Newton,  and  Americus,  Georgia,
leaving  nine  people  dead  and  tremendous  damage  in  their  wakes.
In December, in Ashburn, a truck driver was killed when a tornado
blew  his  vehicle  off  the  road.  This  past  March,  and  you  may  have
read  about  this  on  the  sports  pages,  downtown  Atlanta  witnessed
incredible damage to infrastructure when tornadoes ripped holes in
the  roof  of  the  Georgia  Dome  during  the  2008  Men’s,  SEC  Men’s
Basketball  Tournament.  It  is  amazing,  amazing  that  we  didn’t
have  a  tremendous  loss  of  life,  because  all  of  those  people  were
slow  to  evacuate,  and  to  stop  the  game  they  were  all  interested  in
watching.

At  the  same  time,  in  my  Northwest  Georgia  district,  the  11th  of
Georgia, a tornado struck Polk and Floyd Counties, causing signifi-
cant  economic  loss,  and  regrettably,  taking  the  lives  of  two  of  my
constituents,  one  in  Floyd  County,  one  in  Polk  County,  Bonnie
Turner,  Jerry  Albers,  salt  of  the  Earth  people  from  farming  com-
munities.  Their  homes  were  destroyed,  but  sadly,  they  lost  their
lives as well.

In  addition  to  the  lives  lost,  the  United  States  sustains  billions
of  dollars  in  economic  damages  each  year  due  to  tornadoes  and
hurricanes, and vulnerability is only increasing, it would seem. Ac-
cording to the Georgia Insurance Commission, insured losses across
our state, in just the first five months of this year, have surpassed
$400 million.

Mr.  Chairman,  improved  windstorm  impact  reduction  measures
have  the  potential  to  save  lives  and  reduce  losses  associated  with
these  storms.  For  instance,  the  Federal  Government  continues  to
invest  in  R&D  activities  that  can  increase  warning  time  for  torna-
does  and  any  other  extreme  weather  events.  While  little  can  be
done,  as  you  have  said,  to  protect  structures  from  large  tornadoes,
researchers  have  made  significant  progress  in  designing  buildings
and  retrofits  to  withstand  high  wind  events.  Finding  practical  and
effective  applications  for  this  research  remains  the  biggest  chal-
lenge at the National Windstorm Impact Program today.

This  obstacle  is  unfortunately  complicated  by  the  number  of
stakeholders.  The  Chairman  mentioned  the  four  agencies,  federal
agencies,  State  and  local  communities,  private  organizations,  all
have a role in better preparing the Nation against windstorms. The
R&D  efforts  in  this  program  create  ways  for  these  stakeholders  to
collaborate in a productive and an effective manner.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  want  to  thank  these  three  witnesses,  and  the
fourth  that  was  not  able  to  be  here,  through  no  fault  of  his  own,
for coming to relate their expertise on the challenges and hopefully,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

the  successes  of  reducing  windstorm  impacts.  This  is  a  complex
challenge  with  clear  benefits  that  will  require  a  great  deal  of  co-
operation,  patience,  and  resolve  to  overcome.  And  I  certainly  look
forward to supporting these efforts, and I yield back to you.

[The statement of Mr. Gingrey follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE PHIL GINGREY

Good  morning  Mr.  Chairman.  I  want  to  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing  on  an
issue  that  unfortunately  touches  the  lives  of  the  American  people  on  an  annual
basis: damage and economic loss from windstorms. Each year, lives are lost and bil-
lions  upon  billions  of  dollars  are  spent  recovering  from  the  destruction  caused  by
tornadoes and hurricanes.

When  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Act  was  passed  four  years  ago,
the Federal Government recognized the need to proactively conduct research and de-
velopment programs to save lives and reduce property damage caused by these hor-
rific storms. I am looking forward to hearing from today’s panel about both the suc-
cesses  of  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program  over  the  past  four
years,  as  well  as  improvements  to  the  program  that  can  be  made  moving  forward.
Mr.  Chairman,  my  home  State  of  Georgia  has  a  long  and  notorious  history  with
tornadoes and windstorms, with several incidents in the past year and a half alone.
In  March  of  2007,  tornadoes  struck  the  towns  of  Potterville,  North  Newton,  and
Americus, leaving nine people dead and tremendous damage in their wakes. In De-
cember  in  Ashburn,  a  truck  driver  was  killed  when  a  tornado  blew  his  vehicle  off
the road.

This  past  March,  Downtown  Atlanta  witnessed  incredible  damage  to  infrastruc-
ture when tornadoes ripped holes in the roof of the famed Georgia Dome during the
2008  SEC  Men’s  Basketball  Tournament.  At  the  same  time  in  my  Northwest  Geor-
gia district, tornadoes struck Polk and Floyd Counties—causing significant economic
loss and regrettably taking the lives of three of my constituents.

In  addition  to  the  lives  lost,  the  United  States  sustains  billions  of  dollars  in  eco-
nomic  damages  each  year  due  to  tornadoes  and  hurricanes,  and  our  vulnerability
is only increasing. According to the Georgia Insurance Commissioner, insured losses
across the State of Georgia in just the first five months of this year have surpassed
$400 million.

Mr. Chairman, improved windstorm impact reduction measures have the potential
to save lives and reduce losses associated with these storms. For instance, the Fed-
eral  Government  continues  to  invest  in  R&D  activities  that  can  increase  warning
time  for  tornadoes  and  other  extreme  weather  events.  While  little  can  be  done  to
protect structures from large tornadoes, researchers have made significant progress
in designing buildings and retrofits to withstand high wind events.

Finding  practical  and  effective  applications  for  this  research  remains  the  biggest
challenge that the National Windstorm Impact Program has today. This obstacle is
unfortunately  complicated  by  the  number  of  stakeholders—federal  agencies,  State
and  local  communities,  and  private  organizations—that  have  a  role  in  better  pre-
paring the Nation against windstorms. The R&D efforts in this program create ways
for these stakeholders to collaborate in a productive and effective manner.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  like  to  thank  the  witnesses  for  coming  to  relate  their  ex-
pertise  on  the  challenges,  and  hopefully  the  successes,  of  reducing  windstorm  im-
pacts. This is a complex challenge with clear benefits that will require a great deal
of  cooperation,  patience,  and  resolve  to  overcome,  and  I  look  forward  to  supporting
these efforts.

Chairman WU. I thank the gentleman. If there are Members who
wish to submit additional opening statements, your statements will
be added to the record at this point.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Richardson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE LAURA RICHARDSON

Thank  you  Chairman  Wu  for  holding  this  very  important  hearing  today,  and  our
witnesses for their appearance. The purpose of today’s hearing is to examine the ac-
tivities  of  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program,  and  the  role  that
R&D plays in reducing property loss and saving lives from windstorms.

Depending  on  the  time  of  year,  every  region  of  the  Nation  has  to  confront  a  nat-
ural  disaster.  In  California  we  have  earthquakes  and  wildfires,  so  windstorm  dam-
age  is  an  issue  that  those  of  us  on  the  west  coast  are  fortunate  enough  to  avoid.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

However,  natural  disasters  of  any  kind  can  cause  significant  loss  in  life  and  prop-
erty, thereby necessitating the need to prepare adequately.

In  California  we  implemented  strict  building  standards  after  the  Northridge
earthquake  to  combat  the  potential  damage  that  natural  disasters  create,  and  this
approach  can  serve  as  a  model  to  states  in  the  heartland  and  the  South  that  have
to deal with tornadoes and hurricanes respectively.

Now  it  should  be  noted  that  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program
has  not  been  funded  at  the  authorized  levels  for  several  years  now.  This  must
change  considering  the  fact  that  in  2007,  111  Americans  died  in  tornadoes  and
thunderstorm winds, and tornadoes have already killed 119 people this year.

Likewise as more people move to coastal areas the threat of hurricanes obviously
increases.  Therefore  as  a  matter  of  fiscal  responsibility  we  owe  it  to  the  American
people  to  increase  R&D  efforts  that  will  mitigate  the  impact  of  windstorm  damage.
In  2004  and  2005  the  economic  impact  of  hurricane  season  totaled  more  than  $160
billion dollars.

My  personal  work  philosophy  has  always  been  to  put  the  majority  of  my  effort
in on the front end in order to avoid subsequent damages on the back-end. This ap-
proach ought to be applied to matters pertaining to windstorm damage as well.
I look forward to a productive discussion, Mr. Chairman I yield back my time.
Chairman  WU.  I  would  now  like  to  introduce  our  witnesses,  and
thank  them  for  appearing  before  the  Subcommittee  this  morning.
Dr.  Sharon  Hayes,  who  is  the  Associate  Director  of  the  Office  of
Science and Technology Policy; Dr. Marc Levitan, who is the Direc-
tor  of  the  Louisiana  State  University  Hurricane  Center,  where  he
is  also  a  Professor  of  Civil  and  Environmental  Engineering;  Ms.
Leslie Chapman-Henderson, who is the President of the Federal Al-
liance  for  Safe  Homes,  or  FLASH,  a  not  for  profit  organization  de-
voted to mitigating the impact of storms on homes.

Dr. Timothy Reinhold, we understand, is delayed by the vagaries
of  either  weather  or  the  airlines,  which  are,  well,  no  further  com-
ment  on  either  one.  And  his  statement,  as  earlier  referred  to,  will
be included in our record.

For  our  witnesses,  spoken  testimony  is  limited  to  five  minutes
each,  after  which  the  Members  of  the  Committee  will  have  five
minutes  to  ask  questions.  Your  written  statements  will  be  taken
into the record in their entirety.

And Dr. Hays, we will begin with you. Please proceed.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  SHARON  L.  HAYS,  ASSOCIATE  DIRECTOR
AND  DEPUTY  DIRECTOR  FOR  SCIENCE,  WHITE  HOUSE  OF-
FICE OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY
Dr. HAYS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  Wu,  Ranking  Member  Gingrey,  and  Members  of  the
Subcommittee, it is my pleasure to appear before you in this hear-
ing on the National Windstorm Impact Reduction Program.

Every  year  in  the  U.S.,  windstorms  are  responsible  for  tremen-
dous damage to property, and often, loss of life. Hurricane Katrina
demonstrated  how  a  severe  hurricane  can  affect  not  just  those  in
its path, but the entire country and its economy. Tornadoes and se-
vere  storms  are  also  capable  of  tremendous  destruction.  As  the
Chairman mentioned, in 2008, the United States has been ravaged
by  a  near  record  number  of  tornadoes  that  has  pushed  the  death
toll to a 10 year high. Thus, the topic of this hearing is both impor-
tant and timely.

You  asked  me  to  address  four  questions.  My  written  testimony
provides more detail regarding several of your questions, including
a summary of the activities of the National Windstorm Impact Re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

duction  Program,  which  was  the  subject  of  your  first  question,  so
I will not repeat that summary here.

You  also  asked  how  the  agencies  involved  in  the  Windstorm  Im-
pact  Reduction  Program  receive  input  from  the  external  commu-
nity.  This  happens  in  a  number  of  ways.  The  primary  mechanism
is  through  the  National  Research  Council’s  Disasters  Roundtable,
which  holds  workshops  on  particular  disaster-related  topics  that
bring together experts from agencies, industry, academia, and non-
governmental  organizations.  Several  agency  personnel  sit  on  the
Roundtable  Steering  Committee.  Many  others  participate  in  the
Roundtables  themselves.  A  list  of  recent  Roundtable  topics  can  be
found in Attachment 3 to my written testimony.

Another  extremely  important  mechanism  for  getting  non-govern-
ment input on disaster related R&D occurs through agency-specific
mechanisms.  Here  are  several  examples.  One,  NSF  incorporates
private  sector  researchers,  particularly  those  in  academia,  on  its
peer review panels charged with helping make award selection de-
cisions.

Two, through active participation and leadership in many stand-
ards  development  organizations,  staff  from  NIST’s  Building  and
Fire Research Laboratory, which is the locus of NIST’s windstorm-
related research, contribute significant time and technical expertise
to  the  process  of  developing  national  and  international  standards,
and this brings them into direct contact with their peers in the pri-
vate  sector,  and  also  helps  translate  the  results  of  NIST  research
into practical applications.

Three,  because  some  important  disaster-related  research  can  be
done  only  in  the  aftermath  of  an  event,  FEMA  assembles  mitiga-
tion  assessment  teams,  made  up  of  government  and  private  sector
experts,  to  perform  post-disaster  assessments.  These  teams  work
closely  together  to  understand  the  impacts  of  a  disaster  event  on
buildings—the  results  are  of  tremendous  importance  in  defining
new  areas  of  research,  as  well  as  future  building  codes  and  stand-
ards.  These  examples  reflect  the  different  missions  and  operations
of  the  agencies  that  perform  disaster  R&D.  They  provide  multiple
and complementary avenues for public/private communication.

You  also  asked  for  an  update  on  efforts  being  taken  to  address
current  gaps  in  R&D  identified  in  the  Administration’s  Windstorm
Impact  Reduction  Implementation  Plan.  Descriptions  of  specific
agency  activities  and  programs  are  included  in  my  written  testi-
mony.  And  the  Windstorm  Working  Group  will  also  be  providing
Congress  with  an  updated  biannual  report  by  later  this  year  or
early  next  year.  That  report  will  have  more  information  on  the
working group’s most recent activities.

Finally,  you  asked  about  a  2003  RAND  report  on  Windstorms.
The  RAND  Report  represents  a  very  thoughtful  assessment  of  the
role of R&D in helping make our nation more resilient to disasters.
In  fact,  it  was  one  of  the  guiding  references  used  by  the  Sub-
committee  on  Disaster  Reduction,  which  is  the  interagency  group
that  is  charged  with  coordinating  the  Administration’s  disaster-re-
lated  R&D.  When  developing  their  report  on  grand  challenges  for
disaster—many of the issues raised in the RAND report are specifi-
cally  identified  in  the  grand  challenges,  which  is  an  emphasis  on
mitigation strategies and technologies.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

One of the RAND Report’s implicit conclusions is the importance
of  considering  disaster  reduction  R&D  in  an  all  hazards  context,
thus taking into account windstorm R&D alongside other disasters,
such as floods, earthquakes, and wildfires. That all hazards context
is  a  fundamental  tenet  of  the  Federal  Government’s  current  ap-
proach to coordination of disaster.

In  closing,  I  would  like  to  point  out  that  in  many  instances,  re-
ducing  the  impacts  of  disasters  ultimately  requires  actions  beyond
the  purview  of  the  Federal  Government.  The  adoption  of  zoning
laws,  building  codes,  and  other  actions  that  can  build  resilience
within  communities  are  rightly  vested  in  State  and  local  authori-
ties.  Given  this,  I  believe  the  most  important  roles  of  the  Federal
Government  are  in  R&D  that  underpin  technological  innovations,
such  as  improved  prediction  capabilities  and  better  strengthen
buildings and infrastructure, and in communicating the benefits of
their adoption.

The Subcommittee on Disaster Reduction is an important mecha-
nism  for  the  Federal  Government  to  perform  these  essential  ele-
ments of developing a more disaster-resilient America.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  happy  to  answer  any  questions  that  you  or
other  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  have  at  the  appropriate  time,
and  as  I  mentioned  earlier,  my  written  testimony  contains  much
more  detail,  so  I  ask  that  it  and  its  attachments  be  made  part  of
the record.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Hays follows:]

I. Introduction

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SHARON L. HAYS

Chairman  Wu,  Ranking  Member  Gingrey,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I
am  pleased  to  appear  before  you  today  to  describe  interagency  activities  related  to
the National Windstorm Impact Reduction Program (NWIRP). Wind hazards (hurri-
canes,  tornadoes,  severe  windstorms)  are  among  the  most  destructive  and  economi-
cally  damaging  hazards  in  the  U.S.  While  other  hazards  strike  irregularly,  wind
storms produce enormous damage in the U.S. year after year.

Reducing  the  likelihood  and  impact  of  natural  and  technological1 disasters  re-
quires  an  understanding  of  science  and  technology,  the  transformation  of  research
into  disaster  reduction  programs  and  applications,  and  access  to  information  from
both  public  and  private  entities.  In  order  to  meet  these  challenges,  the  interagency
Subcommittee on Disaster Reduction (SDR) of the National Science and Technology
Council  (NSTC)  was  chartered  in  1988.  The  SDR  provides  a  unique  federal  forum
for  information  sharing,  development  of  collaborative  opportunities,  formulation  of
science-  and  technology-based  guidance  for  policy-makers,  and  dialogue  with  the
U.S.  policy  community  to  advance  informed  strategies  for  managing  disaster  risks.
In  many  instances,  reducing  the  impacts  of  disasters  ultimately  requires  actions
beyond the purview of the Federal Government. The adoption of zoning laws, build-
ing codes, and other actions that can build resilience within communities are rightly
vested  in  State  and  local  authorities.  In  these  instances,  the  most  important  roles
of  the  Federal  Government  are  in  research  and  development  (R&D)  that  underpin
technological  innovations  and  in  communicating  the  benefit  of  such  actions.  The
SDR,  and  its  working  groups,  are  important  mechanisms  for  the  Federal  Govern-
ment  to  perform  these  essential  elements  of  developing  a  more  disaster-resilient
America.

The overarching philosophy of the SDR is to examine R&D needs for specific types
of disasters within an all-hazards view. Accordingly, basic research on the resilience
of  structures  to  wind  are  coordinated  with  similar  studies  related  to  flooding  and
storm surge because all three phenomena commonly occur together in hurricanes or
severe storms. Likewise, the end-to-end aspects of hazards and disasters are consid-

1 The term ‘‘technological disasters’’ refers to accidental releases of hazardous substances, such

as an oil or toxic chemical spill.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

ered  as  a  whole;  basic  research  on  natural  processes  that  cause  disasters  is  linked
to  risk  assessment,  preparedness,  and  the  economic  and  social  impact  of  disasters.
The primary goal of hazard research is to reduce loss of life and property and there-
fore hazards must be viewed holistically.

Specifically,  the  SDR  facilitates  U.S.  Government  and  private/academic  activities

to reduce vulnerability to natural and technological hazards through:

• Coordinating  national  research  goals  and  activities  for  federal  research  re-

lated to natural and technological hazards and disasters;

• Identifying and coordinating opportunities for the U.S. Government to coordi-
nate and collaborate with State, local, and foreign governments, international
organizations and private/academic/industry groups;

• Facilitating the identification and assessment of risks;
• Providing  information  to  the  President  and  Congress  to  summarize  relevant

resources and work within SDR agencies;

• Providing information to the Administration and Congress in response to cur-

rent disaster situations;

• Working with public and private sector policy development bodies;
• Promoting disaster reduction practices;
• Facilitating  the  exploitation  of  dual-use  systems  and  fusion  of  classified  and

unclassified data streams and research for disaster reduction applications.

The  membership  and  reach  of  the  SDR  across  the  Federal  Government  is  expan-

sive and includes 25 government organizations:

• Department of Defense

Æ Networks and Information Integration (NII)
Æ United States Army Corps of Engineers

• Department of Energy
• Department of Health and Human Services

Æ Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
Æ National Institutes of Health
Æ United States Public Health Services Commissioned Corps

• Department of Homeland Security

Æ Federal Emergency Management Agency
Æ United States Coast Guard

• Department of Housing and Urban Development
• Department of State

Æ United States Agency for International Development

• Department of the Interior

Æ United States Geological Survey
Æ The Bureau of Land Management

• Department of Transportation
• Environmental Protection Agency
• Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
• National Aeronautics and Space Administration
• National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
• National Guard Bureau
• Department of Commerce

Æ National Institute of Standards and Technology
Æ National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration

• National Reconnaissance Office
• National Science Foundation
• United States Department of Agriculture

Æ United States Forest Service

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

With  such  a  long  list  of  participating  agencies,  and  an  active  membership  base,
the SDR has been a model for interagency coordination. Thus, the SDR was a logical
choice  to  act  as  the  NSTC  oversight  body  for  interagency  activities  on  Windstorm
Impact Reduction.

II. Actions to date

In October 2004, Congress passed the National Windstorm Impact Reduction Act,
which  originated  in  the  House  Science  Committee.  The  bill  called  for  the  establish-
ment of the National Windstorm Impact Reduction Program (NWIRP), with the ob-
jective of achieving ‘‘major measurable reductions in losses of life and property from
windstorms.’’ The legislation tasked OSTP with creating a NSTC Interagency Work-
ing  Group  (IWG)  on  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction.  In  January  2005  the  NWIRP
IWG  was  convened  by  the  NSTC  SDR.  The  legislation  mandated  participation  by
NOAA,  NSF,  NIST,  and  FEMA.  While  those  agencies  have  taken  the  most  active
role in the IWG, other federal entities, such as the Federal Highway Administration,
Department  of  Housing  and  Urban  Development,  National  Aeronautics  and  Space
Administration  and  U.S.  Army  Corps  of  Engineers,  have  also  participated  in  the
program.

The legislation required that an implementation plan for achieving the objectives
of  the  Program  be  submitted  to  Congress.  The  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Imple-
mentation  Plan  was  submitted  to  Congress  on  April  5,  2006  (Attachment  1).  The
plan  outlines  how  NSTC,  in  accordance  with  its  responsibility  to  coordinate  science
and technology across federal agencies, can establish a framework to address multi-
agency  science  and  technology  issues  related  to  windstorm  mitigation.  Specifically,
the plan focuses on identifying research needs that will be an important component
of  long-term  efforts  to  reduce  the  impacts  of  wind  hazards.  The  plan  continues  to
serve  as  a  guide  for  the  IWG  as  it  works  to  improve  coordination  of  existing  wind-
related  research,  and  seeks  to  fill  research  gaps  in  understanding,  predicting,  and
forecasting windstorm hazards.

During  the  formulation  of  the  plan,  the  IWG  reached  well  beyond  the  partici-
pating  federal  agencies  to  State,  county,  and  city  governments,  universities,  and
non-government organizations such as the American Association of Wind Engineers
(AAWE),  the  American  Society  of  Civil  Engineers  (ASCE),  and  the  Institute  for
Building and Home Safety (IBHS) for input. The IWG met several times during the
creation  of  the  implementation  plan  and  several  drafts  were  circulated  throughout
the  participating  agencies.  The  end  product  is  a  useful  and  comprehensive  docu-
ment.

The  legislation  also  required  the  development  of  biennial  updates  to  the  imple-
mentation  plan.  The  first  of  these  updates  was  transmitted  to  Congress  on  Novem-
ber 20, 2007 (Attachment 2). The biennial update covers Fiscal Years 2005 and 2006
and  provides  a  summary  of  wind  hazard  research  activities,  and  progress  toward
agency goals in each of the NWIRP agencies aimed at understanding, predicting and
forecasting wind hazards, assessing and reducing impacts of wind hazards, and pro-
moting  preparedness  and  enhancing  community  resilience.  It  also  identifies  areas
of  research,  compiled  by  the  IWG,  that  address  important  national  wind  hazard
problems  in  the  future.  The  biennial  update  serves  as  an  excellent  resource  for  un-
derstanding each NWIRP agency’s contribution to the program. As stated in a June
23, 2008 letter from Dr. John Marburger III to Chairman Gordon, the next biennial
report will be submitted to Congress in fall 2008 or spring 2009 (Attachment 3).

III. Grand Challenges for Disaster Reduction

As noted above, the IWG on Windstorm Impact Reduction operates under the aus-
pices of the SDR. Given its close link to the SDR, the NWIRP follows the same phil-
osophical  underpinnings  established  in  the  SDR’s  February  2008  report  Grand
Challenges  for  Disaster  Reduction  (Attachment  4).  These  challenges  are  as  follows:
Grand Challenge #1—Provide hazard and disaster information where and when
it is needed
Grand  Challenge  #2—Understand  the  natural  processes  that  produce  hazards
Grand Challenge #3—Develop hazard mitigation strategies and technologies
Grand Challenge #4—Recognize and reduce vulnerability of interdependent crit-
ical infrastructure
Grand Challenge #5—Assess disaster resilience using standard methods
Grand Challenge #6—Promote risk-wise behavior

The  Grand  Challenges  for  Disaster  Reduction  report  was  released  on  February  1,
2008  and  is  a  ten-year  strategy  that  is  focused  on  the  application  of  science  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

technology to enhance community resilience to disasters and create a more disaster-
resilient nation.

To  implement  this  ten-year  strategy,  the  25  federal  departments  and  agencies  of
the SDR worked together to identify specific actions that they, in collaboration with
State  and  local  governments,  as  well  as  individuals  and  institutions  in  the  private
sector,  must  take  in  order  to  meet  the  Grand  Challenges.  The  resulting  framework
of prioritized federal science and technology actions, which is compiled in 14 hazard-
specific  implementation  plans,  can  help  increase  the  Nation’s  disaster  resilience  by
guiding future investments.

Of  the  14  hazard-specific  implementation  plans,  three  are  directly  linked  to  the
IWG  on  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction;  Tornadoes  (Attachment  5),  Hurricanes  (At-
tachment 6) and Winter Storms (Attachment 7). The IWG helped guide the creation
of these plans.

IV. Overview of agency work in the area of wind hazards

The  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Implementation  Plan  described  four  major

themes for wind hazard research:

• Understanding, Predicting, and Forecasting
• Assessing Impacts
• Reducing Impacts
• Preparedness and Enhancing Community Resilience

Agency activities in these four areas are performed in the context of each agency’s
mission and consistent with their research practices. These activities are focused in
several areas: continued improvement in windstorm prediction; local, State, regional
and federal coordinated research response capabilities following wind hazard events,
including field validation and data collection capabilities for buildings, critical infra-
structure  and  essential  facilities;  windstorm  damage  and  loss  estimation  modeling
tools; and standards and technologies that will enable cost-effective, state-of-the-art
windstorm-resistant  provisions  to  be  adopted  as  part  of  State  and  local  building
codes.  The  following  discussion  outlines  ongoing  efforts  to  address  the  need  for  im-
provement in these areas, organized by agency.

National Science Foundation

The  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  supports  unsolicited  research  proposals
related  to  NWIRP  topics  ranging  from  atmospheric  sciences  research  that  is  con-
cerned with the physics of hurricane, tornado, and thunderstorm formation, to engi-
neering programs focused on improving the performance of structures against wind
loads,  to  social  science  programs  devoted  to  societal  preparedness  and  response  to
natural  disasters.  Although  these  proposals  are  selected  through  the  peer  review
process under programs intended to advance research in myriad areas and not just
hurricanes  and  winds,  the  NSF  portfolio  of  projects  have  collectively  made  impor-
tant progress in each of four focus areas defined above.

For  example,  significant  progress  in  documenting  and  analyzing  the  damage
caused  to  civil  infrastructure  by  wind  and  hurricane  driven  storm  surge  was  made
by NSF-supported investigators as a result of awards made immediately after Hur-
ricanes Katrina and Rita. Social science topics under continued investigation include
evaluating preferences for rebuilding plans post-Katrina, assessing public health im-
pacts  of  disasters,  decision-making  in  displaced  populations,  and  examining  factors
associated  with  compliance  to  Katrina  mandatory  hurricane  evacuation  orders  in
seven coastal Louisiana parishes.

NSF funds research that often directly leads to changes in building code revisions
through development of new materials and/or design methodologies. New awards di-
rectly  related  to  design  of  wind-resistant  structures  include  five  that  have  been
made  through  the  Hazard  Mitigation  and  Structural  Engineering  Program  in  the
Engineering Directorate during the past 12 months. One of these, ‘‘Hurricane Wind
Simulation  and  Testing  to  Develop  Damage  Mitigation  Techniques,’’ 2 will  develop
a  cost-effective,  light,  strong,  ductile,  and  non-intrusive  roof-to-wall  connection  sys-
tem  using  high  performance  fiber  composite  materials  to  improve  hurricane  resil-
iency of residential buildings. A second one, ‘‘Performance Based Wind Engineering:
Interaction  of  Hurricanes  with  Residential  Structures,’’ 3 is  expected  to  improve  de-
sign  methods  for  wood  frame  buildings  through  the  use  of  the  performance-based

2 http://www.nsf.gov/awardsearch/showAward.do?AwardNumber=0727871
3 http://www.nsf.gov/awardsearch/showAward.do?AwardNumber=0800023

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

design approach. Research results will be disseminated through the ASCE/SEI com-
mittees in which the Principal Investigator is involved.

Understanding, Predicting and Forecasting

Over the past two years, research in atmospheric sciences has yielded a better un-
derstanding  of  atmospheric  dynamics  of  straight-line  winds  and  improved  knowl-
edge  of  the  fundamental  physics  that  control  hurricane  intensity,  wave  dynamics
during hurricanes, and the impact of externally and internally modulated convection
on  tropical  cyclone  evolution.4 Understanding  the  hazard  risk  associated  with  ex-
treme  hurricane  events  is  also  being  studied.  Detecting  synoptic-scale  precursors  of
tornado outbreaks5 is the objective of one investigation. Another project is studying
tornadic storms with Doppler Polarimetric Radar.6

Assessing the impacts of wind hazards

Shortly  after  Hurricane  Katrina  struck  the  Gulf  States,  29  small  grants  were
awarded  for  reconnaissance  studies  aimed  at  documenting  their  effects  and  pre-
serving highly perishable data. Two of these studies, on the performance of the levee
system,  were  expanded  in  scope  to  include  engineering  analyses  of  failed  sections
of  the  levees  and  proposed  repair  and  replacement  strategies.  Development  of  in-
strumentation  for  the  observational  studies  of  the  effects  of  atmospheric  winds  on
structures  near  the  ground  was  also  undertaken.  Another  of  these  projects  inves-
tigated  large  coastal  bridge  performance  in  a  hurricane  environment.  Collection  of
perishable  data  on  wood-frame  residential  structures  in  the  wake  of  Hurricane
Katrina  was  also  undertaken.  Studies  were  conducted  to  better  understand  the  re-
sponse  of  typical  bridges  to  hurricanes  and  to  assessing  risk  for  long-span  bridges.
The determination of storm surge effects on levees and the simulation of non-linear
water  waves  during  hurricanes  were  the  subjects  of  other  investigations.  In  order
to  better  understand  the  impacts  of  hurricane  disasters,  construction  material  re-
quirements for rebuilding New Orleans are being investigated and documented. Im-
proving  glass  performance  during  wind  storms  and  the  modeling  response  of  tall
buildings  to  straight  line  winds  are  important  for  understanding  the  impacts  to
wind hazards.

Social  science  topics  under  investigation  include  evaluating  preferences  for  re-
building  plans  post-Katrina,  assessing  public  health  impacts  of  disasters,  and  deci-
sion-making in displaced populations. In particular, one project is examining factors
associated  with  compliance  to  Katrina  mandatory  hurricane  evacuation  orders  in
seven coastal Louisiana parishes.

Reducing Impacts of Wind Hazards

Resistance of existing wood roof structures and retrofit schemes is currently being
studied to better understand how best to construct more resistant structures in the
future. This type of damage accounts for a significant portion of the damage caused
by hurricanes and straight line winds each year. In addition, a better understanding
of the impact of hazard events on soils, infrastructure, and the submerged environ-
ment  is  required.  A  project  entitled  ‘‘The  Effect  of  Katrina  on  Submerged
Geotechnical  Systems—Underwater  Evaluation  of  Sediment-Structure-Storm  Inter-
action’’  will  provide  important  data  on  these  important  parts  of  the  urban  infra-
structure.  Another  project  that  is  vital  to  the  energy  supply  is  focusing  on  assess-
ment  of  damage  to  underground  tanks  in  New  Orleans  in  the  aftermath  of  Hurri-
cane  Katrina.  Electric  Utility  Damage  from  Hurricane  Katrina  is  also  under  inves-
tigation.

Preparedness and Enhancing Community Resilience

Instructional  materials  for  K–12  students  are  being  developed  to  enhance  pre-
paredness among children. Also, information technologies are being developed to as-
sist individuals in adapting to evacuation. Social networks are being studied to un-
derstand the role they might play in early warning strategies and subsequent com-
pliance.  Improving  hurricane  intensity  forecasting  is  important  to  increase  societal
compliance  and  evacuation  plans  and  orders,  but  the  public  must  also  be  educated
to understand risk and appropriate behavior to ensure their safety. Two studies are
underway  to  better  understand  and  improve  evacuation  procedures.  Two  projects
have  been  funded  for  analyzing  multi-organizational  networks  and  their  roles  in
hazard  mitigation.  Ten  projects  are  underway  that  are  investigating  various  tools

4 http://www.nsf.gov/awardsearch/showAward.do?AwardNumber=0514199
5 http://www.nsf.gov/awardsearch/showAward.do?AwardNumber=0527934
6 http://www.nsf.gov/awardsearch/showAward.do?AwardNumber=0532107

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

that  might  be  useful  for  building  community  resilience  to  wind  hazards.  One  of
these  projects  is  examining  how  preferences  for  rebuilding  plans  are  being  made
after  Hurricane  Katrina.7 Another  one  is  studying  ‘‘The  Parallel  Strengths  and
Weaknesses of the Civil Society and the State: The Example of Katrina Survivors.’’ 8
‘‘Cyberinfrastructure  Preparedness  for  Emergency  Response  and  Relief:  Learning
the lessons from Hurricane Katrina’’ is the focus of another investigation.9

The majority of NSF support for wind hazard R&D activities is in response to un-
solicited  proposals,  although  some  support  is  provided  through  the  National  Center
for Atmospheric Research (NCAR) and the Engineering Research Center for Collabo-
rative  Adaptive  Sensing  of  the  Atmosphere  (CASA).  NSF  is  also  sponsoring  a  joint
solicitation  with  NOAA  on  Communicating  Hurricane  Information.  NSF  estimates
that $6.7 million will be spent on wind hazard R&D in FY 2008.

National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration

NOAA  activities  and  progress  during  the  past  two  years  can  be  divided  into  six
categories:  1)  development  of  plans;  2)  provision  of  data  of  use  for  wind  hazard  re-
duction;  3)  development  of  decision  support  tools  and  analyses  of  relevance  to  wind
hazards;  4)  understanding  and  predicting  weather  conditions  producing  wind  dam-
age; 5) creation of new facilities for improving our knowledge and prediction of wind
hazards; and 6) education and outreach.

Development of plans

NIST  and  NOAA  jointly  developed  a  cooperative  plan  on  Hazard-Resilient  Com-
munities,  and  are  moving  forward  with  the  storm  surge  component  of  that  plan.
NOAA  is  represented  on  the  U.S.–Japan  Panel  on  Wind  and  Seismic  Effects.  This
panel  encourages  exchange  of  information  between  the  two  countries  and  is  com-
pleting  a  joint  project  on  bridge  stay  flutter.  It  is  also  proposing  a  workshop  to  ex-
change information between wind structural engineers and meteorologists who work
on  wind  issues  to  determine  the  needs  of  and  opportunities  presented  by  the  two
communities  working  closely  together.  The  workshop  is  anticipated  to  occur  within
the next year.

Providing data of use for wind hazard reduction

During FY 2004, several extreme turbulence (ET) probes were developed and suc-
cessfully  tested  in  actual  hurricanes.  These  probes  hold  promise  for  very  high  spa-
tial  and  temporal  resolution  measurements  of  winds  on  the  immediate  exterior  of
structures.  In  cooperation  with  NOAA,  the  Florida  and  South  Carolina  Sea  Grant
deployed  portable  towers  measuring  winds  during  Hurricanes  Charley,  Frances,
Ivan,  Katrina,  and  Rita.  These  data  are  useful  for  ‘‘nowcasts’’  of  the  winds  and  to
duplicate wind tunnel measurements. The Shared Mobile Atmospheric Research and
Teaching Radars (SMART–R), the result of a cooperative effort between the Univer-
sity  of  Oklahoma  and  NOAA,  have  been  used  in  hurricane  landfall  deployments,
and have been upgraded to deliver their data directly to forecast offices in real time.
The stepped frequency microwave radiometer is now deployed on both research and
operation  aircraft  for  much  improved  surface  wind  and  vertical  wind  profiles  over
water  within  hurricanes  and  they  are  now  used  in  NOAA’s  operational  hurricane
model and for real-time hurricane intensity analysis.

Decision support tools and analysis for wind hazards

NOAA  has  been  working  with  the  State  of  Florida  on  a  Public  Hurricane  Loss
Projection Model to develop wind-dependent vulnerability functions for building ret-
rofit guidance. The NOAA hurricane wind (H*WIND) analysis was used to validate
this  model.  A  stochastic  model  is  being  used  to  simulate  55,000  years  of  hurricane
tracks  for  a  wind  demonstration  project,  conducted  with  NIST,  to  test  wind  and
storm surge risk maps in a few selected coastal areas. The U.S. Army Corps of Engi-
neers  and  NOAA  completed  a  post-Hurricane  Katrina,  Charley,  Frances,  Ivan,  and
Jeanne  1-km  resolution  wind  field  analysis  using  the  H*WIND  product  and  data
that were not available in real time. NOAA’s National Hurricane Center introduced
its new experimental wind-speed probability forecast in time for the 2006 hurricane
season to map out several predicted wind-speed thresholds.

7 http://www.nsf.gov/awardsearch/showAward.do?AwardNumber=0554987
8 http://www.nsf.gov/awardsearch/showAward.do?AwardNumber=0555113
9 http://www.nsf.gov/awardsearch/showAward.do?AwardNumber=0638561

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

Understanding and predicting weather conditions producing wind damage

NOAA  continues  to  gather  field  data  on  hurricane  inner  core  dynamics  to  better
understand  intensity  changes.  During  the  past  two  hurricane  seasons,  NOAA,  with
the  Office  of  Naval  Research,  has  been  measuring  the  heat  and  momentum  ex-
change between the atmosphere and ocean within hurricanes to better parameterize
this  exchange  in  hurricane  prediction  models.  Preliminary  testing  of  these  new
parameterizations  in  NOAA’s  operational  hurricane  model  has  improved  hurricane
intensity  predictions.  NOAA  tested  a  new  hurricane  model  during  the  2006  hurri-
cane  season  for  operational  application  next  season.  It  is  coupled  with  an  ocean
model and has a nested and movable grid.

The President’s 2009 Budget includes nearly $20 million for hurricane-related in-
creases  across  NOAA,  including  modeling  improvements  on  forecasts  and  storm
surge and research into ocean vector winds and coastal inundation. The 2009 Budg-
et also includes an increase of $242 million for the GOES–R satellite system, which
is a critical component of NOAA’s hurricane monitoring.

Creating new facilities for improving our knowledge and prediction of wind hazards
The new National Weather Center in Norman, Oklahoma opened its doors during
the  summer  of  2006.  It  consists  of  the  South  Research  Campus  of  the  University
of  Oklahoma,  the  NOAA  Norman  forecast  office,  the  Storm  Prediction  Center,  and
the  National  Severe  Storms  Laboratory.  This  facility  also  features  the  Hazardous
Weather  Testbed,  which  performs  research  and  development  to  improve  prediction
of hazardous winds.

Education and outreach

• NOAA’s Louisiana Sea Grant program has developed fact sheets that include
information  on  building  codes,  where  and  how  to  rebuild,  and  how  to  deter-
mine if a contractor is following State and federal regulations. It has been dis-
tributed  to  parishes  and  is  available  on  the  Internet.  The  program  has  also
sponsored  seminars  on  storm  preparedness  and  has  provided  information  on
building codes and zoning practices.

• NOAA’s  Texas  Sea  Grant  Program  (Texas  A&M)  has  been  evaluating  the

Texas Mitigation Plan, which includes construction codes.

• The  North  Carolina  Sea  Grant  (North  Carolina  State  in  collaboration  with
Oregon  State)  developed  a  break-away  wall  design  for  125-mph  winds  and
1.5-ft  waves,  which  has  been  adopted  by  the  American  Society  of  Civil  Engi-
neers.

• The South Carolina Sea Grant (Clemson) has developed low-cost methods for
reducing  storm  damage,  including  strengthening  roofs  and  shutters  which
have been adopted by a Sun City developer.

• There  is  now  a  ‘‘hazards  house’’  in  Charleston,  SC,  that  helps  educate  the
public  on  hazard-resilient  building  and  retrofitting  techniques,  including
those that mitigate wind effects.

• NOAA  has  prepared  material  for  a  documentary  on  how  to  stay  safe  in  high
winds,  including  how  to  improve  housing  construction  to  resist  damage  and
the  appropriate  design  for  safe  rooms.  The  documentary  will  be  featured  on
the Discovery Channel.

• NOAA  held  its  first  Weather  Partners  open  house  in  Norman,  OK,  for  ap-
proximately 1000 visitors. Wind risk to structures was a prominent theme for
discussion.

• NOAA  organized  a  training  session  at  the  National  Hurricane  Conference  on
hurricanes  and  public  health.  During  the  session,  a  representative  from  the
Institute  of  Building  and  Home  Safety  delivered  a  presentation  on  the  resil-
ience  of  public  health  facilities  against  structural  hazards.  Key  structural
components included window strength, exterior cladding, roof edging, and vul-
nerability  of  roof  type  and  roof  mountings.  The  participants  then  critically
evaluated a simulated hurricane scenario.

National Institute for Standards and Technology

NIST  research  over  the  past  two  years  has  focused  on  gaining  an  understanding
of wind hazards to the built environment and developing predictive technologies and
mitigation strategies to enhance disaster resilience to wind hazards.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

Extreme Wind Databases

To  facilitate  use  of  Automated  Surface  Observing  Station  (ASOS)  wind  data  for
structural engineering purposes, NIST developed procedures and software for (a) ex-
traction of peak gust wind data from archived ASOS weather reports, (b) extraction
of  thunderstorm  observations  from  archived  weather  reports,  (c)  classification  of
wind data as thunderstorm or non-thunderstorm to enable separate statistical anal-
yses  of  these  distinct  types  of  winds,  and  (d)  construction  of  data  sets  separated  by
specified  minimum  time  intervals  to  ensure  statistical  independence.  Estimates
showed  that,  at  these  stations,  thunderstorm  wind  speeds  dominate  the  extreme
wind  climate  to  the  extent  that  non-thunderstorm  wind  speeds  can  be  disregarded
in the analysis. Using such records it is possible to obtain realistic probabilistic de-
scriptions  of  the  wind  climate  at  stations  where  both  types  of  wind  occur.  The  soft-
ware, data, and literature are available at www.nist.gov/wind.

Advanced  Computational  Tools  for  Determining  Realistic  Wind  Loads  in  the  Built

Environment

NIST  has  developed  software  for  analyzing  wind  effects  on  rigid,  gable-roofed
buildings,  and  flexible  high-rise  buildings  using  the  database-assisted  design  meth-
odology.  Database-Assisted  Design  (DAD)  is  a  unified  framework  for  analysis  and
design  of  buildings  for  wind  loads  that  makes  direct  use  of  pressure-time  histories
measured at a large number of pressure taps on wind tunnel models. Local climato-
logical  information  can  be  used  in  conjunction  with  the  measured  pressures  to  ob-
tain  estimates  of  peak  wind  effects  with  specified  return  periods  for  use  in  struc-
tural  design.  DAD  offers  more  accurate  estimation  of  peak  wind  effects  than  sim-
plified  procedures  that  are  now  used,  which  paves  the  way  for  more  risk-consistent
designs. The software, data, and literature are available at www.nist.gov/wind.

Methodologies  for  Predicting  Ultimate  Structural  Capacities  and  Estimating  Safety

Margins

The  design  of  many  low-rise  metal  buildings  in  the  U.S.  is  based  on  the  ASCE
7–93  Standard  and  the  use  of  Allowable  Stress  Design  (ASD).  NIST  used  the  non-
linear database-assisted design technique to assess the degree of safety of a typical
low-rise  portal  frame  industrial  structure  designed  in  accordance  with  ASCE  7–93
and  ASD  as  compared  to  the  provisions  of  the  ASCE  7–02  Standard.  NIST  has
found  that  the  frame  being  considered  satisfies  all  ASCE  7–02  requirements  with
respect  to  wind  loading  but  that  its  safety  level  is  relatively  low  and  could  be  im-
proved substantially at very low cost.

Assessing the Performance of Structures in Wind Disasters

NOAA’s  National  Weather  Service  implemented  the  enhanced  Fujita  Tornado  In-
tensity  Scale  on  an  operational  basis  in  February  2007.  The  enhanced  Fujita  scale
is  based  upon  observations  by  a  NIST  researcher  as  part  of  a  reconnaissance  team
deployed following the 1997 Jarrell, TX tornado and subsequent technical work per-
formed by Texas Tech University with funding and technical oversight by NIST. The
more  realistic  wind  speeds  associated  with  the  enhanced  scale  will  allow  the  use  of
routine  standard  provisions  for  the  safe  design  of  buildings  under  most  tornadoes
occurring in the U.S.

After  Hurricane  Katrina  and  Hurricane  Rita,  NIST  assembled  a  team  of  experts
to  conduct  a  reconnaissance  of  the  status  of  buildings,  physical  infrastructure,  and
residential  structures  in  the  New  Orleans  area,  coastal  Mississippi,  and  Southeast
Texas.  NIST  documented  its  findings  on  the  environmental  conditions  (e.g.,  wind
speeds,  storm  surge  elevations,  and  flooding)  and  on  the  performance  of  structures
in  the  study  areas  in  its  final  report  issued  in  June  2006.  The  report  includes  23
recommendations  in  three  groups:  1)  immediate  impact  on  practice  for  rebuilding,
2)  standards,  codes,  and  practices,  and  3)  further  study  of  specific  structures  or  re-
search and development.

Technical Basis for Improved Codes and Standards

Estimates  of  the  World  Trade  Center  (WTC)  towers’  response  to  wind  by  two
North  American  wind  engineering  laboratories  differed  from  each  other  by  almost
50  percent.  A  NIST  investigation  indicated  that  those  differences  reflected  discrep-
ancies between the respective estimates of the wind speeds and the respective mod-
eling  of  directional  interaction  between  wind  speeds  and  aerodynamic/dynamic  re-
sponse of the building. NIST analyzed the role of risk-consistent probabilistic defini-
tions  of  peak  wind  effects  in  developing  safety  margins  for  inclusion  in  codes  and
standards.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

U.S.–Japan Panel on Wind and Seismic Effects

NIST  chairs  the  U.S.–Japan  Joint  Panel  on  Wind  and  Seismic  Effects  and  NIST
staff actively participates in the Panel and its wind engineering task committee. The
Panel provides an effective mechanism for the exchange of technical data and infor-
mation, the exchange of researchers, and the coordination of joint research on topics
of mutual interest to the U.S. and Japan.

Wind-related Storm Surge

Hurricane Katrina demonstrated that (1) hurricane storm surge can substantially
exceed  heights  defined  by  existing  flood  hazard  maps,  and  (2)  there  is  a  lack  of  a
methodology  for  assessing  the  risk  associated  with  different  joint  hurricane  wind
speed/surge  height  events  that  can  be  used  for  establishing  risk-consistent  design
criteria for structures in coastal regions exposed to the combined effects of hurricane
wind  and  storm  surge.  Such  methodology  must  take  into  consideration  the  effects
of  local  topography  and  bathymetry,  on  which  storm  surge  at  any  specific  location
is highly dependent, as well as hurricane parameters such as track, forward speed,
wind  speed,  and  central  pressure.  NIST/BFRL  is  working  in  collaboration  with
NOAA’s  National  Weather  Service,  Office  of  Atmospheric  Research  and  National
Hurricane Center, and the University of Florida, to develop this methodology. NIST
and  NOAA  have  developed  the  basic  methodology  using  the  Florida  Public  Hurri-
cane Loss Model and demonstrated the methodology for a small number of stations
in  the  Tampa  Bay  area.  The  objective  of  this  work  is  to  develop  this  methodology
such  that  it  can  be  used  to  estimate  the  joint  probability  for  wind  and  storm  surge
events  (including  wave  action)  along  the  U.S.  coastline  and  provide  the  technical
basis for improving the hazard criteria used for application of flood resistant design
provisions.

Federal Emergency Management Agency

FEMA  supports  a  variety  of  NWIRP-related  activities  including  risk  assessment,
windstorm-related data collection and analysis, mitigation promotion and public out-
reach, and hurricane program coordination.

Risk Assessment

FEMA developed HAZUS–MH, a risk assessment program that analyzes potential
losses from floods, hurricane winds and earthquakes. HAZUS–MH combines current
scientific and engineering knowledge with the latest GIS technology to produce haz-
ard-related  damage  estimates  before  or  after  a  hazard  event.  The  current  version
of  the  software  program—HAZUS–MH  MR2—allows  communities  to  access  a  risk
assessment tool that can serve as a basis for mitigation planning and policy develop-
ment, emergency preparedness, and emergency response and recovery exercises.

Data Collection and Analysis

After  major  natural  hazard  events,  a  Mitigation  Assessment  Team—or  MAT—
study  may  be  conducted  to  perform  engineering  analyses,  assesses  damage,  deter-
mine the causes of structural failures and successes, and prepare recommendations
regarding construction codes and best practices. Communities and construction pro-
fessionals,  in  turn,  use  MAT  information  and  recommendations  to  plan  for,  and  re-
duce  damages  from,  future  events.  A  telling  MAT  conclusion  following  Hurricane
Katrina: buildings that experienced substantial structural damage from Katrina typi-
cally were built before building design and construction professionals adequately con-
sidered wind effects.

Promoting Mitigation—Education and Public Outreach

To  educate  communities  about  mitigation  and  the  steps  they  can  take  to  reduce
their  vulnerabilities  to  natural  hazard  events,  FEMA  and  the  MAT  continue  to  de-
velop  first-of-its-kind  construction  advice  guidance.  Widely  disseminated,  FEMA’s
mitigation  guidance  provides  Gulf  coast  residents  with  engineering  recommenda-
tions and foundation solutions for rebuilding; many of which are being incorporated
into local reconstruction efforts. Additionally, the MAT publication FEMA 550 Resi-
dential  Construction  for  the  Gulf  Coast:  Building  on  Strong  and  Safe  Foundations
provides homeowners, builders, and design professionals with prescriptive, pre-engi-
neered  foundation  solutions,  cost  information,  and  guidance  on  choosing  and  build-
ing disaster-resistant foundations.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

Hurricane Program Coordination

FEMA  and  NOAA  work  together  to  improve  the  Nation’s  hurricane  evacuation
planning. NOAA research produces improved hurricane intensity predictions which,
in  turn,  help  FEMA  and  emergency  managers  across  all  governmental  levels  with
critical  planning,  evacuation,  response,  and  recovery  decisions.  Since  2004,  despite
resource  and  funding  limitations,  the  NWIRP  partnership  has  collaborated  to:  en-
hance  knowledge  and  information  on  severe  winds;  investigate  the  wind  resistance
of buildings and structures; develop improved tools for assessing wind hazard losses;
improve  public  awareness  of  wind  hazards  and  related  mitigation;  and  enhance
wind hazard-related evacuation planning and guidance.

While not specifically identified as NWIRP funding, FEMA’s FY 2004–2008 budg-
ets  have  funding  in  the  Mitigation  Directorate,  Risk  Reduction  Division  that  has
been  characterized  as  meeting  the  basic  goals  of  the  NWIRP.  The  funding  level  for
FY  2004–FY  2008  was  between  $200–$350K  per  year  for  a  total  of  approximately
$1.5  million.  In  FY  2009  FEMA  anticipates  $200–$250K  of  funding.  Specific  areas
of activity include:

• FEMA  support  for  wind-resistant  national  Model  Building  Codes  and  Con-

sensus Standards;

• FEMA  support  for  the  development  of  national  Wind  Shelter  guidance  and

standards; and ongoing support for hurricane evacuation studies

Federal Highway Administration
Understanding, Predicting and Forecasting Wind Hazards

The FHWA Office of Infrastructure R&D continuously monitors winds at the sites
of three major long-span, cable-supported bridges to establish and characterize site-
specific  wind  conditions  and  the  responses  of  the  bridges.  All  sites  are  relatively
near  the  coastline  with  one  in  Louisiana,  another  in  Delaware,  and  the  third  in
Maine.  A  new  site  will  be  added  monitoring  the  Bill  Emerson  Bridge  at  Cape
Girardeau, Missouri. The engineering data collected at these sites provides valuable
input into design of new structures.

Assessing the Impact of Wind Hazards

The FHWA Office of Infrastructure R&D has continuously monitored the wind en-
vironment  and  detailed  response  of  three  major  long-span,  cable-supported  bridge
structures  to  evaluate  their  wind  performance  and  wind  resistance  with  one  more
site being added in 2008. The Computational Fluid Dynamics (CFD) model UABRIM
is  being  enhanced  by  implementation  of  unstructured  and  adaptive  grids  for  use  in
simulating the interaction between wind and structures such as large bridges. Tests
have  been  completed  in  the  FHWA’s  small  wind  tunnel  at  the  Turner  Fairbank
Highway  Research  Center  using  evolving  Particle  Image  Velocimetry  (PIV)  tech-
nology  to  study  wind  flow  fields  around  and  compute  wind  forces  on  several  rep-
resentative  bridge  deck  sections.  This  small  wind  tunnel  has  been  automated  for
more efficient operation.

The  FHWA  Office  of  Operations  continued  activities  under  the  Road  Weather
Management  Program,  which  seeks  to  develop  and  promote  effective  tools  for  ob-
serving  and  predicting  the  impacts  of  weather  on  the  roads,  and  to  alleviate  these
weather impacts. As part of the program, the Clarus Initiative has continued to con-
duct  activities  to  develop  and  demonstrate  an  integrated  surface  transportation
weather  observing,  forecasting  and  data  management  system,  and  to  establish  a
partnership  to  create  a  Nationwide  Surface  Transportation  Weather  Observing  and
Forecasting  System.  The  Initiative  Coordinating  Committee  (ICC)  held  its  annual
meeting in August 2008. Phase 3 of the Clarus Regional Demonstration will be initi-
ated  shortly  show-casing  how  road  and  weather  observations  from  the  Clarus  Sys-
tem  can  be  used  to  develop  and  deploy  more  advanced  road  weather  management
solutions for transportation operations.

Reducing the Impact of Wind Hazards

The FHWA Office of Infrastructure R&D continues to conduct research to prepare
a  synthesis  report  on  Wind  Load  Criteria  for  Cable  Supported  Structures.  Com-
plementary  research  has  also  been  initiated  to  prepare  a  synthesis  report  on  User
Comfort  and  Serviceability  Criteria  for  Wind  Loading.  Research  has  continued  on
the  study  of  wind-  and  wind/rain-induced  vibration  of  bridge  stay  cables  a  major
issue for bridge owners. A second version of the guidelines document has been devel-
oped for the aerodynamic design of bridge stay cables.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

Preparedness and Enhancing Community Resilience

The FHWA Office of Infrastructure R&D, together with the Missouri Department
of Transportation, organized and held the 2nd National Workshop on Wind-Induced
Vibration  of  Cable-Stayed  Bridges  in  April  2006.  This  workshop  served  to  dissemi-
nate  the  latest  information  on  the  mitigation  of  wind-induced  vibrations  to  State
bridge  engineers  and  design  consultants.  FHWA  has  been  participating  in  inter-
national  conferences  such  as  the  7th  International  Symposium  on  Cable  Dynamics
in Vienna Austria in 2007, and the 7th Colloquium on Bluff Body Aerodynamic and
Application  in  2008  in  Milan,  Italy  to  transfer  to  research  knowledge.  Further,
FHWA  continues  to  assist  State  DOTs  to  solve  wind  and  wind  induced  issues  as
they arise.

V. Conclusion

Measurably reducing losses of life and property from windstorms, including hurri-
canes,  tornadoes,  and  seasonal  storms,  remains  a  high  priority.  As  pointed  out  by
the  variety  of  reports  available  on  the  subject,  such  reduction  will  be  predicated  on
improving  the  ability  to  predict  the  occurrence,  location,  and  magnitude  of  wind-
storms with sufficient accuracy to allow the public and emergency managers to take
appropriate  measures  and  to  increase  the  resiliency  of  our  communities  by  con-
structing  wind  resistant  buildings,  highways,  and  other  key  portions  of  infrastruc-
ture.  The  federal  agencies  support  robust  research  programs  in  these  areas,  and
have  made  significant  progress  in  making  the  results  of  this  research  more  widely
available.  The  benefits  of  this  improved  understanding  will  not  be  fully  realized,
however, until it is incorporated more completely into actions at the State and local
level, both through building codes, design standards, and construction practices.

The  importance  of  developing  resilient  communities  will  likely  be  further  under-
scored as the Earth’s changing climate will likely make historic trends in storm fre-
quency  and  intensity  a  less  reliable  predictor  of  future  conditions.  Adaptation  to  a
warming  climate  and  accompanying  changes  in  the  nature  of  wind-related  hazards
will create a greater impetus for federal efforts to understand and predict wind haz-
ards  on  a  time  scale  longer  than  the  typical  weather  forecasts  available  today,  so
that  knowledge  can  inform  the  construction  of  buildings,  bridges,  and  other  compo-
nents  of  the  physical  infrastructure  intended  to  function  safely  for  the  next  30  to
50 years.

The  NWIRP  partnership  must  keep  working  with  other  federal  agencies,  State
and  local  governments,  academia,  and  the  private  sector  to  help  our  nation’s  com-
munities  understand  and  plan  for  their  risks  and  take  steps  to  reduce  them  and
must  find  ways  to  address  critical  NWIRP  issues  in  an  environment  of  limited  re-
sources.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment 1

25

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment 2

55

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment 3

78

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment 4

81

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

95

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

96

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

97

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

98

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

99

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

100

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

101

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

102

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

103

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

104

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

105

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

106

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

107

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment 5

108

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

109

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

110

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

111

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

112

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment 6

113

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

114

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

115

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

116

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment 7

117

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

118

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

119

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

120

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

121

BIOGRAPHY FOR SHARON L. HAYS

Dr. Sharon L. Hays was confirmed by the Senate as Associate Director of the Of-
fice  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  (OSTP)  in  the  Executive  Office  of  the  Presi-
dent in late September, 2006. In this role, she serves as the OSTP Director’s Deputy
for  Science.  Dr.  Hays  has  been  at  OSTP  since  mid-2002,  serving  first  in  OSTP’s
Technology Division, and later as the Chief of Staff.

Before  coming  to  OSTP,  Dr.  Hays  was  the  Staff  Director  of  the  Subcommittee  on
Research  of  the  U.S.  House  of  Representatives’  Committee  on  Science  from  the  be-
ginning  of  the  107th  Congress  until  August  2002.  Prior  to  her  promotion  to  Staff
Director,  Dr.  Hays  worked  as  a  professional  staff  member,  first  for  the  Basic  Re-
search  Subcommittee  and  subsequently  for  the  Subcommittee  on  Space  and  Aero-
nautics. She first joined the Science Committee’s staff in mid-1999.

Dr. Hays served as an American Association for the Advancement of Science Con-
gressional  Science  Fellow  in  the  office  of  Representative  Vernon  Ehlers  between
1997  and  1999.  She  worked  on  a  Science  Committee  project  assigned  to  Dr.  Ehlers
by then-Speaker Newt Gingrich and former Science Committee Chairman F. James
Sensenbrenner:  to  outline  an  updated  science  policy  for  the  Nation.  That  effort  cul-
minated  in  a  comprehensive  Science  Committee  report  entitled  Unlocking  Our  Fu-
ture: Toward a New National Science Policy.

Before  coming  to  Capitol  Hill,  Dr.  Hays  worked  as  a  research  assistant  at  the
University  of  Southern  California  and  then  attended  graduate  school  in  bio-
chemistry at Stanford University, where she studied in the laboratory of Nobel Lau-
reate  Paul  Berg  and  received  her  Ph.D.  in  1997.  Dr.  Hays  also  holds  a  B.A.  in  Mo-
lecular Biology from the University of California, Berkeley.

Dr. Hays lives with her husband in Virginia, where she volunteers as a dog han-

dler for wilderness search and rescue efforts.

Chairman WU. Thank you, Dr. Hays. Dr. Levitan, please proceed.

STATEMENT OF DR. MARC L. LEVITAN, DIRECTOR, LOUISIANA
STATE UNIVERSITY HURRICANE CENTER; CHARLES P. SIESS,
JR.  ASSOCIATE  PROFESSOR,  DEPARTMENT  OF  CIVIL  AND
ENVIRONMENTAL  ENGINEERING,  LOUISIANA  STATE  UNI-
VERSITY
Dr.  LEVITAN.  Good  morning.  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the
Subcommittee,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  discuss  with  you
today the impacts of windstorms.

I was asked to provide some input on several questions address-
ing  the  vulnerability  of  the  built  environment,  and  how  that  is
changing  research  needs  and  windstorm  hazard  mitigation,  rec-
ommended  changes  in  the  wind  program,  and  technology  transfer
challenges.

And  as  mentioned  in  the  opening  statements,  this  year  has  al-
ready  proven  to  be  one  of  the  deadliest  tornado  seasons  in  recent
years. Certainly, our hurricane experience, as we have seen in just
the past few years, seven of the 13 costliest hurricanes in U.S. his-
tory have occurred in just the past few years, and that trend is con-
tinuing as the population continues to move to coastal areas, as in-
creasing  urbanization  occurs,  and  so,  those  trends,  at  the  moment,
while there is some positive development going on, those trends for
increased damage are, unfortunately, continuing.

In terms of research needs, I point out, I think what are several
key  opportunities  for  making  step  change  improvements,  in  terms
of some of the longer-term activities. Understanding the wind envi-
ronment  of  land-falling  hurricanes,  as  we  have  Hurricane  Dolly
today making landfall in Texas. Some of my colleagues from Texas
Tech University are out with instruments, similar to those pictured
on the slide, making measurements of windstorms. We really don’t
understand what happens in the wind environment down near the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

122

ground  level  when  the  storms  make  landfall,  and  that  is  obviously
where  it  affects  buildings  and  bridges  and  people  and  things.  So,
that is where we need to understand that.

Computational wind engineering is an area that needs study that
provides  the  idea  that  you  ultimately  could  get  a  wind  tunnel  on
your  desktop,  a  virtual  wind  tunnel,  where  you  can  use  new  tech-
nology  to  study  the  effects  of  the  wind  for,  in  the  design  sense,  on
the  building,  without  having  to  do  the  complexities  of  wind  tunnel
testing, or the simplifications required by codes.

Windstorm  damage  using  remote  sensing.  In  the  last  few  years,
as remote sensing capabilities have been improved, or commercially
available,  where  you  can  very  clearly  see  individual  buildings,  and
the  roof,  et  cetera.  That  provides  enough  level  information  where
we  could  potentially  get  very  rapid  and  automated  damage  assess-
ments over large scales when we have these major disasters.

Performance-based  design  for  windstorms—that  is  a  technology
in  its  infancy  where  building  owners  and  architects  and  engineers
would  sit  down  at  the  beginning  of  a  project,  and  say  what  is  the
specific  performance  objectives  for  a  building,  and  how  would  I
reach  that.  So,  if  I  wanted  a  building  that  had  no  damage  at  all
in a Category 3 hurricane, and on a Category 4 or 5, you could sus-
tain  some  damage,  but  still  be  operable  or  reparable,  the  idea  is
you would set the design criteria so you would have a specific per-
formance in mind for various objectives, and that technology is just
in its infancy.

And  finally,  retrofit  technologies  for  the  existing  building,  since
that,  we  have—old  building  code  changes,  and  advances  in  the
technology  for  new  construction  are  wonderful,  but  we  have  so
much  investment  in  our  existing  infrastructure,  so  significant
changes are needed there.

In terms of the research priorities, there is a large existing body
of  knowledge,  and  it  has  yet  to,  much  of  it  has  not  been  incor-
porated  into  building  codes  and  standards,  and  so  the  initial
prioritization,  I  believe,  should  be  to  focus  in  the  first  few  years
more on applied research and tech transfer for the work that is al-
ready out there, and then transitioning into more, funding later on
into more of the basic research ideas that I just mentioned.

In  terms  of  the  changes  to  the  wind  program,  I  think  it  would
be appropriate for NIST to become the lead agency. They have par-
allels  to  the  National  Earthquake  Hazard  Reduction  Program,
which they are leading, and significant expertise and experience in
windstorm  mitigation.  And  certainly,  to  finally  form  the  inter-
agency  working  group,  and  in  terms  of  funding  authorizations  lev-
els,  to  at  least  keep  those  consistent  with  the  authorization  levels
in the existing program.

In  terms  of  the  technology  transfer  challenges,  several  of  these
are to use the existing research to develop new methods for assess-
ment  and  design  of  buildings.  The  next  two  highlighted  in  red
there,  incorporating  research  into  building  codes  and  standards,
and  developing  design  guides  and  software  tools.  Those,  I  think,
are  the  real  opportunities  for  very  rapid  improvements  right  now,
with a small investment in technology transfer, to use the existing
research to improve the building codes very quickly.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

123

Developing  textbooks  and  curricular  material  for  instructors,  in-
corporating  wind  mitigation  into  curricula.  So,  some  of  these  chal-
lenges on this slide indicate some that are not particularly, only de-
pendent  on  funding,  but  they  have  several  other  criteria,  in  terms
of  education  and  training  of  construction  and  tradespeople,  adop-
tion  and  enforcement  of  codes  is  a  critical  challenge.  It  is  only,
again, partly dependent on funding. And then, education and train-
ing in a broader sense are critical for the public.

So,  with  the  closing  remarks,  I  would  just  say  that  the  wind-
storm impacts on the U.S. are continuing to increase, and the Wind
Program  is  really  the  best  opportunity  to  provide  a  change  in  that
trend,  and  really  has  the  opportunity  to  provide  a  step  change  in-
crease  in  the  hazard  mitigation  opportunities,  and  really,  the  co-
ordination  activities  between  the  various  efforts  that  are  even  un-
derway,  are  really  a  way  to  multiply  the  effectiveness  of  the  exist-
ing  and  new  activities.  So,  reauthorization,  I  think,  is  a  critical
step forward.
Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Levitan follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARC L. LEVITAN

1. Introduction

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, my name is Marc Levitan and
I appreciate the opportunity to address you this morning. I am Director of the Lou-
isiana  State  University  Hurricane  Center  and  the  Charles  P.  Siess,  Jr.  Associate
Professor  of  Civil  and  Environmental  Engineering  at  Louisiana  State  University.  I
am  also  the  immediate  past-President  of  the  American  Association  for  Wind  Engi-
neering (AAWE), and a member of the American Society of Civil Engineers (ASCE).
I am appearing today on behalf of the Louisiana State University Hurricane Center,
AAWE, and ASCE.

Louisiana State University is the flagship institution of the state, classified by the
Carnegie  Foundation  as  a  Doctoral/Research-Extensive  University.  The  university
has  a  long  history  of  research  in  hurricanes,  coastal  sciences  and  engineering.  The
LSU  Hurricane  Center  was  founded  and  approved  by  the  Louisiana  Board  of  Re-
gents  in  the  year  2000  to  provide  a  focal  point  for  this  work,  with  a  mission  to  ad-
vance  the  state-of-knowledge  of  hurricanes  and  their  impacts  on  the  natural,  built
and  human  environments,  to  stimulate  interdisciplinary  and  collaborative  research
activities,  to  transfer  new  knowledge  and  technology  to  students  and  professionals
in  concerned  disciplines,  and  to  assist  the  state,  the  Nation,  and  world  in  solving
hurricane-related  problems.  The  study  of  wind  effects  on  the  built  infrastructure
and  wind  damage  mitigation  is  one  of  the  main  focus  areas  of  the  LSU  Hurricane
Center,  including:  wind  tunnel  studies  for  wind  effects  on  buildings,  industrial
structures  and  bridges;  techniques  for  hurricane  and  tornado  shelter  assessment;
evacuation  and  sheltering  decision  support  tools;  wind  damage  investigations;  and
participation in development of national wind loading codes and standards.

The  American  Association  for  Wind  Engineering  (AAWE)  was  originally  estab-
lished  as  the  Wind  Engineering  Research  Council  in  1966  to  promote  and  dissemi-
nate  technical  information  in  the  research  community.  In  1983  the  name  was
changed  to  American  Association  for  Wind  Engineering  and  incorporated  as  a  non-
profit  professional  organization.  The  multi-disciplinary  field  of  wind  engineering
considers problems related to wind and associated water loads and penetrations for
buildings  and  structures,  societal  impact  of  winds,  hurricane  and  tornado  risk  as-
sessment, cost-benefit analysis, codes and standards, dispersion of urban and indus-
trial pollution, wind energy and urban aerodynamics.

The American Society of Civil Engineers ASCE, founded in 1852, is the country’s
oldest  national  civil  engineering  organization  representing  more  than  140,000  civil
engineers  in  private  practice,  government,  industry  and  academia  dedicated  to  the
advancement of the science and profession of civil engineering. ASCE is a 501(c) (3)
non-profit  educational  and  professional  society.  ASCE  is  an  American  National
Standards Institute (ANSI)-approved standards developer and publisher of the Min-
imum  Design  Loads  for  Buildings  and  other  Structures  (ASCE–7),  which  is  ref-
erenced  in  the  Nation’s  major  model  building  codes.  As  part  of  the  ASCE–7  docu-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

124

ment,  engineers  are  provided  guidance  in  estimating  the  loads  resulting  from  wind
effects  on  structures.  Thus,  ASCE  is  at  the  forefront  in  the  development  of  new  in-
formation  for  engineers  regarding  wind  and  is  in  a  unique  position  to  comment  on
the status quo and our needs for the future.

2.  Vulnerability  of  U.S.  Built  Environment—and  its  Occupants—to  Wind-

storm Hazards

As well documented in recent years, the damage and destruction caused by wind-
storms  in  the  U.S.  has  continued  to  rise  dramatically.  According  to  the  National
Oceanographic and Atmospheric Administration, 2008 could be a record setting year
for tornado deaths.

This  year  may  set  records  for  tornadoes  and  tornado-related  deaths. . ..  ‘‘It  is
only  the  third  time  since  the  1974  super  tornado  outbreak  that  there  have  been
more  than  100  tornado-related  deaths  during  a  single  tornado  season  in  the
U.S.,’’ added Harold Brooks, a research meteorologist at NOAA’s National Severe
Storms  Laboratory  also  in  Norman.  ‘‘In  1998  and  1984  there  were  132  and  122
tornado-related  deaths,  respectively—2008  will  likely  equal  or  exceed  that
record.’’ (NOAA, 2008).

In  just  the  past  few  years,  the  country  has  experienced  an  unprecedented  level

of damage due to landfalling hurricanes.

It is of note that the 2004 and 2005 hurricane seasons produced seven out of the
nine costliest systems ever to affect the United States. (Blake et al., 2007).

The  combined  cost  of  those  seven  storms  was  approximately  $160  Billion  dollars.
Even after adjusting for inflation, the 2004–2005 hurricane seasons account for four
of the top five costliest hurricanes in history.

The  trends  for  rising  damage  are  due  in  part  to  increasing  population,  urbaniza-
tion, movement of population to areas more prone to severe windstorms, and cyclical
trends  in  storm  activity  levels.  While  recent  investigations  have  shown  that  build-
ings  designed  and  constructed  in  accordance  with  the  latest  building  codes  and
standards perform much better than earlier buildings in extreme winds (e.g., Gurley
et  al.,  2006;  Building  Code  Compliance  Office,  2006),  they  still  experienced  signifi-
cant  damage  from  wind  and  wind-driven  rain.  Furthermore,  since  adoption  of  new
building  codes  only  impacts  future  new  construction  and  major  renovations—it  will
take decades before the majority of buildings in the U.S. would even get this benefit,
and that assumes much more widespread education of design professionals in wind-
storm  hazard  mitigation  and  more  widespread  adoption  and  enforcement  of  the
lastest  codes  and  standards.  Without  significant  improvements  in  technologies  and
products  for  retrofitting  existing  buildings,  the  windstorm  vulnerability  of  the  ma-
jority of the current building inventory will remain static.

3. Research Needed to Facilitate Wind Damage Mitigation
Basic  and  Applied  Research  Needed  to  Facilitate  Mitigation  for  New  and  Existing

Buildings

A number of recent publications have discussed big picture research needs related
to windstorm hazard mitigation. Rather than revisiting those topics, this section will
focus on discussion of several of the most important specific research questions and
opportunities, those that have the potential to ultimately provide a significantly ad-
vance in windstorm hazard mitigation.

Wind  Environment  of  Landfalling  Hurricanes:  Comparatively  little  is  known
about wind transitions from water to land and the mechanisms which cause lo-
calized  higher  intensity  winds.  Developing  a  greater  understanding  of  these
phenomena  will  lead  to  better  estimates  of  maximum  hurricane  wind  speeds,
velocity profiles, and turbulence characteristics needed for building design.
Computational Wind Engineering: This technology offers the promise of a ‘wind
tunnel  on  a  computer,’  where  details  of  a  building  and  surrounding  structures
and terrain could all be modeled in a computational environment to provide in-
formation  on  wind  loads  and,  when  coupled  with  structural  analysis  programs,
the response of the structure to different wind conditions.
Windstorm  Damage  Assessment  Using  Remote  Sensing:  This  technology  could
potentially  provide  rapid  and  consistent  damage  estimates  over  entire  wind-
storm  impacted  areas,  with  applications  to  rapid  response  and  recovery  oper-
ations, building performance observations, and validation data for damage mod-
els.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

125

Performance-Based  Design  for  Windstorm  Hazards:  Current  wind  load  design
procedures  are  somewhat  prescriptive  in  that  the  building  performance  objec-
tives  are  not  clearly  defined.  The  next  generation  of  procedures  is  for  a  facility
owner to identify what performance level (e.g., no damage and building is fully
operational, significant damage requiring evacuation of the building but repair-
able) is desired for different probability windstorm events and designing the fa-
cility accordingly.
Retrofit  Technologies  for  Wind  Resistance:  Although  it  is  much  easier  to  build
wind resistance into new construction, the country has an enormous investment
in  existing  building  stock.  Technologies  for  cost-effective  retrofits  to  improve
windstorm  resistance  of  these  buildings  should  be  an  important  focus  of  any
new research program.

Balance Between Long-Term and Short-Term Priorities

The  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program  Act  of  2004  (P.L.  108–360)

identifies three primary program components:

1. Understanding of Windstorms
2. Windstorm Impact Assessment
3. Windstorm Impact Reduction

In  principle,  the  short-term  priorities  should  be  those  activities  that  have  the
quickest  payoff  and  are  the  most  cost  effective.  There  is  a  large  body  of  research
findings available right now that has not yet been translated into practical applica-
tions.  The  very  applied  research  and  technology  transfer  activities  that  primarily
support the third program component of Windstorm Impact Reduction should there-
fore  be  given  the  highest  initial  priority.  Section  5  of  this  Statement  summarizes
the  main  tasks  required  for  technology  transfer.  Tasks  2  and  3  in  that  section
(translation  of  research  into  improved  codes  and  standards  and  design  tools)  will
provide  the  most  immediate  returns  and  should  have  the  highest  initial  priority.
The  more  basic  research  activities,  such  as  those  discussed  in  the  previous  section,
will  really  advance  the  state  of  knowledge  and  should  be  the  focus  of  longer-term
priorities.  They  should  not  be  ignored  from  the  start,  but  rather  begun  at  a  com-
paratively lower level and then ramped up over time.

Private Industry Research

The  fragmented  nature  of  the  entire  built  infrastructure  design  and  construction
industry  effectively  precludes  any  industry-funded  basic  research,  as  opposed  to  in-
dustries  like  electronics,  aircraft  or  automobile  manufacturing  that  are  dominated
by a small number of global-scale corporations that must make significant basic and
applied research investments to remain competitive. The modest amount of industry
funding  applied  to  wind  hazard  mitigation  has  been  very  applied  in  nature.  It  has
created important new products and services and helped transform a few industries,
but  these  changes  generally  occurred  only  when  driven  by  advances  in  building
codes and standards.

Private industry research in wind hazard mitigation has primarily taken place in
the arena of product-oriented research and development, particularly in the area of
products to protect building openings from windborne debris. Building code changes
in Florida after Hurricane Andrew created a new market, initiating development of
products to meet the impact testing requirements of that code. The most notable ef-
fect was the introduction of many new types of impact resistant windows, shutters,
and  screens.  Significant  product-oriented  research  and  development  has  also  taken
place  for  wind  and  debris  impact  resistant  doors,  garage  doors,  wall  systems,  roof
systems,  and  wall  and  roof  anchoring  and  bracing  systems.  The  market  for  all  of
these  products  has  continued  to  expand  in  recent  years,  as  more  coastal  areas  in
other states have begun to adopt and (to a lesser extent) enforce building codes that
require higher wind loads and in some cases, debris impact protection.

Following  several  devastating  tornadoes  in  the  Midwest  U.S.  in  the  late  1990’s
and  the  well-publicized  devastation  caused  by  the  Oklahoma  City  Tornado  in  May
1999, the Federal Emergency Management Agency published two milestone reports
that  provided  guidance  for  design  and  construction  of  residential  and  community
storm  shelters  (FEMA,  1999;  FEMA,  2000).  These  documents,  along  with  the  Na-
tional Storm Shelter Association’s publication of an industry standard (NSSA, 2001),
helped  spur  a  significant  product-oriented  research  and  development  for  tornado
shelters and helped create a market for products designed and tested to meet these
technical criteria, which provided a major step forward for the fledgling storm shel-
ter industry.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00129 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

126

Private industry has also made significant advances in a few other areas as well,
including:  wind  hazard,  vulnerability,  and  risk  assessment;  wind  loss  estimation
techniques, and wind tunnel testing.

4. National Windstorm Impact Reduction Program Implementation
Implementation and Funding of NWIRP

The  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program  (NWIRP)  was  created
through  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program  Act  of  2004  (P.L.  108–
360).  The  objective  of  the  NWIRP  is  to  achieve  measurable  reductions  in  losses  of
life and property due to windstorms. The objective is to be reached through a coordi-
nated, federally-led effort to first, assess and prioritize research, technology transfer,
and  education  needs,  and  second,  to  conduct  wind  hazard  mitigation  activities  in
context of the overall objectives of the Program.

Unfortunately, funding for the NWIRP was never appropriated, so little has been
achieved  towards  meeting  the  program  objectives.  The  federal  agencies  involved  in
the  program  (NSF,  FEMA,  NIST,  and  NOAA)  report  that  they  have  undertaken  a
modest  level  of  activities  in  areas  related  to  or  consistent  with  the  aims  of  the
NWIRP.  However,  given  funding  constraints,  the  overarching  planning  and  coordi-
nation  activities  are  still  missing  and  the  agencies  have  not  been  able  to  signifi-
cantly increase their level of wind hazard mitigation activities as authorized by the
NWIRP.

Recommended Changes to NWIRP Legislation

As  coordination  of  NWIRP  activities  is  critical  to  maximizing  the  effectiveness  of
the  existing  and  proposed  wind  hazard  mitigation  efforts,  the  National  Institute
of Standards and Technology (NIST) should be designated as the lead agen-
cy. The NWIRP has strong parallels to the successful National Earthquake Hazards
Reduction  Program  (NEHRP),  for  which  NIST  is  the  lead  agency.  Additionally,  the
topic area and the required mix of basic and applied research and technology trans-
fer activities makes NIST the logical choice. They have significant expertise and ex-
perience  in  wind  engineering  research  and  technology  transfer  and  research  pro-
gram management.

The continued escalation of loss of life and property due to windstorms, with sev-
eral  records  being  set  in  just  the  2004–2008  time  period,  highlights  that  NWIRP  is
needed now more than ever. Authorized funding levels for the first year of the
Program should therefore be at least consistent with the currently author-
ized amounts. Funding should ramp up significantly in the following years,
as  initial  planning  and  prioritization  activities  are  completed  and  funding  of  wind
hazard mitigation project activities can most effectively expand.

5.  Challenges  of  Transferring  Research  Results  from  the  Laboratory  into

Practice

The  challenges  of  transferring  windstorm  damage  mitigation  findings  are  numer-
ous,  but  many  can  be  addressed  comparatively  easily  if  adequate  funding  is  pro-
vided. Others include tough hurdles unrelated to financial resources. The main tech-
nology transfer tasks are summarized in the following list.

1. Using  basic  research  findings  to  create  new  assessment,  analysis,  and  de-

sign procedures for building components, systems, and entire structures

2. Incorporating  wind  engineering  research  findings  into  building  codes  and

standards

3. Developing wind design guides, software tools, and other products for prac-

ticing professionals

4. Developing  textbooks  and  other  materials  for  use  in  undergraduate  and
graduate  education  in  the  fields  of  engineering,  architecture,  construction,
and building science

5. Incorporating  windstorm  hazard  mitigation  into  engineering,  architecture,

construction, and building science curricula

6. Education  and  training  of  building  construction  tradespeople  and  laborers
7. Adoption  of  strong  and  current  building  codes  by  municipalities  and  states
8. Enforcement of building codes
9. Education  and  training  of  persons  working  in  the  fields  of  insurance,  real
estate,  mortgage  lending,  emergency  management,  and  elected  and  ap-
pointed officials

10. Consumer education

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00130 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

127

Tasks 1–4 are reasonably straightforward and progress is primarily dependent on
availability of funding. Incorporation of windstorm hazard mitigation into the formal
educational programs of design professionals (Task 5) will be made easier by the re-
sults of tasks 2–4, but still faces two hurdles. Most of the professors are not knowl-
edgeable in this field, and the current trend at universities is for cutting the number
of  credit  hours  required  for  degrees,  making  it  more  difficult  to  add  new  material.
These challenges must however be met if we are to begin graduating design profes-
sionals  who  understand  the  theory  and  practice  of  windstorm  hazard  mitigation.
Education and training of tradespeople and laborers (Task 6) on how to install crit-
ical  components  such  as  wind  bracing  or  roofing  shingles  or  hurricane  shutters  is
obviously important but difficult in an industry where there is a transient workforce
that often has language barriers.

Adoption  of  building  codes  is  often  a  political  hot  potato.  In  recent  years  some
states and municipalities have adopted strong model building codes but stripped out
the  windborne  debris  protection  requirements  in  coastal  areas,  gutting  one  of  the
most critical components of the code. There are still many areas of the country that
have  not  adopted  building  codes  or  their  codes  are  very  outdated.  Enforcement  is
even  more  problematical,  particularly  for  rural  and  poorer  municipalities  where
funding and training of building department staff is often inadequate.

Tasks  9  and  10  are  critical  in  order  to  develop  public  understanding  of  the  need
for  and  benefits  of  windstorm  hazard  mitigation  through  building  codes  and  code
plus  alternatives.  The  areas  that  have  experienced  repeated  devastating  wind-
storms, such as South Florida and Oklahoma City, seem to have built a higher level
of public awareness of these issues and understand that building code adoption and
enforcement  have  direct  implications  for  life  safety,  property  damage,  cost  of  con-
struction, cost and availability of insurance, and resale value. Windstorm related re-
search,  building  code  changes,  and  insurance  are  front  page  news  in  those  commu-
nities. It’s much more difficult to raise significant awareness of these issues in com-
munities that have not had a wind-related disaster in recent years.

6. Closing Remarks

The  unparalleled  devastation  in  the  U.S.  caused  by  windstorms  in  just  the  last
four  years,  with  damage  costs  approaching  $200  billion,  makes  it  clear  that  some-
thing must be done. The funding levels authorized in the existing NWIRP ($25 mil-
lion  per  year)  are  trivial  with  respect  to  the  average  damage  costs  per  year.  If  the
program were to produce even the smallest of improvements in wind hazard mitiga-
tion, the NWIRP would pay for itself many times over. A fully-funded NWIRP would
in  actuality  provide  a  step  change  improvement  in  wind  damage  reduction,  which
would over time significantly reduce the U.S. vulnerability to severe windstorms.

Reauthorization  of  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program  is  a  crit-
ical step in the process, but ultimately of little value unless funds are appropriated
to  make  the  Program  a  reality.  As  annualized  windstorm  costs  continue  to  sky-
rocket, this country can no longer afford to ignore the problem. An investment must
be  made  in  windstorm  hazard  mitigation  and  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Re-
duction Program is the way to get it done.

7. References
Blake, E. Rappaport, E., and Landsea, C. (2007). The Deadliest, Costliest, and Most
Intense  United  States  Tropical  Cyclones  from  1851  to  2006  (and  Other  Fre-
quently Requested Hurricane Facts), NOAA Technical Memorandum NWS TPC–
5, National Hurricane Center, Miami, FL.

Building Code Compliance Office (2006). Post Hurricane Wilma Progress Assessment,

Miami-Dade County Building Code Compliance Office, April 2006.

FEMA  (1999).  Taking  Shelter  From  the  Storm:  Building  a  Safe  Room  Inside  Your
House,  FEMA  320,  Second  Edition,  Federal  Emergency  Management  Agency,
Washington, DC.

FEMA  (2000).  Design  and  Construction  Guidance  for  Community  Shelters,  FEMA

361, Federal Emergency Management Agency, Washington, DC.

Gurley,  K.,  Davis,  R.,  Ferrera,  S–P.,  Burton,  J.,  Masters,  F.,  Reinhold,  T.  and
Abdullah,  M.  (2006).  Post  2004  Hurricane  Field  Survey—an  Evaluation  of  the
Relative  Performance  of  the  Standard  Building  Code  and  the  Florida  Building
Code, 2006 ASCE Structures Congress, St. Louis.

NOAA  (2008).  Early  and  Intense  Tornado  Season  Could  Be  Record,  http://
www.noaanews.noaa.gov/stories2008/20080604¥tornado.html,  posted  June  13,
2008.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00131 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

128

NSSA (2001). National Storm Shelter Association Standard for the Design, Construc-
tion,  and  Performance  of  Storm  Shelters,  National  Storm  Shelter  Association,
Lubbock, TX, April 12, 2001.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00132 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

129

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00133 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

130

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00134 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

131

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00135 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

132

BIOGRAPHY FOR MARC L. LEVITAN

Dr.  Marc  Levitan  has  been  actively  engaged  in  wind  and  hurricane  engineering
research, practice, and education for 20 years. His areas of research include assess-
ment, analysis and design of structures for hurricane resistance, including wind and
hurricane  effects  on  critical  and  essential  facilities,  storm  shelters,  and  industrial
and  petrochemical  structures.  He  is  the  founding  Director  of  the  LSU  Hurricane
Center and co-founder of the LSU Wind Tunnel Laboratory. He chairs the ICC com-
mittee developing a national standard for the design and construction of storm shel-
ters, and also chairs the ASCE committee developing wind loading guidelines for the
petrochemical  industry.  Other  national  service  includes  the  ASCE  7  Main  Com-
mittee and Wind Load Subcommittee, the ASCE Aerodynamics Committee, and the
ASCE  Wind  Effects  Committee.  Dr.  Levitan  also  chairs  the  ASCE  National  Infra-
structure and Research Policy Committee. He is Past-President of the American As-
sociation for Wind Engineering and chaired the 10th Americas Conference on Wind
Engineering  in  Baton  Rouge  in  2005.  The  academic  pursuits  of  Dr.  Levitan  are
structural  engineering,  wind  engineering,  and  hurricane  engineering.  Prior  to  join-
ing  LSU,  he  spent  five  years  as  the  first  Managing  Director  of  the  Wind  Engineer-
ing Research Field Laboratory at Texas Tech University.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Levitan.  Ms.  Chapman-Hender-

son, please proceed.

STATEMENT  OF  MS.  LESLIE  CHAPMAN–HENDERSON,  PRESI-
DENT AND CEO, FEDERAL ALLIANCE FOR SAFE HOME, INC.—
FLASH
Ms.  CHAPMAN-HENDERSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Com-

mittee Members.

My  name  is  Leslie  Chapman-Henderson,  and  I  am  here  today
representing  the  Federal  Alliance  for  Safe  Homes.  We  are  a  part-
nership  of  more  than  100  public,  private,  and  nonprofit  organiza-
tions  and  leaders  who  have  dedicated  the  past  10  years  to  making
America  a  more  disaster-resistant  nation.  Our  mission  is  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00136 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

133

‘‘strengthen  homes  and  safeguard  families’’  from  disasters  of  all
kinds,  including  earthquakes,  floods,  hail,  hurricanes,  lightning,
tornadoes, and wildfire.

We  view  our  work  as  part  of  a  larger  social  movement  to  estab-
lish  disaster  safety  as  a  public  value  in  this  country.  Our  goal  is
to  create  widespread  homeowner  demand  for  safer,  better  built
homes,  much  like  the  highway  safety  movement,  which  succeeded
in  creating  American  demand  for  safe,  well-built  vehicles.  Just  as
the highway safety movement has saved lives on our roads, the dis-
aster  safety  movement  can  and  does  save  lives,  homes,  and  build-
ings in catastrophic events. We believe that the United States built
environment  is  highly  vulnerable  to  windstorm  hazards,  and  that
is increasing.

We  perceive  that  the  greatest  challenge  in  strengthening  new  or
existing buildings is a lack of information, and a lack of knowledge
transfer  between  the  many  stakeholders  that  need  to  understand
windstorm  prevention  options.  After  hurricanes  and  tornadoes,  we
frequently meet homeowners who are very frustrated to learn that
a  mere  handful  of  additional  nails  may  have  made  a  difference  in
keeping their roof in place.

We  believe  that  one  of  the  best  means  of  solving  this  problem  is
to  put  in  place  a  system  of  state-of-the-art,  consistently  enforced,
model  building  codes  that  incorporate  all  research  findings  on  a
timely  basis,  but  these  have  to  be  put  in  place  before  windstorms
strike.  This  would  overcome  the  often  lost  opportunity  to  rebuild
damaged  communities  in  a  stronger  way,  because  improving  codes
after the storm can happen too late to affect the quality of the new
built environment.

If we rebuild without the advantage of new techniques and miti-
gation, we perpetuate a cycle of build, destroy, rebuild, that our or-
ganization and movement is working to break. We have found that
effective  mechanisms  for  convincing  stakeholders  to  adopt  wind
mitigation  measures  include  a  combination  of  public  awareness,
market demand, innovative mitigation programs, model codes, pro-
fessional education and, of course, research.

A few innovative model programs are the My Safe Florida Home
and South Carolina Safe Home Initiatives. These programs provide
wind  mitigation  home  inspections  and  matching  grants  for  home
hardening  and  retrofitting.  These  efforts  help  homeowners  under-
stand  the  relative  strengths  and  weaknesses  of  their  homes  by  as-
signing a ranking on a one to 100 scale. They then provide match-
ing funds to help offset the costs of retrofitting or hardening.

Understanding  and  communicating  the  linkage  between  strong
buildings  and  sound  economics  is  a  powerful  public  motivator  as
well. Let us take Texas, for example, in light of what has happened
there in the last 48 hours. Catastrophe models tell us that the av-
erage  annual  expected  insured  losses  from  hurricanes  for  single
family homes in Texas are approximately $932 million per year, or
nearly  $1  billion.  If  we  could  retrofit  the  entire  stock  of  homes
there,  using  modern  building  codes,  that  loss  expectation  would
drop by 40 percent, to $562 million. Moreover, if we rebuilt the en-
tire housing stock to a slightly code plus standard, that annual ex-
pected loss would drop 78 percent to $206 million per year.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00137 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

134

Another  key  area  of  improvement  in  building  practices  that  we
support,  of  course,  is  to  increase  funding  for  research  and  innova-
tion. We need to better understand how and why buildings survive
or  fail  in  windstorms,  and  our  academic  partners  still  do  not  have
all  the  answers.  We  believe  that  FEMA  and  the  National  Weather
Service  do  an  excellent  job  of  communicating  the  importance  of
mitigation  as  a  priority.  However,  by  its  nature,  the  information
has  to  be  delivered  at  the  State,  and  especially  at  the  local  level.
We  strongly  urge  you—we  strongly  support  the  National  Wind-
storm Impact Reduction Program, and strongly encourage the reau-
thorization, with investment of additional resources. We believe the
three  most  important  areas  to  emphasize  include  activities  to  en-
hance  the  understanding  of  windstorm  research,  development  of
improved  outreach  and  implementation  mechanisms,  and  outreach
and  information  dissemination  related  to  cost-effective  and  afford-
able construction techniques to all audiences. With regard to imple-
mentation, we believe that the program should establish a singular
guiding  principle  to  ensure  that  program  outcomes  and  discoveries
are widely shared with the general public.

I want to thank you for the opportunity to join you today, for all
you  are  doing  to  help  protect  Americans  from  the  devastating  ef-
fects  of  windstorms,  and  for  helping  homeowners  in  this  country
understand that luck should not be their first line of defense when
they confront natural disaster threats.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Chapman-Henderson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LESLIE CHAPMAN-HENDERSON

Introduction

Thank you Mr. Chairman and Committee Members.
My  name  is  Leslie  Chapman-Henderson  and  I  am  here  today  representing  the
Federal Alliance for Safe Homes. We are a partnership of more than 100 public, pri-
vate and nonprofit organizations and leaders who have dedicated the past ten years
to  making  America  a  more  disaster-resistant  nation.  Our  mission  is  to  ‘‘strengthen
homes  and  safeguard  families’’  from  disasters  of  all  kinds,  including  earthquakes,
floods, hail, hurricanes, lightning, tornadoes and wildfires.

The  Federal  Alliance  for  Safe  Homes  helps  reduce  impacts  from  catastrophic
losses like windstorms by providing the public with accurate and timely information
on  how  to  make  homes  more  disaster-resistant—either  at  the  time  of  construction
or  with  post-construction  hardening  or  retrofitting  techniques.  We  want  consumers
to understand that they can protect their property, and ‘‘luck’’ is not their best tool
when they confront natural disaster threats.

We view our work as part of a larger social movement to establish disaster safety
as a public value in this country. This is a movement that supports a built environ-
ment  strong  enough  to  reasonably  resist  and  survive  natural  disaster  threats.  We
specifically  focus  on  mitigation  and  the  collective  work  undertaken  beforehand  to
prevent or lessen impacts of hurricanes and other threats.

Our goal is to create widespread homeowner demand for safer, better-built homes.
We  modeled  this  approach  after  the  highway  safety  movement,  which  succeeded  in
creating American demand for safe, well-built vehicles with seat belts and air bags.
Just  as  the  highway  safety  movement  has  saved  lives  on  our  roads,  the  disaster
safety  movement  will  reduce  losses  from  catastrophic  events.  We  recognize  the  fol-
lowing  elements  as  essential  to  the  establishment  of  the  disaster  safety  movement:

• Building codes that are enacted and enforced

Æ Applied to new construction, rehabilitated construction and restored con-

struction

• Financial incentives

Æ Including banking, insurance, real estate, tax

• Mitigation public policy

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00138 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

135

Æ Inspection and matching grant programs

• Public awareness
• Professional education

Æ Architecture, construction, engineering

• Research and innovation

Our typical activities include public awareness campaigns featuring free resource
and  referral  services  through  a  toll-free  telephone  hotline  and  the  www.flash.org
website, integrated multi-media campaigns, professional education programs and ex-
tensive public outreach. Below is a sampling of our initiatives:

• Blueprint  for  Safety—An  award-winning  curriculum  for  contractors,  design
professionals  and  home  inspectors  featuring  training  on  disaster-resistant
construction  techniques.  Blueprint  recommendations  are  referenced  as  the
basis for mitigation policies and programs enacted in several states, including
Florida, Louisiana, Mississippi and South Carolina.

• The Tale of Two Houses—A motivational video story of two neighboring fami-
lies  and  homes  affected  by  2004’s  Hurricane  Charley  that  demonstrates  dra-
matically different building performance and outcomes based on the different
building  practices  used.  The  Tale  of  Two  Houses  program  inspired  a  season
of  nationally  syndicated  television  shows  and  joint  work  with  home  improve-
ment guru Bob Vila.

• Turn  Around—Don’t  Drown—A  jointly  owned  public  awareness  life  safety
campaign  with  the  National  Weather  Service  that  helps  raise  awareness  of
the  risks  associated  with  walking  or  driving  into  moving  water.  The  slogan
is in widespread use by broadcast meteorologists, forecasters and others. Out-
door advertising campaigns are focused at the State level and are in place in
Florida, Nevada, Texas and other states.

• StormStruck:  A  Tale  of  Two  HomesΤΜ ...  presented  by  the  Federal  Alliance
for  Safe  Homes—StormStruck  is  an  interactive  ‘‘edu-tainment’’  experience
that will open in late summer of 2008 at Epcot at the Walt Disney World Re-
sort  in  Florida.  The  high  tech  simulated  storm  experience  will  combine  fun
with game-based learning to provide more than four million annual guests to
Epcot  with  information  on  how  to  protect  their  homes  and  families  from  se-
vere weather.

While  our  organizational  focus  is  solely  on  residential  structures,  my  comments

today will be relevant for some aspects of commercial structures as well.

Commentary/Response to Committee Questions
Question  #1—How  vulnerable  is  the  U.S.  built  environment—and  its  occu-
pants—to  windstorm  hazards?  Has  this  vulnerability  increased  or  de-
creased in recent years?
We  believe  that  the  U.S.  built  environment  is  highly  vulnerable  to  windstorm  haz-
ards, and the vulnerability is increasing. There are various ways to characterize the
level and demonstrate the increase, including:

A) Coastal Population Growth. According to the U.S. Census Bureau, as of July
1, 2007, 35.3 million people lived in areas of the United States most threat-
ened  by  hurricanes.1 These  areas  are  defined  as  the  coastal  portions  of
Texas  through  North  Carolina  and  represent  approximately  12  percent  of
the  U.S.  population.  This  figure  represents  an  increase  from  the  1950  level
of  10.2  million,  which  represented  seven  percent  of  the  U.S.  population.
Florida alone represents six percent of the current coastal population.
Three  of  the  20  most  populous  metro  areas  from  2006  to  2007  were  within
Atlantic  or  Gulf  coastal  areas  from  North  Carolina  to  Texas.2 These  areas
are:
• Houston-Baytown-Sugar Land, Texas (sixth)
• Miami-Fort Lauderdale-Miami Beach, Fla. (seventh)
• Tampa-St. Petersburg-Clearwater, Fla. (19th)

1 Source: Population Estimates http://www.census.gov/popest/estimates.php
2 Source: 
011671.html

http://www.census.gov/Press-release/www/releases/archives/population/

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00139 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

136

Note:  Coastal  counties  include  those  with  at  least  15  percent  of  their
total land area within the Nation’s coastal watershed.3

B) Historic  Losses4 (United  States).  Disaster  losses  tell  a  compelling  picture  of
our  economic  and  societal  vulnerability  to  windstorms.  From  1987  to  2006
the inflation-adjusted, insured losses break down as follows:
• $297.3 billion—total disaster losses
• $137.7 billion, or 46.3 percent—tropical cyclone losses
• $77.3 billion, or 26 percent—tornado losses
• $19.1 billion, or 6.4 percent—earthquake losses
Seven of the 10 most expensive hurricanes in U.S. history occurred between
August 2004 and October 2005.

C) Today’s Insured Values (Sample: Florida).

• 4.5 million single family homes
• $1.8 trillion in residential property
• $1.0 trillion in commercial property

D) Coastal Construction (Sample: Galveston, Texas).

• More than $2.3 billion in residential, commercial and public construction

was underway in 20075

• More than 6,500 residential units under construction
• Mostly condos, including towers up to 27 stories high
• One Centex Homes development—2,300 condos and houses on 1,000 acres
• Galveston is the site of the deadliest natural disaster in U.S. history
• At least 8,000 people were killed in a 1900 hurricane
• 3,600 homes were destroyed
The current seawall in Galveston is only 15.6 ft. high; Katrina’s storm surge
was  nearly  30  feet.  Insured  losses  today  from  a  repeat  of  the  1900  storm
would exceed $21 billion, and it would become the 3rd most expensive hurri-
cane in U.S. history (after Katrina and Andrew).

E) Attributes  of  the  Built  Environment.  Vulnerability  will  continue  to  increase
due  to  a  variety  of  economic  and  other  factors,  including  the  aging  of  our
built  environment,  the  percentage  of  the  built  environment  constructed
without use of model building codes, and the increased cost of new construc-
tion.

Question  #2a—What  are  the  challenges  in  implementing  improvements  to
new or existing buildings?

The  greatest  challenge  in  implementing  improvements  to  new  or  existing  build-
ings  is  a  continuous  breakdown  in  communication  and  knowledge  transfer  between
homeowners,  home  builders  and  policy-makers.  During  years  of  post-storm  inter-
views and damage investigations, we meet homeowners who are frustrated to learn
that a mere handful of additional nails may have made a difference in keeping their
roofs on during a hurricane, especially since loss of roof covering and roof sheathing
failure  during  windstorms  is  typically  where  a  total  loss  of  structure  and  contents
begins.

In-place and intact enactment of model building codes with requisite code enforce-
ment  infrastructure  before  hurricanes  strike  is  the  best  means  of  overcoming  this
lost  opportunity  to  rebuild  damaged  communities  in  a  stronger  way.  While  new
codes  can  only  impact  approximately  two  percent  of  the  built  environment  in  any
non-disaster  year,  that  percentage  can  increase  dramatically  in  a  post-storm  re-
building period.

Unfortunately, many of the rebuilding efforts during the post-2004 and 2005 hur-
ricanes failed to include new, uniform roofing standards requiring enhanced nailing
and  installation  of  secondary  water  barriers.  This  represents  a  tremendous  lost  op-

3 Source <http://www.census.gov/geo/landview/lv6help/coastal¥cty.pdf>
4 Source:  Insurance  Information  Institute—Presentation  to  the  National  Hurricane  Con-

ference—http://server.iii.org/yy¥obj¥data/binary/784319¥1¥0/nhc2008.pdf

5 Source: Insurance Information Institute from ‘‘A Texas-Sized Hunger for Gulf Coast Homes,’’
New  York  Times,  March  18,  2007  and  www.1900storm.com  and  www.twia.org  accessed  July  9,
2007.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00140 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

137

portunity  and  perpetuates  the  cycle  of  ‘‘build-destroy-rebuild’’  that  our  organization
and movement is working to break.

Furthermore,  while  outstanding  progress  is  under  way  by  the  International  Code
Council and others in increasing model code adoption at the State levels, the model
code can still be undermined, weakened or adversely amended upon adoption at the
local  level.  We  are  concerned  that  many  coastal,  windstorm-exposed  communities
have  adopted  the  2006  International  Residential  Code,  but  also  inserted  provisions
that  remove  requirements  for  protecting  windows  with  code-approved  shutters  or
other opening protection.

We  believe  it  is  well-established  that  protecting  openings  like  windows  is  a  key

windstorm damage prevention practice.
Question  #2b—What  has  FLASH  found  to  be  effective  mechanisms  for  con-
vincing  property  owners  and  builders  to  adopt  wind  hazard  mitigation
measures?

Like the highway safety movement, success relies on a combination of regulation,

enforcement and education.

Intact  enactment  of  model  building  codes  is  a  vital  first  step,  and  we
should  reward  local  communities  that  adopt  model  codes  by  linking  en-
hanced federal, pre-disaster mitigation dollars to the strength and enforce-
ment record of the State and local building codes.

Communication and education are also essential. FLASH has found that the most
effective  ways  to  deliver  relevant  information  to  the  public,  policy-makers  and  af-
fected trades and professions are:

1. through  news  media  outreach  that  focuses  on  specific  storm  experiences  of

real families,

2. by  creating  simple,  clear  and  actionable  ‘‘how  to’’  information  to  empower
consumers  to  ask  for  specific,  prescriptive  constructive  practices  at  the  time
of building or rebuilding, and

3. by participating and serving on relevant public policy forums that create and

recommend model programs.

Two  such  model  programs  at  the  State  level  are  the  My  Safe  Florida  and  South
Carolina  Safe  Home  initiatives  for  residential  structures.  These  programs  provide
wind mitigation home inspections and matching grants for home hardening and ret-
rofitting activities. These efforts help homeowners understand the relative strengths
and  weakness  of  their  homes,  and  then  provide  matching  funds  to  help  offset  the
cost of retrofitting or hardening those homes.

Conservatively derived measurements of the value of mitigation are also essential
tools  for  delivering  compelling  mitigation  improvements  to  the  public  and  policy
leaders.  Consider  these  findings  from  an  independent  study  by  the  National  Insti-
tute of Building Sciences:

Mitigation provided a return on investment of up to four-to-one. A 10-year snap-
shot of FEMA mitigation grants and projects found:

Reduced human losses (death, injuries and homelessness)
• Reduced direct property damage
• Reduced direct business interruption loss
• Reduced indirect business losses
• Reduced non-market damage
• Reduced cost of emergency response

(Natural Hazard Mitigation Saves: An Independent Study to Assess the Future
Savings  from  Mitigation  Activities,  National  Institute  of  Building  Sciences,  De-
cember 2005, accessed at http://www.nibs.org/MMC/mmcactiv5.html)

Modeling  the  strength  of  existing  building  stock  based  on  the  historic  building
code practices can also provide a compelling case for implementing windstorm miti-
gation. The tables below illustrate some relevant examples:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00141 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

138

Question  #3a—Where  do  improvements  need  to  be  made  in  building  prac-
tices  and  our  ability  to  mitigate  wind  damage  to  structures  and  commu-
nities?
• Increase  funding  for  research  and  innovation  in  building  structure  performance
When  examining  building  performance  post-storm,  we  need  to  understand  how
and  why  buildings  survived  or  failed.  Our  academic  partners  still  do  not  have  all
the  answers  to  understanding  wind  and  wind-driven  rain  effects  on  buildings,  and
the financial resources for this research seem inconsistently distributed and difficult
to sustain on an ongoing basis. The resources dedicated to research on storm effects
are greatly out-paced by research spending on earthquake hazards.
• Accelerate  adoption  of  new  construction  technology  findings  into  model  building

codes
The  code  development  process  is  understandably  deliberate,  however,  it  often
takes years to incorporate to new findings into model codes. As a result, homes and
buildings  continue  to  be  built  without  the  benefit  of  expensive  and  deadly  lessons
learned post-disaster.
Question  #3b—How  well  do  agencies  at  all  levels  of  government  advocate
and educate on the importance of wind hazard mitigation measures?

We believe that federal agencies like FEMA and the National Weather Service do
an  excellent  job  of  communicating  the  importance  of  mitigation  as  a  thematic  pri-
ority.  However,  by  its  nature  the  specific  mitigation  information  and  professional
training is delivered at the State and local levels. It is our observation that Florida,
Louisiana and South Carolina are the most active states in terms of mitigation out-
reach, education and training.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00142 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

139

A  novel  concept  that  is  in  use  in  Florida  as  part  of  the  My  Safe  Florida  Home
program  is  the  Hurricane  Resistance  Rating  Scale  that  ranks  homes  on  a  zero  to
100  scale  on  the  basis  of  its  wind-resistant  features,  including  roof  shape,  presence
of  opening  protection,  construction  method,  etc.  This  concept  could  be  adapted  to  a
national model scale and be incorporated into the home construction industry in all
windstorm  exposed  states,  including  the  so-called  ‘‘Tornado  Alley.’’  The  scale  could
help  revolutionize  consumers’  understanding  of  the  wind  hazard,  much  like  Energy
Star revolutionized society’s perception and value for energy savings.
Question  #4—Please  comment  on  the  implementation  of  NWIRP  and  the
level  of  federal  funding  for  wind  hazard  mitigation  R&D.  Looking  toward
the reauthorization of the program, what do you feel are the three most im-
portant priorities and what changes would you suggest for the legislation?
We strongly support all aspects of the National Windstorm Impact Reduction Pro-
gram  and  strongly  encourage  the  reauthorization  with  additional  investment  of  re-
sources. We offer the following priorities based on our belief that the private sector
can augment the program’s efforts with significant resources.

• Improved understanding of windstorms

Æ Activities  to  enhance  the  understanding  of  windstorms  shall  include  re-
search  to  improve  knowledge  of  and  data  collection  on  the  impact  of  se-
vere wind on buildings, structures, and infrastructure. Highest Priority

• Windstorm impact assessment

Æ Research,  development,  and  technology  transfer  to  improve  loss  esti-

mation and risk assessment systems; Low Priority

Æ Research,  development,  and  technology  transfer  to  improve  simulation

and computational modeling of windstorm impacts. Medium Prioriyy

• Windstorm impact reduction

Æ Development  of  improved  outreach  and  implementation  mechanisms  to
translate  existing  information  and  research  findings  into  cost-effective
and  affordable  practices  for  design  and  construction  professionals,  and
State and local officials; Highest Priority

Æ Development  of  cost-effective  and  affordable  windstorm-resistant  sys-
tems,  structures,  and  materials  for  use  in  new  construction  and  retrofit
of existing construction; High Priority

Æ Outreach  and  information  dissemination  related  to  cost-effective  and  af-
fordable  construction  techniques,  loss  estimation  and  risk  assessment
methodologies,  and  other  pertinent  information  regarding  windstorm
phenomena to federal, State, and local officials, the construction industry,
and the general public. Highest Priority

Our one implementation recommendation is that the program establish a singular
guiding  principle  for  all  program  outcomes  as  follows:  ‘‘Any  and  all  program  find-
ings,  materials  and  information  shall  be  communicated,  shared,  widely  promoted
and  accessible  to  the  general  public  with  a  special  emphasis  on  reaching  and  tar-
geting home buyers, homeowners, home builders and public policy-makers.’’

It is our firm belief that, like highway safety, the knowledgeable, empowered con-
sumer has the most capacity to move disaster safety and windstorm mitigation for-
ward. The essential tool they require to do is knowledge of the definition of a strong,
wind-resistant  home  backed  by  a  system  of  building  codes  that  ensure  optimal,  fu-
ture  construction  practices.  We  can  and  should  continue  to  improve  on  all  areas  of
focus identified in the National Windstorm Impact Reduction Program; however, the
stronger  we  make  our  built  environment,  the  more  opportunities  our  citizens  will
have to safely shelter-in-place outside of flood-prone areas.

BIOGRAPHY FOR LESLIE CHAPMAN-HENDERSON

Leslie  Chapman-Henderson  is  President/CEO  of  the  Federal  Alliance  for  Safe
Homes, Inc.—FLASH, a national, non-profit corporation founded in 1998 by a col-
laborative of non-profit, private and public organizations dedicated to strengthening
homes  and  safeguarding  families  from  disaster.  Today,  FLASH  is  the  fastest  grow-
ing  disaster  safety  education  organization  in  the  United  States  with  more  than  90
partners,  including  FEMA,  Georgia  Pacific,  Institute  for  Business  &  Home  Safety,
International  Code  Council,  Mercedes  Homes,  NeighborWorks,  NOAA,  South  Caro-
lina Insurance Department, State Farm Insurance Companies, Texas Department of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00143 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

140

Insurance,  Texas  Tech  Wind  Science  &  Engineering,  The  Home  Depot  and  Home
Depot Foundation, University of Florida, and USAA.
Ms.  Chapman-Henderson  and  FLASH  have  championed  the  cause  of  code-plus
construction  methods  through  the  creation  of  Blueprint  for  Safety  (Blueprint),  an
educational  program  for  home  builders,  homeowners  and  design  professionals  on
disaster-resistant construction techniques.

Among  Ms.  Chapman-Henderson’s  civic,  community  and  professional  awards  are
the  2008  National  Hurricane  Conference  Outstanding  Achievement  in  Mitigation
Award,  2008  Governor’s  Hurricane  Conference  Corporate  Award,  2006  Texas  Silver
Spur Award for Public Education Excellence, 2006 Governor’s Hurricane Conference
Public  Information/Education  Award,  2005  National  Hurricane  Conference  Out-
standing Achievement in Public Awareness Award, 2005 National Weather Associa-
tion  Walter  J.  Bennett  Public  Service  Award,  2005  NOAA  Environmental  Hero
Award,  2002  National  Hurricane  Conference  Outstanding  Achievement  in  Mitiga-
tion Award, 2002 FEMA Special Recognition Award, 2002 Florida Fire Chiefs Asso-
ciation  Excellence  in  Community  and  Public  Education  Award,  2002  Florida  Emer-
gency  Preparedness  Association  Corporate  Award,  and  2001  Governors  Hurricane
Conference Public Education Award.

Additional  award-winning  FLASH  outreach  projects  include  two  seasons  of  epi-
sodes  with  the  nationally-syndicated  programs  Bob  Vila  and  Home  Again  with  Bob
Vila;  a  one-hour,  nationally  televised  multi-hazard  PBS  Special  entitled,  Blueprint
for Safety . . . Disaster-resistant Homes; and ‘‘A Tale of Two Houses,’’ a multi-media
awareness campaign, show-casing code and code-plus construction success stories.

Ms.  Chapman-Henderson  currently  serves  as  co-chair  of  the  legislatively-created
My  Safe  Florida  Home  Advisory  Council.  Her  past  service  includes  consumer  rep-
resentative and chair for the Florida Hurricane Catastrophe Fund Advisory Council
under  Governor  Charlie  Crist  and  former  Governor  Jeb  Bush,  guest  lecturer  at  the
University of Florida—School of Construction and one of the Florida representatives
to  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  WARN  Committee.  She  was  recently
elected  as  a  board  trustee  of  the  Florida  International  University—International
Hurricane Research Center.

Other  past  service  includes  trustee  for  the  Florida  Fire  and  Emergency  Services
Foundation; consumer representative to the Louisiana Uniform Building Code Task
Force; consumer representative and Vice Chair on the 2005 Florida Legislative Task
Force on Long-Term Solutions for Florida’s Hurricane Insurance Market; and insur-
ance consumer representative to the 2006 Property and Casualty Insurance Reform
Committee chaired by former Lt. Governor Toni Jennings.

She has a Bachelor’s degree from the University of Florida, resides in Tallahassee

and is married to Robert Henderson.

DISCUSSION

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you  very  much,  Ms.  Chapman-Henderson.
We have come to the questions and answers portion of this hearing,
and  at  this  point,  we  open  for  our  first  round  of  questions,  and  I
recognize myself for an opening five minutes.

I  would  like  to  ask  Dr.  Levitan  and  Ms.  Chapman-Henderson  to
help  characterize  the  OSTP  and  the  general  federal  implementa-
tion  of  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program.  How
have,  how  is  the  OSTP,  and  how  have  the  agencies  done  thus  far,
and what needs to be worked on to improve this program going for-
ward?

Dr.  LEVITAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think,  and  as  you  pointed  out  in
your opening statement, there has been, progress has been limited,
and  much  of  that  has  to  do  with  the  funding  issue.  And  the  agen-
cies  each  have  their  own  tasks,  and  have  reported  that  they  are
working on wind hazard, various wind hazard mitigation programs,
but  at  least  from  my  perspective,  and  where  I  can  see  that,  again,
the coordination activities, so far, have been somewhat limited, and
perhaps, the nature of the problem is the funding restrictions.

Chairman  WU.  When  you  say  somewhat  limited,  are  you  being

polite about that?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00144 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

141

Dr.  LEVITAN.  Yes.  Also,  again,  my  nature,  and  from  where  I  sit,
and  I  am  somewhat  on  the  outside  of  those  activities,  and  I,  the
information that I get, oftentimes, is you know, from reports. I am
not here in Washington to attend all the meetings.

Chairman WU. Ms. Chapman-Henderson.
Ms.  CHAPMAN-HENDERSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  think
one  of  the  most  valuable  activities  we  have  participated  in,  prob-
ably  the  main  activity,  is  participating  in  the  post-disaster  inves-
tigations,  and  the  willingness  of  FEMA  to  coordinate  those,  and
bring  us  in,  so  that  we  can  speed  that  information  to  the  con-
sumers, has been incredible. In 2004, we participated, and 2005, in
fact,  we  are  looking  at  possibly  joining  a  Midwest  flooding  inves-
tigation team that is going to go out.

Because  so  often,  I  think  our  greatest  challenge  is  the  time  it
takes  to  take  in  the  information,  putting  it  into  the  building  code
cycle,  which  is  more  than  three  years,  you  know,  frequently.  The
storms  aren’t  going  to  wait,  and  that  is  one  of  the  greatest  chal-
lenges here, is we have to possibly speed up the sharing of informa-
tion, and get it to, you know, into either the codes or, on a market
basis,  to  homeowners,  so  they  can  make  those  choices  ahead  of
time.

Chairman WU. Ms. Chapman-Henderson, during your testimony,
you  mentioned  that  it  is  important  to  get  out  ahead  of  the  cycle,
so  that  the  FEMA  advice  doesn’t  come  so  late  that  the  building
codes are changed, and we get into a cycle of build——

Ms. CHAPMAN-HENDERSON. Destroy.
Chairman  WU.—destroy,  rebuild,  destroy.  Have  we  been  short-

ening that cycle, or is that still a problem?

Ms.  CHAPMAN-HENDERSON.  It  is  still  a  problem.  And  one  of  the
biggest  challenges  is,  while  the  model  codes  are  being  developed,
incorporating new learning and science and innovation, it is still a
very  slow  and  arduous  process,  but  those  model  codes  are  adopted
at the State level. They still have to carry through and be adopted
at the local level, and we have issues across the country where, at
the  local  level,  when  the  model  codes  are  adopted,  adverse  meas-
ures,  chapters,  amendments,  and  essentially,  sometimes  removing
the  engineering  behind  the  wind  science,  are  put  in  place,  and  the
net effect is a weakening of the code that is put there, so it not only
takes  a  long  time  to  get  the  new  codes,  but  it  is  important  to  pre-
serve  the  quality  of  the  model  code  when  it  gets  all  the  way  down
to the homeowner. That doesn’t happen today.

Chairman  WU.  Let  me  circle  back  in  a  different  period  of  ques-
tions,  about  the  federal  role  in  helping  disseminate  that  informa-
tion,  and  getting  it  all  the  way  to  the  ground  level.  Dr.  Hays,  I
want  to  give  you  an  opportunity  to  respond  to  the  concerns  that  I
expressed,  and  I  think  some  of  the  witnesses  expressed,  about  the
level of activity that OSTP and the other agencies have engaged in,
the level of coordination. It is my understanding that the Adminis-
tration  has  simply  not  asked  for  any  adequate  level  of  funding  for
this particular program.

Dr. HAYS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Addressing  a  couple  of  questions,  I  think,  that  you  have  on  co-
ordination  funding,  et  cetera.  With  respect  to  funding,  obviously,
funding  decisions  are  made  within  the  different  agencies  that  par-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00145 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

142

ticipate  in  the  program.  As  you  know,  as  this  committee  well
knows, those agencies face significant challenges in prioritizing dif-
ferent areas of research, so not just windstorm research, related to
other  kinds  of  hazards  research,  but  all  hazards  research  related
to  everything  else  within  their  domain.  So,  I  think  the  agencies
have developed budgets that——

Chairman  WU.  Since  my  time  is  running  out,  what  I  hear  you
going  toward  is  that  this  set  of  efforts  simply  has  not  come  to  the
top of the priority list, or close enough to the top of the priority list
thus far.

Dr. HAYS. I think agencies have placed a high priority on this re-
search. I think it is important to, when we are talking about meas-
uring  coordination,  which  is  a  very  abstract  thing  to  measure,  I
tend  to  think  in  terms  of  measuring  results,  and  keeping  in  mind
that  this  program,  while  it  has  only  been  authorized  for  several
years,  that  these  programs  within  the  agencies  have  existed  for
many  years.  I  think  there  are  a  number  of  demonstrable  results
that have been achieved in terms of windstorm R&D.

Track  forecast  accuracy  has  been  improved  by  50  percent.  That
has  led  to  what  used  to  be  only  three  day  forecasts,  we  now  have
five  day  out  forecasts  that  are  as  accurate  as  the  three  day  out
forecasts.  The  hurricane  warning  areas  have  shrunk.  Those  have
profound implications, not just for loss of life, but also for economic
implications associated with evacuations and so forth.

Similar  increases  in  tornado  warning  research  has  led  to  in-
creased  warning  times  for  tornadoes,  from  six  minutes  to  11  min-
utes,  just  between  1994  and  2002.  So,  I  think  there  are  a  lot  of
things  that  we  can  point  to  that  have  been  very  positive,  and  that
the  agencies  involved  in  this  program  are  largely  responsible  for
their research.

Chairman  WU.  Well,  thank  you,  Dr.  Hays.  My  time  has  expired,
but  I  just  want  to  point  out  that  some  of  this  National  Weather
Service, some of these meteorological capabilities are outside of this
particular program, I am concerned about some of the building code
issues, and some of the existing technology transfer issues that ap-
parently  have  not  been  performed,  and  it  has  been  raised  by  some
of the written and oral testimony of the other witnesses.

But  we  will  circle  back  on  that,  and  at  this  point,  I  would  like

to recognize Dr. Gingrey for five minutes.

Mr.  GINGREY.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you,  and  I  am  sure  some  of
our questions will overlap to some extent, but I did want to ask all
the witnesses, let us end with Dr. Hays, and start with Ms. Chap-
man-Henderson,  how  would  you  characterize  the  level  of  coopera-
tion  between  the  different  federal  agencies  that  are  currently  en-
gaged in windstorm research?

I  want  to  know  if  you  have  any  specific  suggestions  that  would
improve  your  institution’s  interaction  with  the  interagency  re-
search  efforts  as  they  currently  exist.  I  know  there  are  funding
problems. Dr. Levitan and others have mentioned that, and that is
a problem, of course, but do you think the R&D focus of each agen-
cy  is  appropriate,  and  are  they  trying  to  cooperate  and  make  this
program better?

Ms. CHAPMAN-HENDERSON. Well, I don’t want to opine on things
I  don’t  have  specific  knowledge  of,  and  we  work  mostly  with  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00146 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

143

National  Weather  Service  on  public  education  efforts,  and  of
course,  FEMA  on  mitigation,  so  I  haven’t  had  a  lot  of  experience
with the other agencies that have the role in coordination here. But
I  think  the  measure  of  all  of  this  is  what,  which,  or  if  any  of  the
outcomes  make  it  into  use,  either  through  the  building  codes,  or
through  market-based  knowledge  that  can  be  incorporated,  and  I
think that there has been some tremendous progress, as was men-
tioned.  Forecasting  at  the  Weather  Service,  evacuation  times,  you
know, have been—and that is critical. But I think because there is
progress there, maybe it is time to start looking, and maybe create
more  consistency  when  we  are  talking  about  the  fundamental  fail-
ure or survival of the structures.

Mr. GINGREY. Right.
Ms.  CHAPMAN-HENDERSON.  And  I  don’t  think  we  have  drilled

into it that much yet.

Mr.  GINGREY.  Thank  you.  And  I  think  I  will  go  directly  to  Dr.

Hays now, and then, let Dr. Levitan give a follow-up comment.

Dr.  HAYS.  Thank  you.  The  issue  of  coordination  is  one  that  I
have  thought  a  lot  about,  with  respect  to  this  working  group,  be-
cause  frankly,  this  working  group  has  faced  some  challenges,  I
think,  in  generating  the  same  level  of  interest  and  engagement
that  we  see  with  some  of  the  other  interagency  working  groups
that OSTP helps coordinate.

And I think an obvious comparison to make is between the Wind
Interagency Working Group and the Subcommittee on Disaster Re-
duction, which I mentioned in my opening statement, and is the all
hazards  approach  to  interagency  coordination.  One  of  the  things
that strikes me as a key difference between those two groups is the
all hazards approach, and so, the Subcommittee on Disaster Reduc-
tion, in taking that approach, I think that provides tremendous im-
petus  for  agencies  to  come  to  the  table,  to  make  sure  that  the  dif-
ferent types of hazards-related research are represented there, and
so forth.

The  very  narrow,  really  slice  of  the  overall  R&D  picture  that  is
represented  by  windstorm-related  research  presents  a  challenge
there, I think. It has been mentioned by one of the other witnesses
that the agencies in, with respect to windstorm research, have very
defined  activities,  and  I  think  that  is  appropriate.  They  are  com-
plementary, and each agency undertakes those activities very much
in keeping with their other types of activities.

So,  the  National  Science  Foundation  has  a  very  different  ap-
proach  to  funding  windstorm-related  research  than,  say,  FEMA.
So, Mr. Chairman, I think that that is something, and Mr. Gingrey,
I  hope  that  this  committee  will  consider  whether  or  not  it  makes
sense to treat individual types of hazards in this way that we have
been,  versus  the  all  hazards  approach,  which  I  think  is  supported
not only by our success with the Subcommittee on Disaster Reduc-
tion,  but  on  things  like  the  RAND  Report,  and  other  approaches.

Mr. GINGREY. Dr. Levitan.
Dr.  LEVITAN.  Excuse  me.  I  think  that  the  individual  agencies
have  done  what  they  can  within  their  resources,  and  are  making
significant  progress,  but  the  program  is,  really  provides  them  the
opportunity, and hopefully, in the future, to do a better job and en-
hance  their  coordination,  and  I  think  that  is  why  we  really  need

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00147 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

144

to  move  forward  with  this,  and  expand,  and  the  interagency  work-
ing group, and to provide for better coordination.

Mr.  GINGREY.  Mr.  Chairman,  as  my  time  in  this  first  round  is
winding  down,  I  want  to  ask  unanimous  consent,  if  any  of  the
Members want to submit questions for the record for Dr. Reinhold,
if that would be allowed.

Chairman WU. Without objection, so ordered.
Mr. GINGREY. Thank you.
Chairman WU. Dr. Ehlers for five minutes.
Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Unfortunately,  I  have
three  hearings  going  on  simultaneously,  so  I  missed  the  testimony
and  early  questioning.  If  I  ask  a  question  that  has  already  been
asked, just let me know, and I will withdraw it.

But just following up on a comment I made at a hearing a week
or  two  ago,  it  is  a  real  puzzle  to  me,  as  someone  who  lives  in  the
frozen  North,  and  has  also  lived  in  earthquake-prone  California.
We  have  adopted  building  codes  in  those  areas  which  work  ex-
tremely well. I have never heard of any time recently that a house
has  collapsed  because  of  heavy  snow  on  the  roof  in  our  area,  and
the  earthquake  damage  has  really  been  minimized  in  earthquakes
by the strong building codes out West.

It  has  always  puzzled  me  why  we  haven’t  taken  the  same  care
and rigor in the hurricane-prone areas while we know that we can
mitigate  a  lot  of  the  damage,  and  prevent  a  lot  of  the  damage,  by
appropriate building codes, and it just doesn’t seem to happen. And
I  am  curious,  if  you  can  give  me  any  insight  as  to  why  this  slow
rate of adoption of improved building codes, in areas that are prone
to windstorms.

Anyone have any wisdom to offer on that issue?
Ms.  CHAPMAN-HENDERSON.  I  will  certainly  try.  I  think  there  are
those  in  the  construction  profession  that  are  fearful  of  the  costs,
and  some  of  those  fears  are  accurate.  I  mean,  the  costs  of  con-
structing  a  home  is  an  essential  component  of  whether  or  not  peo-
ple  can  have  a  home.  So,  I  think  this  is  where  information  and
knowledge  transfer  comes  in.  If  we  can  complete  the  research  and
identify,  perfect  those  affordable  techniques,  and  then  commu-
nicate,  you  know,  we  are  talking  about  incremental  increases  in
costs that make a difference between surviving a windstorm or not,
I think we go a long way.

There  is,  perhaps,  a  fear  of  the  unknown  tied  up  in  the  conclu-
sion ahead of time that it is going to make homes too expensive for
our  part.  We  have  always  felt  that  the  home  that  was  built  in  a
way  that  allowed  it  to  fail  was  the  ultimate  expensive  home,  so  it
just  didn’t  make  any  sense  to  us,  and  I  think  that  is  pretty  much
the core of what we do.

But  there  is  some  opposition  in  the  field.  There  has  been  talk,
also  of,  again,  looking  back  at  highway  safety,  of  finding  a  way  to
reward those states and municipalities that do embrace, intact, the
national  model  codes,  and  possibly  providing  a  carrot  of  sorts,  so
that there is enhanced mitigation money, pre-disaster, or other ini-
tiatives, that could help motivate the communities to recognize that
they have to do their part, too.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Yeah,  but  you  know,  I  have  served  in  local  govern-
ment,  too,  and  every  change  you  make,  there  are  people  com-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00148 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

145

plaining about the expense, sometimes legitimately, but we still in-
creased  the  building  code,  or  changed  the  building  code  to  accom-
modate  that.  And  California  has  probably  had  the  greatest  ex-
pense. The occurrence of earthquakes is very unlikely, and yet, we
have  very  good  building  codes  which  minimize  the  damage,  and  if
you  add  up  the  cost  of  all  those  changes  in  the  building  code,  it  is
hard  to  justify  on  the  basis  of  any  individual  residents,  but  in
terms  of  the  overall  picture,  and  lives  saved,  it  is  a  good  invest-
ment.

Why  have  the  protesters  against  wind  damage  building  codes
been so, either so strident or so successful, whereas it has not been
an  issue  in  other  areas?  Every  time  you  change  the  building  code,
you  get  screams  of  anguish,  but  you  still  do  it,  because  if  it  is  the
right thing to do.

Ms.  CHAPMAN-HENDERSON.  Well,  two  points.  One  is,  I  couldn’t
agree with you more. It is the right thing to do, and that is, again,
the  core  of  what  we  do.  I  think  one  of  the  challenges  is  it  can  be
very technical.

I will give you an example. There is a provision that is often used
at  the  local  level,  when  the  residential  code  is  adopted,  relating  to
windstorm. And by its insertion, it makes a requirement for having
shutters  or  opening  protection  unnecessary.  And  the  insertion  al-
lows people to have an option. Instead of shuttering a home at the
time  of  construction,  you  can  do  something  called  design  it  to  be
partially  enclosed,  or  design  it  for  internal  pressurization,  which
sounds really good. And it does, in fact, make the structure strong-
er.

But the interesting thing to us is that the designing for internal
pressurization  option,  my  understanding  is  was  originally  put  in
place for barns, because barns don’t really need shutters. If a storm
is coming, the concept is you probably get your horses or other ani-
mals out of the way, so it caused an undue expense to the farmer.
But  putting  something  in  place  that  allows  homes  to  be  designed
and  built  that  way,  essentially  leaves  those  homeowners  without
the ability to shelter in place, because they won’t have opening pro-
tection,  and  it  is  critical,  as  roof  performances  in  high  wind,  cov-
ering your windows is a pretty well established factor, as well. But
it  is  so  technical,  and  it  is  hard  to  understand,  and  it  is  engineer-
ing, I think sometimes, we don’t understand what is being done.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Well,  I  have  to  admit,  I  am  dismayed  and  also
amused every time there is a hurricane pending, TV shows, all the
people running down to Home Depot or Lowe’s or whatever, buying
particle  board,  hammering  it  over  their  windows,  which  of  course,
creates damage to the woodwork and so forth. And it is really quite
an  expensive  option.  I  can’t  believe  that  doing  that  on  a  regular
basis is any cheaper than building it right in the first place—or is,
I am sorry, is any more expensive than building it right in the first
place.

Ms.  CHAPMAN-HENDERSON.  I  couldn’t  agree  more,  when  you  add

the social costs, as well.

Mr. EHLERS. Any other comments, Dr. Levitan?
Dr. LEVITAN. Yes, I will address more, maybe more the technical
side  of  your  question.  I  think  the  adoption  of  the  codes  that  has
been  addressed.  One,  actually,  there  have  been,  particularly  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00149 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

146

New  England  in  the  last  several  years,  there  was  some  significant
roof  collapses  from  snow  load,  but  the  nature  of  snow  load  is  a
gravity  load,  acting  down.  The  structures  typically  are  designed
fairly well for that, and where earthquake and wind loads have lat-
eral loads and uplift loads, which is more unusual, and takes more
care to be able to design for.

The better performance of structures in earthquakes, I think has,
in  large  part,  has  been  due  to  the  success  of  the  NEHRP,  the  Na-
tional  Earthquake  Hazard  Reduction  Program,  which  has,  for
many years, gone out after the earthquakes, and found out exactly
what worked and what didn’t, and then had the significant funding
to  make  major  advances  in  the  codes.  There  has  been  dramatic
changes  in  our  design  practices  and  technologies  and  techniques
and products that we use for earthquakes. And to get that into the
code,  and  to  move  that  forward,  whereas,  we  have  not  had  that
same opportunity in wind hazard mitigation.

And  certainly,  even  the  codes  that  we  have  now,  they  do  a  good
job  of  reducing,  when  they  are  adopted  and  enforced,  but  we  still
have a long ways to go, in terms of moving our codes, our building
codes for wind to the next generation.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Well,  are  you  suggesting  that  we  need  more  re-

search?

Dr.  LEVITAN.  Yes,  very  clearly.  The  research  and  the  technology
transfer, to take the research findings. And we have sort of a back-
log  that  we  have  built  up  of  research  findings,  and  within  the  re-
search  community,  and  even  internationally,  we  have  a  lot  of  re-
search  which  has  not  been  able  to  have  been  translated  into  codes
and standards, because the funding for that is very difficult to get.
That  is  generally  too  applied  for  the  National  Science  Foundation,
and there isn’t other, there typically isn’t industry funding or other
funding opportunities available to do that tech transfer.

And so, the national program here would be the place to be able

to provide that, and get a lot of bang for the buck right now.

Mr. EHLERS. Well, Mr. Chairman, I suggest you take care of that

problem. Thank you.

Chairman  WU.  The  gentleman’s  comments  are  always  trenchant
and  on  point,  as  are  his  questions.  And  next,  the  gentleman  from
Nebraska, Mr. Smith, recognized for five minutes.

Mr. SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and witnesses.
Coming from hail-prone, tornado-prone areas, situations in rural
Nebraska,  it  has  been  interesting,  as  disasters  have  stricken  the
country  in  various  places.  My  constituents  watching  tax  dollars  go
to  certain  areas  of  the  country  is  one  thing,  but  when  availability
of homeowner’s insurance becomes scarce, is quite another. And so,
the  attention  it  has  had  around  the  country,  and  this  is  an  inter-
esting discussion here.

And you know, the mitigating efforts on the part of auto dealers,
for example, building canopies so they can buy more affordable hail
insurance,  it  has  been  interesting.  It  has  been  expensive  up  front,
obviously,  when  an  automobile  dealership  builds  canopies  for  their
entire  inventory,  but  it  is  a  cost  savings  in  the  long  run,  and  cer-
tainly, it is a good business decision.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00150 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

147

But  as  we  are  discussing,  perhaps  Ms.  Chapman-Henderson,  on
the training, how many people have been trained through the Blue-
print for Safety curriculum?

Ms.  CHAPMAN-HENDERSON.  Last  year,  approximately  2,500.  We
are  currently  focusing,  our  work  is  very  state-specific,  because  the
training is usually part of an overall initiative embrace by a state,
so  we  are  right  now  training  inspectors  in  South  Carolina.  I  don’t
know  the  specific  number  of  how  many.  When  Florida  put  their
mitigation  program  in  place,  there  was  a  huge  training  piece  to
that, and we provided it.

Mr.  SMITH.  What  would  you  say  are  the  skills  that  would  be

taught through a course?

Ms. CHAPMAN-HENDERSON. Well, first, the first chapter is on just
fundamentals  of  wind  design,  and  understanding  some  of  the  ba-
sics, just on roof shape, and this whole concept of pressurization of
the structure. You know, one of the things we used to believe, and
I think a lot of consumers still believe, is that we should crack win-
dows  open  when  tornadoes  are  coming,  and  we  have  learned
through  the  work  of  Dr.  Levitan  and  others  that  wind  effects  on
structures are such that we don’t want any wind in the house.

So,  we  start  with  those  fundamentals,  and  we  teach  prescriptive
methods  for  roof  attachment  with  enhanced  nailing,  secondary
water barrier, identifying code plus or impact resistant or wind re-
sistant shingles.

Mr.  SMITH.  Have  you  seen  the  students  for,  say,  of  the  training,
able  to  enhance  their  employment  position  through  the  course
work?

Ms.  CHAPMAN-HENDERSON.  Yes,  in  fact,  it  is  ironic,  because  we
used  to  worry  about  being  able  to  get  contractors  to  participate  in
our  program,  because  there  was  so  much  work  going  on  with  the
housing  boom,  but  there  has  been  an  unintended  but  positive  con-
sequence of this specialty that has been created across the country
called wind mitigation. Much like the medical profession, if you are
an orthopedic surgeon, you don’t necessarily practice cardiology. So,
a  lot  of  contractors,  even  some  appraisers  and  others,  have  been
able to cross-train into performing wind mitigation retrofits.

As you know, the new construction, the building code is essential
for  all  the  new  construction,  and  of  course,  post-disaster,  to  bring
that  housing  stock  into  current  times.  But  our  great  challenge  is
the existing stock, and retrofitting it. So, it is becoming a specialty
area  in  the  trade.  And  in  the  profession,  it  is  not  vast  yet,  but  it
is  growing,  and  it  is  becoming  something  that  I  think  we  will  see
over time will take hold, because there are so many things you can
do. If you can get in your attic, for example, you can put additional
metal  connectors  to  enhance  the  connection  between  the  roof  and
the wall, and that can make all the difference in a high wind event.
You know, there is also the notion of existing activities for people
like roofers. If roofers are trained and cross-trained into wind miti-
gation,  they  recognize  that  the  ideal  time  to  enhance  the  strength
of  a  roof  deck  is  when  you  have  taken  the  covering  off,  and  that
is  where  that  handful  of  additional  nails,  maybe  of  a  specific  type,
maybe,  you  know,  ring  shank  nails,  that  can  make  the  difference
in keeping that deck on.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00151 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

148

There  is  a  pretty  famous  story  that  we  always  talk  about,  about
Hurricane  Andrew,  where  the  Miami  Herald  had  a  headline.  It
looked like a football score, and it said Habitat 24, Andrew 0. And
what it was talking about is that 24 homes built by Habitat volun-
teers  survived  Hurricane  Andrew  nearly  intact.  In  fact,  we  raced
to  the  scene,  only  to  find  out  they  were  fine.  The  unfortunate  part
is  that  surrounding  those  homes,  there  were  commercially  devel-
oped  homes  that  were  decimated.  So,  the  engineers  came  in,  they
looked at, you know, the damage investigation revealed that volun-
teers  nailing  a  roof  deck  on  typically  say  to  themselves,  you  know,
I guess if one nail is good, two is even better, and unwittingly, en-
hanced  the  nailing  pattern,  and  thereby,  the  strength  of  the  deck.
So, those houses were just fine, and it is those types of things that
I  think,  you  know,  we  need  more  research  so  we  know  specifically
what  is  working,  and  learning  things  like  that,  just  a  handful  of
nails, what an essential element, and when you think about the ec-
onomics, pretty powerful.

But  we  aren’t  yet  in  a  place  where  everybody  knows  that,  and
that homeowners know that, and roofers all know that. And I think
we  have  an  opportunity  to  change  things  by  making  that  happen.
Mr.  SMITH.  Well,  I  better,  Ms.  Chapman-Henderson  or  Dr.
Levitan, are we seeing positive patterns of consumer behavior post-
storm event? Are we learning from our mistakes?

Dr.  LEVITAN.  Well,  I  guess  I  can  speak  to  maybe  recent  activity

in Louisiana.

It is very slow. It is, especially after such a large scale event, like
a Katrina or Rita, as important as it would seem, there is so many
other  activities,  like  where  am  I  going  to  stay,  and  my  house  and
my  job,  and  all  of  those  things,  that  it  is  kind  of  hard  for  it  to  get
traction.  I  think  it  seems  that,  for  example,  the  state  did  a  good
job,  and  within  a  few  months  after  Katrina,  we  passed  statewide
mandatory  building  codes,  and  that  is  being  phased  in,  and  of
course,  training  and  education  of  even  the  building  inspectors  and
the  design  profession  is  a  challenge  that  is  going  to  take  many
years.

And  we  are,  I  think  the  education  of  the  consumer,  and  getting
to  the  point  where  the  consumer  is  starting  to  ask  for  the,  it  is
really  just  in  its  infancy,  and  so,  we  are  three  years  out  from
Katrina  now,  and  it  is,  I  would  say  it  is  very  slow.  At  least  it  is
on  the  right  trajectory.  People  are  starting  to  look  at  it.  You  occa-
sionally  see,  and  I  know  in  Florida,  it  is  much  more  common.  You
occasionally  see  a  commercial  on  the  television  for  hurricane  shut-
ters  now.  We  would  have  never  seen  that  before.  And  there  are  a
few  developments  that  are  starting,  and  people  are  starting  to  ask
about  you  know,  what  is  this,  a  fortified  home  program.  My  col-
league,  Dr.  Reinhold,  couldn’t  be  here  today,  but  the  IBHS  has
their  program,  and  they  are  making  some  inroads  in  Louisiana,
and  I  have  heard  that  some  builders  are  starting  to  use  that  one.
So,  it  is  a  slow  process,  but  it  is,  we  are  making  some  progress,

I think. Thank you.

Mr. SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman WU. Thank you. It is the Chair’s intention to give the
gentlelady  from  California  a  moment  to  get  settled,  and  so  the
Chair will recognize himself first for five minutes.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00152 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

149

Dr. Levitan, you cited the importance of future research, but that
there  is  a  lot  of  existing  technology  or  research  that  has  already
been  performed,  where  there  has  not  been  adequate  transfer  of
that  knowledge  to  application,  and  Ms.  Chapman-Henderson,  you
cited  some  specific  examples,  perhaps,  of  you  know,  very  straight-
forward  steps  that  could  be  taken,  that  are  also,  in  essence,  tech
transfer types of issues.

Dr. Levitan, can you tell us about some of the other already done
research, the existing technologies, which have not been adequately
transferred,  and  your  ideas  about  how  that  transfer  might  occur
better?

Dr. LEVITAN. Yes, Mr. Chairman. As an example, I am a member
of  the  ASCE–7  Wind  Load  Subcommittee.  That  is  the  committee
that writes the National Wind Loading Standard, which gets adopt-
ed into the model building codes. And we are going through a cycle
right now. The document is revised every few years, and we are ex-
amining the methods that we use to determine what the provisions
that go in the codes for how do you figure what the wind loads are
on a building.

And the discussion at the last meeting was, are the two methods
that  we  have  in  the  building  code  right,  or  in  the  ASCE  standard
right now are based on 30- or 40-year-old data. And in those days,
when  you  did  wind  tunnel,  that  was  from,  it  came  from  wind  tun-
nel  tests,  and  there  might  be  four  or  five  or  ten  pressure  taps  on
a  building,  where  you  measure  the  pressures  at  just  a  very  few
number of locations on the building. The technology, the wind tun-
nel  testing  technology  today  is  so  far  advanced,  where  you  rou-
tinely  would  measure  pressure  simultaneously  over  a  1,000  points
all over the whole building, so you really understand that the wind
loading is happening on the whole building all at once, and yet the
methods  that  we  use  in  the  code  are  based  on  much,  much  older
technology.

So,  we  have  a  lot  of  data  that  is  available  out  there,  and  NIST
is  working  on  a  program  right  now  for  what  they  call  a  database-
assisted  design,  where  they  are  slowly  taking  some  of  that  wind
tunnel  data,  and  trying  to  develop  a  method  where  we  can  make
some  use  of  that,  but  there  are  real  opportunities  there,  where
there is so much tremendous amount of data, the wind tunnel tech-
nology  has  advanced  so  far,  but  most  of  the  benefits  of  that  have
not found their way into the building code yet, and that would need
some  additional  testing  with  the  technology  that  we  already  have
to  do  what  we  call  parametric  studies,  the  building  code  only  has
rectangular  boxes.  The  only  kind  of  building,  if  you  look  in  the
code,  and  see  how  do  I  figure  the  wind  load  on  a  building,  it  will
have  a  picture  of  a  rectangular  box  of  a  building  with  maybe  two
or  three  different  roof  shapes,  a  pitched  roof,  or  a  gable  roof,  or  a
hip roof.

But what if you have buildings in plan, that are L-shaped, or T-
shaped,  or  have  balconies,  or  have  all  these  other  things?  There  is
nothing in the code for that, and we have the technology to be able
to  do  that  with  our  advanced  wind  tunnel  testing.  It  hasn’t  been
done.

Chairman  WU.  Dr.  Levitan,  I  am  sure  you  have  many  other  ex-
amples,  but  let  me  jump  to  Dr.  Hays  for  a  second,  and  Dr.  Hays,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00153 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

150

there  appears  to  be  a  tech  transfer  problem  of  existing  knowledge
to  designers,  builders,  drafters  of  building  codes.  What,  in  your
view,  can  the  Federal  Government  do  to  promote  this  technology
transfer?  Which  federal  agencies  do  you  see  as  playing  a  role  in
that?

Dr.  HAYS.  I  think  there  are  a  couple  of  different  answers.  First
of all, Dr. Ehlers, I think, hit on the fundamental issue here, which
is,  and  other  witnesses  have  elaborated  on  it,  which  is  that  we
have  a  lot  of  this  data.  It  is  not  necessarily  getting  translated  to
those who write local building codes, zoning laws, et cetera.

I  think  that  is  where  the  primary  breakdown  in  communication
is, and I would argue that, and Dr. Ehlers made this point, I think,
very  nicely,  that  there  does  seem  to  be  somewhat  of  a  difference
when  you  look  at  windstorms,  versus  other  kinds  of  hazards,  such
as  earthquakes.  I  don’t  know  why  those  differences  exist,  but  it
sounds to me like an area of social science research that is ripe for
exploration, and I know NSF funds exactly those kinds of research
questions.

In  terms  of  what  federal  agencies  are  involved  in  the  technology
transfer right now, clearly, NIST has a central role. And as I men-
tioned  before,  because  many  NIST  scientists  both  do  their  govern-
ment-related  research,  and  then  also  sit  on  the  standards  develop-
ment  committees,  like  the  ones  that  ASCE  and  others  run,  they
have  a  direct  flow  of  information,  from  what  they  know  from  their
government  research,  going  directly  into  those  standards-building,
standards-generating  committees.  That  is  clearly  a  very  important
mechanism. Again——

Chairman WU. Dr. Hays.
Dr. HAYS. Yes.
Chairman  WU.  I  am  going  to  interrupt  you,  because  my  time  is
expiring.  You  mentioned  NIST,  and  Dr.  Levitan,  I  believe,  in  your
testimony, you recommended that NIST take a leading role in this
program.  And  I  want  to  give  you  a  chance  to  expand  on  that,  and
explain why you think NIST is an appropriate agency.

Dr.  LEVITAN.  Yes,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  think,  because
they  have  the  expertise  and  experience,  directly  in  wind  hazards.
They  have  folks  working  in  the  wind  hazard  mitigation  area.  This
program has significant parallels to the National Earthquake Haz-
ard  Reduction  Program,  which  they  are  the  lead  agency  for  now.
And so, it seems to be the right fit of an agency that does research
and does tech transfer, as opposed to say National Science Founda-
tion, which would only focus on the research aspects. And so, from
the agencies involved, NIST really seems to be the best fit.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Levitan,  and  at  this  point,  I

would like to turn to Dr. Gingrey, five minutes.

Mr. GINGREY. Mr. Chairman, thank you.
I want to address this question to Ms. Chapman-Henderson. You
know, we, the Federal Government we, a lot of times, put unfunded
mandates  on  a  lot  of  industry,  I  am  thinking  particularly  in  the
electric  generation  industry,  particularly  coal-fired  power  plants,
and  some  of  these  very  old,  existing  for  20,  30,  40  years,  and  all
of a sudden, a decision is made by the Federal Government because
of the Clean Air Act, that you have got to retrofit to an extent that
you  would  almost  have  to  tear  the  place  down,  or  convert  over  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00154 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

151

natural gas, which is much more expensive, and of course, used in
a lot of other industries, and we have a limited supply.

I  am  thinking,  of  course,  in  cities  like  my  city  of  Atlanta,  the
metropolitan  statistical  area,  which  is  non-attainment,  and  people
have  to  have  their  vehicles  inspected  every  year,  every  year,  and
a  lot  of  times,  you  know,  you  got  senior  citizens  driving  an  eight
year  old  car  that  can’t  really  meet  the  standards,  and  it  is  an  un-
usual burden on them.

So, my question is that the, leading into the question you, I know
you are involved in a lot of state-of-the-art retrofit technologies for
older construction, in regard to natural disaster mitigation, in par-
ticular wind, and certainly, I think that is great, what your organi-
zation is doing in educating the public, but it is important to know,
I  think,  for  the  Committee,  to  understand  the  cost  involved  in  ret-
rofitting,  and  are  you  more  focused  on  new  construction,  and  as
these  houses  are  replaced,  old  housing  stock,  of  course,  and  mod-
ernization of same, but I don’t think it would be very cost-effective
to require people to, you know to, by ordinance of the local govern-
ment, building codes all of a sudden have to go back in and change
something  that  wasn’t  the  law  when  they  moved  into  their  abode.
Ms. CHAPMAN-HENDERSON. And the ideal times to change or ret-
rofit  existing  property  are  when  you  are  rebuilding  from  an  ordi-
nary  incident,  possibly  a  house  fire,  or  post-disaster,  after  a  wind-
storm event, you really have an opportunity to get in there and do
some things differently.

As  far  as,  and  let  me  just  say  this,  our  major  focus  is  helping
consumers  make  informed  choices  at  the  market  level.  What  the
developers and the builders that we work with every day tell us is,
if it is a level playing field, and it is either in the building code or
everybody wants it, and the customer wants it, it will happen. And
what we have seen in places where the model codes have been en-
acted  is  that  the  costs  of  doing  the  wind  mitigation  techniques  at
the point of new construction go down, because the marketplace for
shutter options or impact windows, or all the different things, it is,
the scale introduces a lot of savings, and over time, it becomes less
expensive, say, to buy shutters in Miami, where they are required,
than  it  is  possibly  up  on  the  coast  of,  you  know  Saint  Simons.  So,
there  is,  because  there  is  more  options  in  the  marketplace,  and
what  the  builders  always  tell  us  is,  if  everybody  has  to  do  it,  it  is
not  going  to  adversely  impact  me,  and  that  is  where,  you  know,
having it in the code, over time, is helpful.

But on retrofitting, I think one example to look at, because of the
number  of  homes  that  have  been  done,  there  are  approximately
20,000 homes that have been completed due to the My Safe Florida
Home Program, and their average expenditure, by the homeowner,
and it is matched by a matching grant, is around $3,100. So, if the
homeowner goes in, and says I want to shutter, replace my garage
door  with  an  impact  resistant  door,  and  if  I  can,  through  attic  ac-
cess, install some retrofit hurricane straps, to keep the roof and the
wall  connected,  that  is  around  $3,100  expenditure  on  their  part,
and  it  is  matched  by  another  $3,100.  So,  it  is  about  $6,200  if  they
want to make the investment.

Now,  to  the  point  on  insurance,  in  those  same  markets,  they
have some of the highest insurance rates in the country. So, on the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00155 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

152

wind  portion  of  the  insurance,  in  those  markets,  especially  in
Southeast Florida, they can save up to 52 percent on the wind pre-
mium, so there are substantial every year savings on the insurance
that  follow  the  investment  in  mitigation,  and  in  pretty  short  time,
it pays for itself.

When  we  look  at  all  of  it,  though,  what  we  find  is  the  financial
incentives are essential as a support, but I think what really helps
people,  you  know,  decide  to  either  buy  or  retrofit  or  build  dif-
ferently,  is  when  they  think  about  the  safety  aspect.  Just  kind  of
putting  themselves  in  the  place  of  the  people  who  went  through
Katrina,  or  any  of  the,  you  know,  tornado  outcomes,  you  know,
they envision what they could do differently ahead of time. That is
the most powerful motivator of all.

You know, one of the, you know, especially relevant to the experi-
ence  that  both  of  you  have  had  in  your  districts,  you  know,  with
tornadoes,  the  thing  that  is  sad,  I  think,  in  this  country,  is  that
most  homeowners  and  many  builders  don’t  even  know  that  there
is a tornado safe room that you can affordably construct, either ret-
rofit or new construction, in homes. And that is a life safety bunk-
er.  That  is  not  really  about  the  house.  That  is  about  the  survival
of  the  family,  and  the  cost  of  constructing  those  has  come  way
down over time, as well. That is what we would like to do. As long
as  people  know  ahead  of  time,  and  can  make  that  decision,  to  us,
that is the key.

Chairman  WU.  The  gentleman’s  time  has  expired,  and  next,  the

gentlelady from California, Ms. Richardson.

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  first  of  all,  let
me  applaud  your  leadership  in  having  this  hearing  today.  Given
what  has  just  happened  in  the  last  couple  days,  it  is  quite  timely.
My  first  question  is  for  Dr.  Levitan.  Could  you  please  discuss
with  us  how  the  lack  of  federal  funding  for  wind  engineering  re-
search effects—excuse me, I am sorry—could you discuss for us the
lack  of  federal  funding  for  wind  engineering  research,  and  how  it
affects  the  pipeline  of  students  interested  in  pursuing  wind  engi-
neering or disaster-related engineering as a career?

And  a  follow-up  to  that  is,  what  impact  do  you  see  of  the  lack
of  students  participating,  will  that  have  on  our  future,  in  terms  of
building safety?

Dr.  LEVITAN.  Thank  you.  That  is  an  excellent  question.  That  is

a key part of the problem is——

Ms. CHAPMAN-HENDERSON. Well, we have great staff.
Dr.  LEVITAN.  Yeah.  We,  the  professor  in  me  comes  out  some-
times.  There  are  really  comparatively  few  faculty  that  work  in  the
area  of  wind  hazard  research,  and  that  is  100  percent  correlated
to funding. Faculty have to get promoted and tenured, and how do
they do that? They get funded to do—they have research fundings.
They have to support their students, et cetera, and so, at the begin-
ning of the chain is, sort of, if there is no university research being
done,  then  there  are  very  few  faculty  that  work,  and  have  any  ex-
pertise  in  the  area,  and  certainly,  experimental  work  is  expensive.
And  it  is  difficult  to  do  a  lot  of  kinds  of  things  without  experi-
mental facilities.

And so, that leads into a chain of very few graduate students and
undergraduates  working  in  the  laboratories,  et  cetera,  moving

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00156 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

153

along.  And  so,  that  filters  out  that  you  have  few  people  with  any
expertise that can get out of school. Actually, we have, the problem
is  there  is  not  much  in  the  way  of  curricular  materials  for—com-
pared  to  earthquake,  which  has  had  the  funding  in  recent  years.
There are textbooks, there are books out there, in California, most
of  the  schools,  undergraduate  programs,  you  have  specific  courses
in  earthquake  engineering,  or  they  incorporate  a  major  component
of that into their, sort of their senior design courses. And we don’t
do  that  for  winds  and  hurricanes.  There  is  very  little  information
out there, because the chain never really gets started, because that
is where it starts is at the top, as you pointed out, with the univer-
sity research.

And then, it gets filtered down into practice. And when you don’t
have that, and you don’t have the core of faculty and graduate stu-
dents working on that it, you just don’t have the trained workforce,
then.

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  Might  I  suggest  that  maybe  you  put  together
some recommendations for this committee, as well as the Adminis-
tration,  of  what  we  should  be  thinking  about  in  the  upcoming
years, of how we can ensure that we are developing a pool of folks,
so  whatever  it  might  be,  and  whatever  level  that  you  recommend,
that we begin to address, and that that way, we can appropriately
ensure  that  we  do  have  people  who  can  make  these  Twenty  First
Century recommendations to improve our safety.

Dr.  LEVITAN.  Yes,  I  would  be  very  glad  to.  There  are  a  few  pro-
grams  out  there.  At  my  alma  mater,  my  colleagues  from  Texas
Tech have a wind science and engineering Ph.D. program, and they
were  funded  by  the  National  Science  Foundation  through  their
IGERT, their Integrative Graduate Education Research and Train-
ing  Program,  to  build  that—a  very  unique  and  innovative.  We  re-
ceived a grant from the National Science Foundation to build some
curriculum  materials  for  hurricane  engineering.  The  first,  really,
the first program of its kind in the country.

And  so,  there  are  some  fledgling  programs,  but  for  those  to  be
expanded,  I  would  be  glad  to  provide  those  recommendations.
Thank you.

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  Thank  you.  And  then,  my  next  question  is  for
Dr. Hays. This weekend, I had the opportunity to travel on a Con-
gressional  delegation  to  New  Orleans  and  Mississippi  and  Baton
Rouge,  and  we  saw  some  of  the  results  still,  now  three  years,  it  is
going  to  be  the  anniversary  of  those  very  devastating  hurricanes,
of both Katrina and Rita.

Can  you  tell  me,  in  your  mind,  do  you  feel  that,  based  upon  the
work  that  your  organization  has  done,  have  insurance  companies
appropriately  taken  into  effect  what  your  recommendations  are,
and do you find that the policies are now reflective to, in fact, pro-
tect our consumers?

Dr.  HAYS.  I  am  not  sure  that  I  am  the  best  person  to  speak  to
insurance policies. That really takes us outside of the S&T domain
that I am most familiar with, and that our office is most——

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  So,  let  me  clarify  my  question,  and  I  have  got
about  30  seconds,  so  I  am  going  to  be  as  brief  as  I  can.  It  is  my
understanding  that  folks  were  sent  the  FEMA,  NIST,  and  NSF,
down  to  you  know,  assist  and  coordinate  with  the  efforts.  Some  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00157 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

154

the  problems  that  have  been  said  about  Hurricane  Katrina  and
Rita, was that the policies that people had were not consistent with
understanding  potentially  what  damage  could  have  occurred.  And
so,  my  question  is,  from  what  you  have  learned,  and  what  these
various  organizations  have  observed,  have  those  indicators  been
passed  on  to  the  appropriate  folks,  who  can  then  assist  our  con-
sumers to ensure that they, in fact, have the right protections?

Dr. HAYS. Okay. So, I think the answer is that that is happening.
It  is  a  process  that  is  still  ongoing.  There  is  a  saying  in  this  field
that  we  are  always  prepared  for  the  last  storm.  And  that  is,  in
part, because we learn so much from each event, as it happens. So,
as  you  mentioned,  all  these  different  teams,  combined  government
and  private  sector  researchers  down  there,  are  learning  from  Hur-
ricane Katrina. A number of different agencies have participated in
that. Some of those results are starting to come online, so to speak,
but I think that is very much an evolving process. And so, we need
to  look  to  the  future  to  see  the  sort  of  uptake  of  what  we  learned
from that event.

Ms. RICHARDSON. Thank you very much, and you were very kind,

Mr. Chairman, to allow me that additional 30 seconds.

Chairman  WU.  I  thank  the  gentlelady,  and  the  gentleman  from

Michigan is recognized for five minutes.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I—first  of  all,  I  was
amused  by  your  comment  about  the  Habitat  for  Humanity  homes.
I was not at all surprised when I saw that scorecard years ago, be-
cause  I  have  worked  on  Habitat  for  Humanity  homes,  and  I  am
from the old school, if one nail is good, two is better, but I remem-
ber particularly working on one house where I was joining the roof
to  the  wall,  and  I  am  sure  if  that  roof  is  ever  blown  off,  the  wall
will  go  with  it.  Now,  maybe  that  is  not  an  efficient  way  to  do
things, but it certainly saves a lot of trouble later.

Dr.  Hays,  you  said  in  your  testimony  that  ‘‘the  benefits  of  this
improved  understanding  will  not  be  fully  realized,  however,  until
it  is  incorporated  more  completely  into  actions  at  the  State  and
local level, both through building codes, design standards, and con-
struction practices.’’ With which I fully agree. But what plans does
the interagency working group have to do that, and I have a follow-
up  question  relating  to  NIST  and  NSF,  if  you  would  answer  the
first one.

Dr.  HAYS.  So,  the  issue  of  uptake  at  the  local  level  is  one  that
goes  beyond  just  the  science  and  technology.  I  mean,  certainly
there  are  market  mechanisms  that  can  be  brought  to  bear  to  en-
courage  uptake,  incentive  programs  and  so  forth,  that  I  think  sort
of go well outside the S&T arena that we are mostly talking about
here.

In  terms  of  what  the  agencies  can  do,  though,  I  think  there  is
sort  of  a  two  step  process.  Once  the  research  is  done,  we  under-
stand what the science and engineering results are telling us. That
first step, and I know you are very familiar with this, is the trans-
lation of that into standards and so forth, and so, these consensus-
based standards organizations that NIST is very much engaged in,
for  example,  are  a  place  where  the  Federal  Government,  I  think,
does a good job of helping to transfer knowledge.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00158 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

155

Where  I  think  there  remains  to  be  a  lot  of  work  to  be  done  is
that  second  step,  which  is  the  transfer  of  those  standards  that  are
developed by the engineers, by the scientists, at the local level. And
that is something that I think the federal agencies in this program
tend  not  to  be  as  engaged  in,  because  their  emphasis  is  on  the
science  and  technology.  But  certainly  one  that  I  would  be  inter-
ested  in  learning  more  about,  as  you  have  highlighted  a  very  im-
portant problem in the overall process.

Mr. EHLERS. Another aspect of this. I was struck, in listening to
the comments back and forth, that this is a building practices type
of  thing,  and  I  would  not  expect  NSF  to  be  active  in  it,  and  I  was
surprised  by  the  number  of  times  people  related  work  done  by  the
National  Science  Foundation.  I  don’t  think  any  of  my  colleagues
are  aware  of  that,  and  the  importance  of  that  work.  Similarly,  the
comments about NIST, a number of things over.

And  we  fail,  in  the  Congress,  to  adequately  fund  these  research
organizations.  Many  Members,  I  think,  believe  it  is  pie  in  the  sky
pure  science,  but  it  has  direct  applications.  And  I  would  hope  that
you  would  continue  to  work  with  those  of  us  in  the  Congress,  par-
ticularly this committee. I know Mr. Wu and Dr. Gingrey feel very
strongly  about  this,  just  as  I  do,  that  we  are  not  adequately  fund-
ing our research institutions. I would hope that your agency would
join  with  us  in  that  effort,  to  persuade  the  rest  of  our  colleagues
to do it right.

And  since  the  President  will  be  leaving  office  shortly,  you  can
throw  discretion  to  the  winds,  and  request  mammoth  amounts  of
money for these agencies in next year’s budget, even though it may
not last, but it still would be a good show for the next Administra-
tion to deal with.

Dr.  HAYS.  Well,  Mr.  Ehlers,  you  have  mentioned  two  agencies
that, of course, are within the American Competitiveness Initiative,
so——

Mr. EHLERS. Right.
Dr.  HAYS.  I  feel  very  comfortable  in  saying  that  we  agree  with
you  that  those  are  two  agencies  that  do  need  additional  funding,
and  we  are  hoping  that  the  appropriations  process  will  yield  that
this time.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Right,  and  I  thank  you  for  all  your  work  that  you
and  Dr.  Marburger  did  on  the  COMPETES  Act,  and  especially,
that the President endorses so strongly.

Thank you. I yield back.
Chairman  WU.  I  thank  the  gentleman.  And  I  just  want  to  make

a comment before closing.

And it is, in part, Dr. Hays, a response to what I am reading be-
tween  the  lines  in  some  of  the  testimony  that  you  gave,  and  also,
the  answers  that  you  gave  to  some  of  the  questions,  and  some  of
the colloquy with Dr. Ehlers. And that is that you seem to be advo-
cating  for  an  all  hazards  approach,  rather  than  this  wind  hazard
program,  which  has  not  received,  it  seems  to  me,  either  adequate
attention or adequate funding.

And I want to point out that it has been cited several times, both
by the witnesses, and by Dr. Ehlers, that the National Earthquake
Hazards Reduction Program at NIST is a success by many metrics,
that  earthquake  codes  have  responded,  or  have  been  changed  all

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00159 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

156

around  the  country.  And  I  will  take  into  consideration  what  you
have  had  to  say  about  taking  an  all  hazards  approach,  but  I  do
want  to  point  out  that  this  authorizing  legislation  passed  in  2004,
was  bipartisan  in  its  original  sponsorship,  was  passed  in  a  bipar-
tisan  manner  through  both  chambers  of  this  Congress,  and  was
signed by President Bush, and it is the law of the land. And if this
Congress  passes  the  legislation  again,  I  believe  that  what  the  wit-
nesses  have  brought  to  light  today,  and  the  concerns  of  the  Mem-
bers of this subcommittee, are that whatever reauthorizing legisla-
tion  we  pass  be  implemented  with  heart  and  with  resources,  and
with thoughtfulness.

I  know  that  we  all  work  hard  to  serve  this  nation  well,  and  as
we move forward in any reauthorization, we do want the future to
be an improvement on what has happened between 2004 and now,
with respect to this program.

I want to thank all of our witnesses for coming the distance and
testifying  today.  I  appreciate  that  very,  very  much,  and  I  under-
stand  that  you  know,  one  of  our  witnesses  was  unavoidably  de-
tained,  as  I  have  been  numerous  times  in  Chicago.  And  it  is  the
Bermuda  Triangle  of  commercial  flight,  but  I  am  sure  that  that  is
a problem that we will work on and solve, eventually, also.

The  record  will  remain  open  for  additional  statements  from
Members,  and  for  answers  to  any  follow-up  questions  the  Com-
mittee  may  ask  of  the  witnesses.  And  with  that,  I  again  thank  all
of  the  witnesses.  I  thank  the  Members  for  their  participation,  and
the witnesses are excused, and the hearing is now adjourned.

[Whereupon, at 11:31 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00160 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(157)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00161 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

158

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Timothy A. Reinhold, Senior Vice President of Research and Chief En-

gineer, Institute for Business and Home Safety, Tampa, Florida

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey
Q1. In your testimonies, you and Dr. Levitan propose that Congress assign NIST as
the  lead  agency  for  NWIRP.  How  would  designation  of  a  lead  agency  improve
the  performance  of  the  program?  What  activities  could  NIST  take  as  a  lead
agency  that  cannot  currently  be  done  under  the  National  Science  and  Tech-
nology Council coordination?

A1. Designation of a lead agency provides a permanent home for the program with
staffing, a web site, regular communication and a focused committed group who own
the program. That sort of leadership is easily lost with a coordination council. NIST
is, in our opinion, the correct agency to task with leadership of this program because
the  heart  of  the  program,  if  it  is  to  be  successful,  is  pre-event  mitigation  including:
retrofitting  existing  buildings  and  structures  or  improving  the  hazard  resistance  of
new  buildings  and  structures  through  stronger  building  codes  and  standards,  ade-
quate  enforcement,  training  and  education;  improved  methods  for  evaluating  the
hazard resistance of materials, components and systems; and finally improved meth-
ods for assessing the costs and benefits of all these activities.

While the activities and funding proposed for FEMA, NSF and NOAA, among oth-
ers,  all  contribute  to  the  bigger  picture  of  adequately  understanding  the  problems
and issues associated with windstorm damage and will help lead to successful solu-
tions that reduce damage, injury and losses, the physical changes to our infrastruc-
ture are key to beginning to see actual reductions in losses. NIST is the appropriate
agency to conduct and fund the kind of applied research needed and to lead the nec-
essary  technology  transfer.  NSF  does  not  typically  fund  applied  research  and  will
not fund testing programs designed to develop databases needed to improve building
code  provisions.  FEMA  typically  has  very  little  pre-event  discretionary  funding  and
it does not have a strong research mission. NOAA is generally concerned about pre-
dicting  and  characterizing  weather  events;  the  kind  of  fluid  structure  interaction
that characterizes windstorm effects on buildings is outside its mission.

Despite  inadequate  funding,  NIST  has  done  a  good  job  with  management  of  the
National Earthquake Hazard Reduction Program since it was assigned this respon-
sibility.  There  would  be  some  synergies  and  critical  mass  benefits  to  having  both
programs managed by the same agency. We still see a role for the National Science
and Technology Council in coordinating and monitoring the activities of the various
agencies. However, we believe that having a single agency leading the effort to more
clearly focus the contributions of the various agency activities on the mitigation mis-
sion would be quite beneficial.
Q2. What are the linkages between wildfire damage and wind research and develop-
ment?  Can  information  gleaned  from  studying  severe  weather  also  improve  our
ability to forecast wildfire movements?

A2. Not  surprisingly,  wind  significantly  changes  the  dynamics  of  wildfire  spread
and  creates  conditions  where  firefighters  have  little  control  over  the  spread.  Re-
search  being  conducted  by  NIST  and  others  suggests  that  the  wind-structure  inter-
action, which has long been recognized as important to wind loads, is also critically
important  to  the  assessment  of  ignition  risks  and  predicting  wildfire  spread.  Close
to  the  Earth’s  surface,  the  wind  characteristics  tend  to  be  dominated  by  the  inter-
action  of  the  wind  with  topography,  vegetation,  buildings  and  structures.  While
there may be some differences in flow characteristics because of the thermal effects
of  the  wildfire,  as  wind  speeds  increase,  these  differences  are  likely  to  be  reduced.
Thus,  we  believe  that  analytical  tools  to  understand  the  effects  of  turbulence  on
wind-structure  interaction  will  be  useful  for  improving  our  ability  to  predict
vulnerabilities from multiple hazards that have a wind component.
Q3. Do  any  members  of  the  IBHS  provide  a  discount  to  homeowners,  builders,  or
businesses that adopt and use the latest building codes? With what professional
organizations do you coordinate during the development of your building codes?
What impact do your suggested codes have on the construction industry?

A3. All insurance companies writing wind-related property coverage in Florida pro-
vide  some  sort  of  discount  for  structures  built  using  the  most  up-to-date  building
codes.  The  amount  of  the  discounts  and  the  ways  they  are  administered  is  left  to
the  discretion  of  the  individual  insurers.  IBHS  does  not  get  involved  in  any  under-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00162 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

159

writing  discussions.  We  also  have  a  number  of  State  wind  pools,  as  well  as  some
private insurers that have begun offering discounts for homes built using IBHS’ For-
tified . . . for safer livingΤΜ criteria, which is actually ‘‘code plus.’’

We  work  with  the  International  Code  Council  and  the  National  Fire  Protection
Agency on the development of their national consensus model building codes where
all  stakeholders  participate  in  the  code  development  process.  IBHS  does  not  have
or  maintain  its  own  building  code.  We  do  have  a  voluntary  ‘‘code  plus’’  designation
where  we  have  worked  to  establish  a  series  of  requirements  that  our  analysis  indi-
cates  will  produce  a  superior  building  that  will  likely  perform  substantially  better
than  surrounding  buildings  when  a  major  event  occurs.  A  key  element  of  that  des-
ignation program is a design review and a series of inspections, which assures that
the  key  hazard  resistant  elements  are  actually  built  into  the  building  as  designed
and as required for the designation.

Frequently,  stronger  building  codes  and  our  ‘‘code  plus’’  designation  add  to  the
first  costs  of  the  building.  However,  we  believe  that  those  higher  initial  costs  need
to  be  assessed  in  terms  of  the  overall  life  cycle  costs  of  ownership  of  the  building
and the peace of mind and reduced chances of disruption to lives and the community
that  are  associated  with  the  improved  hazard  resistance.  Risk  modeling  companies
and various benefit-cost analyses for proposed strengthening of building code provi-
sions  have  generally  shown  significant  positive  benefit-cost  ratios  for  seismic  and
windstorm upgrades.

The  amounts  of  the  benefits  certainly  vary  depending  on  the  building  size,  prob-
abilities  of  occurrence  of  events  of  certain  magnitudes  and  type  of  construction.  We
believe that improving our ability to carry out robust benefit-cost studies should be
a key goal of the National Windstorm Impact Reduction Program. Clear demonstra-
tions  and  justification  of  the  benefits  will  go  a  long  way  toward  convincing  a  wide
variety  of  public  and  private  entities  that  they  should  be  valuing  hazard  resistant
construction  and  providing  incentives  to  encourage  construction  of  these  types  of
buildings.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00163 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

160

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Marc  L.  Levitan,  Director,  Louisiana  State  University  Hurricane  Cen-
ter;  Charles  P.  Siess,  Jr.  Associate  Professor,  Department  of  Civil  and  Environ-
mental Engineering, Louisiana State University

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey
Q1. In  your  testimonies,  you  and  Dr.  Reinhold  propose  that  Congress  assign  NIST
as the lead agency for NWIRP. How would designation of a lead agency improve
the performance of the program? What activities could NIST take as lead agency
that cannot currently be done under the National Science and Technology Coun-
cil coordination?

A1. The  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST)  is  the  best  choice
as a lead agency for NWIRP to improve performance of the program. NIST’s Build-
ing  and  Fire  Research  Laboratory  has  a  long  history  of  research  and  technology
transfer  in  the  study  of  wind  hazards  and  wind  hazard  mitigation  (the  statements
of Drs. Hays and Reinhold for this hearing provide details on some of NIST’s recent
activities in support of the wind engineering).

Of the federal agencies involved in the NWIRP, NIST has the most standing with-
in the engineering research and technology transfer community in the area of wind
hazard  mitigation,  making  their  leadership  more  effective  than  that  of  other  agen-
cies. NIST has the most interaction with industry and building codes and standards
activities, which are critical components to effective wind hazard mitigation.

The NWIRP is very similar in nature to the successful National Earthquake Haz-
ards Reduction Program (NEHRP) for which NIST already serves as the lead agen-
cy.  NEHRP  program  activities  span  the  range  of  basic  research,  applied  research,
and  technology  transfer  and  education,  working  with  other  government  agencies,
universities, industry, and nonprofit research and technology transfer organizations.
The NWIRP program has a similar range of activities and partner agencies and or-
ganizations,  so  NIST  can  leverage  its  success  leading  the  NEHRP  into  ramping  up
activities of the NWIRP.

Since NIST has expertise and experience with basic research and applied research
and  technology  transfer  in  the  area  of  building  technologies,  both  in-house  and
through management of externally funded projects, they are in a position do a better
job coordinating the overall NWIRP efforts than the current arrangements.

Question submitted by Representative Laura Richardson
Q1. Can  you  please  provide  recommendations  on  how  the  pipeline  of  engineers  and
other professionals with wind hazard mitigation expertise can best be developed?
A1. Very  simply,  developing  a  pipeline  of  engineers  and  other  design  professionals
with  wind  hazard  mitigation  expertise  is  primarily  dependent  on  availability  of
funding for wind hazard mitigation research.

Students  graduating  with  Bachelors  or  advanced  degrees  in  civil  engineering,  ar-
chitecture,  and  construction  management  today  have  little  or  no  formal  education
in wind hazards and mitigation. Much of the reason behind this phenomenon stems
from the current paucity of funding for wind-related research. The expertise to teach
the  kind  of  classes  and  to  develop  the  textbooks  and  curricular  materials  needed
generally  resides  in  university  faculty.  There  are  only  a  small  handful  of  faculty  at
U.S.  universities  that  currently  work  in  the  area  of  wind  hazard  mitigation,  which
is  directly  correlated  to  research  funding  levels.  If  university  faculty  members  can-
not obtain funding in a certain area, they will not get promoted and tenured, so they
choose other areas for their research careers. With little research support available,
there are very few graduate students working in this area, so we are not effectively
training a new generation of faculty and research leaders.

Comparing  this  situation  with  earthquake  hazard  mitigation  is  very  instructive.
The NEHRP has provided a significant level of research funding for years now, hav-
ing a hugely effective impact on seismic hazard reduction. There are very active pro-
grams  in  earthquake  research,  education,  training,  and  engineering  practice,  par-
ticularly  in  high  seismic  areas.  There  are  many  faculty  active  in  earthquake  engi-
neering  research  and  education,  therefore  reference  books,  textbooks,  and  training
materials for continuing professional education are widely available. Most civil engi-
neering curricula on the west coast have required components and sometimes entire
courses in seismic design at both the undergraduate and graduate levels. One of the
end  results  of  the  NEHRP  has  been  creation  of  a  current  generation  of  design  pro-
fessionals  equipped  with  the  fundamentals  earthquake  hazard  reduction.  Seismic

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00164 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

161

safety  has  become  a  critical  component  of  every  building  and  infrastructure  project
that  is  conducted  in  the  areas  of  high  seismic  risk  in  this  country,  one  that  is  con-
sidered  from  the  very  start  of  the  project.  Contrast  this  with  wind  hazard  mitiga-
tion,  which  in  most  cases  is  not  considered  as  a  design  priority  and  the  building
science professionals are not generally knowledgeable about it.

Ramping up funding levels for wind hazard mitigation research over the next sev-
eral years and then maintaining it is the single most important step in building and
filling a ‘pipeline’ of new design professionals that can solve the Nation’s wind haz-
ard  problems.  It  will  attract  new  faculty  and  graduate  students  to  study  in  that
area,  leading  to  publications  and  textbooks  and  new  courses  that  work  their  way
into undergraduate curricula and continuing professional development for practicing
engineers and architects.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00165 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

162

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Leslie  Chapman–Henderson,  President  and  CEO,  Federal  Alliance  for

Safe Home, Inc.—FLASH

The information provided is based on our experience with input from many of the
partners  in  the  Federal  Alliance  for  Safe  Homes,  including,  but  not  limited  to,  our
committee  of  technical  construction  experts  and  engineers  from  Georgia-Pacific,
Home  Depot,  SkyeTec,  the  National  Storm  Shelter  Association,  State  Farm  Insur-
ance Companies, Louisiana State University, Simpson Strong-Tie, Institute for Busi-
ness and Home Safety, and WHYork Consulting. The retrofitting solutions that are
referenced  below  have  been  tested  through  research  at  institutions  including  the
University of Florida, Florida International University, and Texas Tech.

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey
Q1. What is the state-of-the-art for retrofit technologies of older construction?
A1. State-of-the-art  Retrofit  Technologies—Seven  key  methods  of  retrofitting
older  homes  and  protecting  vulnerable  areas  have  been  researched  and  tested  for
their  effectiveness.  Today,  these  methods  represent  the  best  practices  for  state-of-
the-art  windstorm  mitigation  in  the  built  environment.  They  include  the  following:
1) Roof  Deck  and  Attachment:  Install  a  roof  deck  of  solid  plywood  five-eighths
inches  to  maximize  wind  and  wind-borne  debris  resistance  with  10  penny
common or eight penny ring shank nails spaced at six inches along the panel
edges and every six inches in the field of the plywood panel. The nails must
penetrate the decking directly into the roof framing, and a visual inspection
from  the  attic  should  confirm  that  the  roof  decking  is  properly  nailed  to  the
roof framing.

2) Secondary Water Barrier: Create a secondary water barrier by installing self-
adhering  flashing  tape  or  modified  polymer  bitumen  strips  on  top  of  the
joints in the roof deck. This measure keeps out the rain in the event the roof
covering  is  damaged  or  destroyed  by  severe  weather.  Install  a  layer  of  30#
underlayment,  or  felt  paper,  over  the  decking  and  secondary  water  barrier.
The felt helps with drainage in the event water gets under the roof covering.
3) Roof  Covering:  Install  a  roof  covering  that  has  been  tested  to  the  latest
standards  for  wind  and  impact  resistance.  These  standards  are  ASTM  D
3161 (modified to 110MPH) or UL 2390 for wind resistance and UL 2218 for
impact  resistance.  Adhesives  can  significantly  increase  the  roofs  resistance
to uplift from the wind by applying a bead of premium construction adhesive
inside  the  attic  using  a  caulking  gun  along  both  sides  of  the  intersection  of
the roof decking and the rafters or trusses. We recommend an adhesive that
successfully meets APA AFG–01 or ASTM D 3498.

4) Roof  Shape  and  Bracing  Gables  Ends:  A  hip  roof  typically  performs  better
in  windstorms  than  a  gabled  roof  because  of  its  aerodynamic  properties  and
typical  construction  techniques.  For  gable  end  wall  construction,  there  are
two  construction  techniques  that  should  be  followed—Continuous  Wall  Con-
struction, or Balloon Framing, and Platform Framing. Continuous Wall Con-
struction  uses  full-height  studs,  concrete  or  solid  masonry  walls  from  the
floor  all  the  way  up  to  the  roof.  Platform  Framing  is  another  option.  Plat-
form  framing  braces  the  intersection  of  the  gable  and  the  end  wall  as  this
intersection  is  a  particularly  weak  point  and  those  that  are  not  properly
braced  can  collapse.  If  the  wall  collapses,  wind  and  wind-driven  rain  can
enter  the  home  causing  major  damage.  In  older  homes  with  attics,  an  attic
floor or ceiling diaphragm can be braced and retrofitted in some cases to pro-
vide  the  lateral  support  of  the  gable  end  wall  if  the  end  wall  is  not  framed
full height.

5) Roof-to-Wall Connections: To make sure the roof stays in place in high wind,
securely  anchor  the  roof  to  wall  by  installing  hurricane  straps  or  clips  at
every wall-to-rafter (or truss) connection to reinforce the roof. These connec-
tions  are  critical  in  holding  the  roof  together  and  will  dramatically  increase
the  home’s  overall  resistance  to  wind.  The  connectors  should  be  installed
under the manufacturer’s specifications.

6) Opening  Protection:  Protecting  home’s  openings  such  as  windows  and  doors
from  penetration  from  wind-borne  debris  can  be  done  by  installing  code-ap-
proved  impact-resistant  windows  and  doors  or  installing  impact-resistant
coverings,  such  as  shutters  over  windows  and  doors.  Impact-resistant  glass

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00166 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

163

and  shutters  are  specifically  designed  to  meet  a  combination  of  impact  from
wind-borne debris and continuous pressure from the wind.
Impact  resistant  windows  usually  consist  of  a  clear  plastic-like  film  sand-
wiched  between  two  specially-treated  pieces  of  glass,  giving  the  window
greater  strength  than  glass  alone.  Equally  important  as  the  strength  of  the
glass  is  the  strength  of  the  window’s  frame.  An  impact  resistant  window  is
tested  as  a  unit  that  includes  the  glass,  the  frame,  as  well  as  the  attach-
ment hardware and the installation method. A variety of products have been
brought  to  market  that  have  been  tested  to  research-based  standards  and
have been designated as such through a recognized product approval system
or evaluation report. Recognized ratings include are SBCCI SSTD 12; ASTM
E 1886 and ASTM E 1996; and Miami-Dade Protocols PA 201, PA 202, and
PA 203.

7) Doors: Exterior doors should be wind and impact resistant or protected with
an  impact  resistant  covering.  Garage  doors  are  particularly  vulnerable  to
high winds because of the long span of opening they cover and the relatively
light  weight  material  they  are  made  of.  Two  options  are  available  for  the
strengthening  garage  doors.  One  option  is  to  replace  the  door  track  with  a
system that is designed to withstand high winds and wind-borne debris. The
other is to protect the garage door with a tested and approved impact resist-
ant covering.

Q2. What are the costs of those changes for an average house built in 1970?
A2. Average Costs for Retrofit Technologies—The information below shows es-
timated  costs  for  improvements  on  homes  built  in  1970  or  before  using  the  retro-
fitting  technologies  for  older  homes.  This  data  was  collected  through  the  My  Safe
Florida  Home  program,  administered  by  the  Florida  Department  of  Financial  Serv-
ices, with actual retrofit numbers and pricing. In the course of conducting free wind
inspections,  My  Safe  Florida  Home  estimated  that  it  examined  4,315  homes  that
were  built  in  1970  or  before.  The  average  age  of  all  the  homes  inspected  under  the
program in 2007 was 26 years, with an average insured value of $238,000.
Interior roof deck attachment (installed on the underside of the roof via the attic)—

$3,754

Exterior roof deck attachment (installed when home is being re-roofed)—$201
Interior  secondary  water  barrier  (installed  on  the  underside  of  the  roof  via  the

attic)—$4,527

Exterior  secondary  water  barrier  (installed  between  the  roof  deck  and  roof  cover)—

$784

Upgrading roof covering—$2,177
Bracing gable-end walls—$576
Reinforcing roof-to-wall connections—$1,823
Standard protection for entry door—$764
Standard protection for gable end vent—$84
Standard protection for garage door—$1,263
Standard protection for skylight—$739
Standard protection for sliding glass door—$1,611
Standard protection for window—$279
Permanently attached protection for entry door—$764
Permanently attached protection for gable end vent—$84
Permanently attached protection for garage door—$1,263
Permanently attached protection for skylight—$739
Permanently attached protection for sliding glass door—$1,611
Permanently attached protection for window—$723
Permanently deployed protection for entry door—$696
Permanently deployed protection for garage door—$1,263
Permanently deployed protection for skylight—$739
Permanently deployed protection for sliding glass door—$4,692
Permanently deployed protection for window—$1,771
Source: My Safe Florida Home Program

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00167 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

164

Original  program  cost  estimates  were  established  via  a  survey  and  analysis  that
looked statewide at pricing estimates for each retrofit option covered by the My Safe
Florida  Home  Program.  The  pricing  information  was  obtained  from  sources  includ-
ing:

• Garage door manufacturers and suppliers
• Impact-rated window manufacturers
• International Hurricane Protection Association data
• Data from Manufacturers of both standard and non-standard shutter products
• Local  building  contractors  regarding  specific  retrofits  such  as  soffit  replace-
• Roofing  Contractors  and  the  Florida  Roofing,  Sheet  Metal  and  Air  Condi-
tioning  Contractors  Association  (FRSA)  for  roof  covering  prices  for  cost  per
square  foot  of  openings  for  protection,  roofing,  and  specified  retrofits  of  wall
or gable ends

ment, roof-to-wall connections, and gable end bracing

• Department of Financial Services Statewide Construction Pricing List

As stated above, the My Safe Florida Home now uses actual grant costs on home
improvements  to  maintain  current  cost  estimates  and  uses  data  collected  from  ap-
proximately 400,000 completed home inspections performed from 2006 to 2008.
Q3. Can  we  confidently  calculate  the  cost  and  benefits  of  retrofit  technologies  cur-

rently?

A3. Cost  Benefits  Ratios  for  Retrofit  Technologies—We  believe  that  we  can
confidentially calculate the costs and benefits of retrofit technologies currently avail-
able. One measure of financial cost benefit ratios may be established by calculating
the  savings  to  homeowners  that  may  be  achieved  through  the  lower  insurance  pre-
miums  offered  when  a  home’s  storm-resistance  rating  is  improved.  By  law,  all  li-
censed insurance companies in Florida must offer discounts on premiums for hurri-
cane-strengthening features. In a report released in February 2008, My Safe Florida
Home  reported  that  retrofitting  an  average  home  with  $3,748  in  improvements
yielded an average discount on wind premiums of 24 percent. Of 393,446 homes in-
spected  to  date,  226,368—57  percent—were  eligible  for  an  average  savings  of  $218
dollars off their wind insurance premium annually. Of all homes that were awarded
grant  funds  to  protect  all  openings,  the  average  increase  in  strength  to  the  home
as  measured  by  the  hurricane  resistance  rating  scale  was  36  percent,  or  16  points.
Another  method  of  calculating  costs  and  benefits  is  to  conduct  a  statistical  anal-
ysis of the economic and social losses that may be avoided through mitigation. These
losses  may  include  direct  property  damage,  business  interruption,  human  losses,
and the cost of emergency response.

The Multi-hazard Mitigation Council (MMC) of the National Institute of Building
Sciences  released  an  independent  study  in  2005  that  quantified  the  future  savings
from  hazard  mitigation,  looking  at  hazard  mitigation  activities  related  to  earth-
quake, wind and flood funded through three mitigation grant programs—the Hazard
Mitigation Grant Program, Project Impact, and the Flood Mitigation Assistance Pro-
gram.  The  study  was  in  response  to  a  mandate  by  the  Senate  Appropriations  Com-
mittee, Subcommittee for the Veterans Administration, Department of Housing and
Urban  Development,  and  Independent  Agencies  of  the  106th  Congress  (Senate  Re-
port 106–161).

The final MMC report, ‘‘Natural Hazard Mitigation Saves: An Independent Study
to Assess the Future Savings from Mitigation Activities,’’ looked separately at earth-
quake,  wind  and  flood  mitigation,  providing  a  cost-benefit  analysis  for  each  threat.
The  study  considered  both  ‘‘project’’  mitigation—physical  measures  to  reduce  dam-
age—and  ‘‘process’’  mitigations—which  include  activities  such  as  assessment,  edu-
cation and efforts to foster stronger building codes.

With  regard  to  wind  mitigation  activities,  the  MMC  findings  were  that  property
loss benefits can be significant, with reductions measuring up to four times the cost
of the retrofit. The total benefit-cost ratio of wind hazard mitigation was 3.9—much
higher  than  the  1.5  benefit-cost  ratio  of  earthquake  mitigation.  The  MMC  study
looked  at  community-wide  benefits,  taking  into  account  impacts  including  human
losses,  economic  loss,  direct  property  damage,  business  interruption,  and  govern-
ment costs including emergency response.

While existing data clearly points to a favorable benefit-cost ratio for wind hazard
mitigation, there are areas that may be further explored in future efforts. Areas for
further  study  may  include  a  benefit-cost  analysis  specific  to  residential  structures,
estimating  cost-benefit  ratios  for  specific  retrofitting  measures  or  techniques.  Rel-
atively  inexpensive  measures  to  protect  the  integrity  of  structures  may  have  enor-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00168 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

165

mous incremental benefits—for example, the loss of a roof in a windstorm can easily
lead to a total loss of the structure, which may be prevented by a few relatively in-
expensive retrofitting techniques.
Q4. If not, what needs to be done to improve our understanding?
A4. Expanding Cost Benefit Information—We believe that the current financial
cost-benefit  information,  while  reliable,  can  and  should  be  expanded  through  ongo-
ing efforts in all the states facing wind hazards as different local market conditions,
construction  costs  and  insurance  regulatory  laws  can  affect  the  cost  and  feasibility
of wind retrofitting activities. This could be accomplished through expanded market
level  research  leveraging  the  readily  available  data  on  actual  improvement  costs
along  with  data  collected  on  the  age  and  resistance  of  the  current  housing  inven-
tories. These efforts could be expedited in hurricane-affected markets like Alabama,
Mississippi,  Louisiana  and  Texas.  This  additional  market  research  would  likely
yield  an  enhanced  picture  of  the  current  built  environment  and  its  vulnerability  to
the wind hazards including hurricanes and tornadoes.

Further,  we  urge  the  Committee  to  consider  an  investment  in  expanded  applied
research  to  support  further  refinement  of  retrofitting  techniques.  This  investment
in  research  and  testing  of  construction  techniques  could  introduce  enhanced  effi-
ciency and cost savings that will positively impact cost benefit calculations.

Finally, we urge that cost benefit always be viewed, first and foremost, in the con-
text  of  life  safety  and  injury  prevention  while  recognizing  financial  benefits  as  an
essential but secondary benefit. The recent losses of thousands of lives as both direct
and indirect outcomes of hurricanes and tornadoes are stark reminders of the essen-
tial nature of reducing windstorm threats at any cost.

We  applaud  the  Committee  for  this  critical  examination.  We  thank  you  for  your
commitment  to  solving  the  critical  issue  of  wind  hazard  reduction,  and  we  are
standing by if we may be of any additional service.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00169 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00170 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(167)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00171 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

168

STATEMENT OF TIMOTHY A. REINHOLD

SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT OF RESEARCH AND CHIEF ENGINEER

INSTITUTE FOR BUSINESS & HOME SAFETY

TAMPA, FLORIDA

Chairman Wu and Members of the Subcommittee, my name is Dr. Tim Reinhold.
I am the Senior Vice President of Research and Chief Engineer for the Institute for
Business & Home Safety (IBHS), which is a nonprofit initiative of the U.S. property-
casualty  insurance  industry  dedicated  to  reducing  property  losses  of  all  types.  Our
members write 87 percent of the property-casualty business in the country. Our re-
search  and  mitigation  messages  are  focused  on  earthquakes,  wildfire,  high-winds,
hurricanes,  freezing  weather,  and  flooding.  We  are  specifically  involved  in  wind-
storm impact reduction through:

• research and testing;
• communications;
• outreach and education;
• building code development and adoption;
• data collection and analysis; and
• promotion of incentives for mitigation and disaster resistant construction.

Our  members  have  clearly  recognized  the  need  for,  and  potential  benefits  of,  sig-
nificant  new  investments  that  target  hazard-related  research  and  focus  on  physical
mitigation  of  buildings  and  structures.  In  response  to  that  need,  the  IBHS  Board
of  Directors  this  spring  authorized  construction  of  a  major  new  independent  re-
search laboratory for which we are currently involved in a $40 million capital fund-
raising  campaign.  A  central  element  of  the  laboratory  will  be  a  windstorm  simula-
tion  facility  capable  of  reproducing  a  variety  of  conditions  ranging  from  hurricane
winds and wind-driven rain, wind-blown hail, and wind-driven wildfire effects.

In addition, our members have voted to significantly increase our operating budg-
et  over  the  next  few  years.  Beyond  this  direct  investment  in  our  own  efforts,  IBHS
members  clearly  recognize  the  need  for  additional  federal  investments  in  basic  and
particularly applied research related to natural hazards and mitigation efforts. Spe-
cifically,  IBHS  as  well  as  a  number  of  our  member  companies  have  supported  the
‘‘National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program’’  and  IBHS  provided  testimony
during  the  hearings  that  led  to  its  initial  authorization.  It  is  unfortunate  that  no
funds were ever appropriated for that program.

Risks and Vulnerability

Over  the  past  decades,  with  the  exception  of  Hurricane  Katrina,  we  have  seen
dramatic drops in the loss of life during hurricanes due to better warning and evac-
uation  systems.  Warning  times  for  tornadoes  have  improved  in  many  parts  of  the
country  through  the  extended  use  of  Doppler  radar,  and  we  are  seeing  increasing
numbers  of  people  being  evacuated  in  areas  threatened  by  wildfire.  In  contrast  to
the reductions in loss of life, we have seen dramatic increases in property losses as
our  nation  concentrates  more  and  more  of  its  population  and  wealth  along  our  vul-
nerable  coastlines  and  in  areas  with  greater  risks  for  wildfires.  It  has  been  esti-
mated that some 60 percent of the new homes built in the 1990s (about 8.4 million
houses)  were  located  in  the  Wildland  Urban  Interface  (WUI),  and  are  at  increased
risk of damage from wildfires. Furthermore, fully 50 percent of the U.S. population
now  lives  within  50  miles  of  the  coast,  and  one-third  of  housing  units  within  the
contiguous U.S. are currently located within the WUI.

As  a  result  of  this  increased  population  density  in  vulnerable  areas,  we  are  cer-
tainly  not  immune  to  a  large  loss  of  life  in  a  future  hurricane  event.  Many  experts
are  concerned  that  a  fast  developing  and  fast  moving  hurricane  could  produce  a
large  loss  of  life  among  people  trapped  in  traffic  jams  associated  with  attempts  to
evacuate  too  many  people  in  too  short  a  time.  Ultimately,  we  are  not  likely  to  be
able  to  provide  enough  evacuation  capacity  and  warning  time  to  handle  the  de-
mands  if  population  growth  continues  unabated.  Many  emergency  managers  would
argue  that  we  have  already  passed  the  point  where  mass  evacuation  is  viable  in
many  of  the  more  vulnerable  areas.  We  are  also  seeing  large  numbers  of  people
being evacuated in front of fast-moving wildfires and have already reached the point
where  more  people  die  on  the  roads  trying  to  evacuate  before  wildfires  strike  than
die in buildings that burn during the wildfires.

To  counter  the  evacuation  risks  and  the  dramatic  increases  in  property  losses
from  hurricanes,  we  desperately  need  to  build  stronger  and  safer  homes  and  busi-
nesses resistant to windstorm effects, including water intrusion. Stronger, storm-re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00172 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

169

sistant  buildings  will  mean  that  coastal  inhabitants,  who  are  not  in  vulnerable
structures  or  in  inundation  areas  where  evacuation  is  mandatory,  will  not  need  to
evacuate. In addition, property losses will be reduced and the resiliency of our com-
munities will dramatically improve. Post-storm analysis of building performance fol-
lowing the 2004 and 2005 hurricane seasons has clearly demonstrated that modern
engineering-based  design  of  buildings  is  reducing  structural  damage  and  economic
losses.

However,  water  intrusion  and  interior  damage  is  still  causing  many  people  to  be
displaced from their structurally sound buildings. Unfortunately, the large inventory
of  properties  built  without  any  building  code  requirements,  or  using  earlier  inad-
equate  codes,  continues  to  dominate  the  losses  whenever  a  storm  strikes.  Improved
analytical  tools  and  test  methods  are  needed  that  will  allow  more  cost-effective  de-
sign for new buildings and that address water intrusion issues. Significant research
is needed to address risks for existing buildings, which should include development
of  analytical  tools  and  test  methods  to  support  both  development  and  evaluation
cost-effective mitigation measures.

Similarly,  we  need  a  better  understanding  of  wildfire  risks  and  better  methods
for  predicting  wildfire  spread  and  community  performance.  There  are  clear  indica-
tions  from  community  assessments  following  recent  wildfires  that  it  is  possible  to
design  and  maintain  fire  resistant  communities.  However,  the  assessment  of  risk
factors  still  needs  significant  improvement.  Current  modeling  efforts  within  NOAA,
NIST,  the  U.S.  Fire  Service  and  academia  need  additional  support.  Again,  the  re-
search  should  target  the  assessment  of  risks  to  existing  buildings  and  the  develop-
ment  of  analytical  tools  and  test  methods  that  will  support  both  the  development
and evaluation of cost-effective mitigation measures for individual properties and for
community approaches to reducing risks.

Other  types  of  windstorms,  including  strong  thunderstorms  and  tornadoes,  rou-
tinely  represent  a  large  portion  of  annual  losses  across  our  nation.  While  there  are
no clear indications that the total number of tornadoes or the strength of tornadoes
is  increasing,  the  expansion  of  urban  and  suburban  areas  means  that  the  chances
of  a  major  storm  affecting  homes  and  businesses  continues  to  increase.  Building
codes have tended to stay away from prescribing strengthening of buildings to resist
tornadoes because the chance that a particular building will be struck are below the
risk threshold usually used by building codes to prescribe minimum design require-
ments.  Key  goals  for  personal  protection  can  be  expressed  as  creating  a  safe  place
and  providing  time  to  get  there  before  a  tornado  strikes.  Nevertheless,  some  high-
value  properties  are  being  specifically  designed  with  these  events  in  mind,  and  the
International  Code  Council  recently  developed  a  shelter  design  standard  that  ad-
dresses  design  of  both  tornado  and  hurricane  resistant  shelters.  The  potential  for
large  tornadoes  to  affect  large  portions  of  communities  or  a  whole  community  have
been driven home in recent years by the Oklahoma City tornado and the Greenburg,
Kansas, tornado.

When  it  comes  to  the  general  population  of  buildings,  there  are  clear  indications
that  modest  strengthening  of  connections  could  reduce  structural  damage  in  the
more frequent weaker tornadoes. About 87 percent of the land area affected by tor-
nadoes  or  other  thunderstorm-related  wind  events  experience  nominal  wind  speeds
below  those  associated  with  a  moderate  hurricane.  Even  the  most  intense  EF–4  or
EF–5  tornadoes  produce  large  variations  in  wind  speeds,  with  significant  areas
around  the  periphery  of  the  storm  being  affected  by  lower  wind  speeds.  There  are
clearly  differences  in  the  wind  structure  of  these  storms.  NOAA  and  NOAA/NSF
funded  academic  research  to  investigate  the  structure  of  these  storms  is  needed.
NIST  and  NSF  funded  research  is  also  needed  to  investigate  the  corresponding
wind-structure interaction. This research is needed to assess the implications for de-
sign of building components, connections and systems when additional protection is
desired.

Experience  over  the  past  several  decades  and  projections  for  the  future  all  indi-
cate  that  damage  and  losses  from  hurricanes,  tornadoes  and  wildfires  are  all  ex-
pected to increase. Most of that growth is related to increased concentration of popu-
lation and property values in risky areas. Improvements in the design and construc-
tion of new homes and communities, and the implementation of mitigation measures
for existing buildings and communities, are the most effective means for actually de-
creasing the losses and impacts on communities. Improved predictive tools for com-
municating risk and for providing advance warning so that last-minute preparations
can be taken and safe evacuation accomplished also play an important role.

Mitigation Research

As  indicated  above,  a  major  emphasis  of  future  research  should  be  on  developing
improved  predictive  tools  and  test  methods  that  address  the  specific  characteristics

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00173 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

170

and risks of each of the hazards. Progress has clearly been made in defining general
problems  and  vulnerabilities;  but,  as  we  move  to  the  level  of  a  specific  community
and then to a specific structure, predictive tools lose their ability to address specific
vulnerabilities,  to  assign  loss  estimates  to  those  vulnerabilities  and  to  establish
clear cost-benefit estimates for mitigation measures.

In  order  to  better  assess  various  mitigation  measures  and  to  establish  priorities,
significant  research  is  needed  that  will  enhance  existing  or  develop  new  test  meth-
ods,  analytical  tools  and  system  approaches  to  integrating  the  vulnerability  assess-
ments. Given the state-of-the-art, I would suggest an almost equal investment of re-
sources  in  short-term  and  long-term  efforts.  There  will  have  to  be  a  coupling  be-
tween  knowledge  gained  from  research  into  the  nature  of  the  risks  with  analytical
tools and test methods to assure that the salient physical factors are adequately in-
cluded.

Parallel  efforts  can  be  effective.  We  need  to  revisit  and  carefully  review  current
test methods and analytical tools in light of recent observations from post-event as-
sessments. This will assure that any limitations and possible relationships between
laboratory  or  computer  simulations  and  field  experience  are  clearly  defined.  At  the
same time, additional research is clearly needed on the nature of the threats posed
by  the  different  hazards  and  of  the  physical  characteristics  that  are  potentially  im-
portant to performance of buildings when they are exposed to the hazards.

A  major  emphasis  of  the  research  should  be  directed  towards  system  effects  and
system  performance  so  that  the  roles  of  various  vulnerabilities  can  be  properly  as-
sessed  within  an  overall  performance-based  analysis.  The  research  should  focus  on
more  complete  definition  of  the  phenomenon  involved  in  the  basic  hazards  and  on
the  interaction  of  those  hazards  with  the  built  environment.  Initial  high-level  as-
sessment and tools can help in the short-term, but ultimately, the assessments and
tools must be built upon a very granular foundation that properly accounts for indi-
vidual elements within the context of the system performance.

Case  studies  and  demonstration  projects,  similar  to  those  employed  in  building
energy  research,  should  be  a  part  of  the  program.  Durability  and  performance  in
extreme events after years of exposure to the elements must be factored into assess-
ment of products and systems. We must move beyond assessments that are limited
to new unused products and account for the effects of aging.

Much of the private industry research and development as it applies to wind haz-
ards  has  focused  on  meeting  existing  test  standards  so  that  products  can  obtain
product  approvals  necessary  to  allow  their  use  in  building  construction.  There  are
some  ongoing  efforts  to  look  at  new  test  methods  and  performance  issues  within
government  laboratories  and  academic  institutions  and  to  some  extent  by  industry
associations.

Implementation of the National Wind Impact Reduction Program

In a real sense, the National Wind Impact Reduction Program (NWIRP) has never
been implemented in any meaningful way because no funds were ever appropriated
for  the  program.  Nevertheless,  there  has  been  some  progress  in  windstorm-related
research through activities of individual agencies using existing authority and budg-
ets  and  through  several  earmarks  that  have  directed  budgeted  resources  to  aca-
demic  organizations  at  the  expense  of  agency  activities  and  priorities.  Significant
advances  include  the  measurement  of  meteorological  parameters  in  hurricanes,
around the periphery of tornadoes, and in wildfire regions and in improving the un-
derstanding  of  wind  loads  and  wind  effects.  However,  these  efforts  have  been  frag-
mented  and  of  limited  scale  due  to  lack  of  resources.  Consequently,  they  have  gen-
erally not provided the level of detailed information needed to significantly improve
our  understanding  of  all  of  the  important  parameters  or  significantly  improve  as-
sessment tools or modeling of the events.

Some  specific  examples  are  described  below.  FEMA  has  produced  a  series  of  best
practice  documents  following  some  of  the  major  hurricanes  and  other  windstorm
events and has developed a powerful general risk assessment tool through HAZUS–
MH.  However,  significant  work  is  still  needed  before  it  will  be  particularly  useful
for evaluating individual properties. NIST has been working on a database assisted
tool for improving the assessment of wind loads on structures that should be an im-
portant resource for improving load definitions in future editions of the model build-
ing codes. NIST also has been working on a detailed model of wildfires that includes
the  kind  of  detailed  granular  structure  needed  to  create  a  useful  predictive  tool.
Again, this tool may have its greatest use in improving future wildfire related build-
ing code requirements and in the assessment of mitigation measures.

NIST-related earmarks have funded research initiatives at Texas Tech University
and  for  one  year  at  a  consortium  of  universities  that  included  Clemson  University,
the  University  of  Florida  and  Virginia  Tech.  The  research  conducted  through  these

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00174 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

171

earmarks have contributed to improved understanding of wind loads and wind char-
acteristics that are beginning to find their way into proposed building code changes.
The NSF has funded a number of research initiatives, including one through PATH
funding  that  has  targeted  water  intrusion  research.  NOAA  has  been  continuing  its
work on forecast enhancements and through earmarks has funded some of the land-
based  deployments  of  instruments  to  measure  wind  conditions  in  hurricanes.  The
National Sea Grant Program of NOAA also has funded a number of research efforts
aimed at improving the resilience of coastal properties and the evaluation of mitiga-
tion options for existing buildings.

There  has  been  some  level  of  coordination  of  these  various  research  activities  be-
tween  individual  agencies  and  in  particular  between  researchers  at  the  various
agencies. For example, NSF has funded the water intrusion research through fund-
ing associated with HUD’s PATH program using jointly established priorities. NIST
is  working  with  NOAA  and  with  the  U.S.  Fire  Service  on  its  modeling  of  wildfire
risks. However, there has not been the level of coordination originally envisioned by
a fully developed and fully funded NWIRP.

As Congress looks towards reauthorization of the NWIRP, we would suggest that

it concentrate the efforts in three areas.

• The  first  is  development  of  enhanced  understanding  of  the  events,  including
better definition of parameters that are important to the design and perform-
ance of the built environment. For hurricanes, this can include ability to fore-
cast  tracks  and  intensities  of  events,  but  it  should  go  beyond  that  to  include
characterization of storm characteristics such as wind turbulence, gust struc-
ture,  and  wind-driven  rain  characteristics  and  quantity.  For  wildfires,  it
would include the influence of topography and terrain roughness on the local
wind  climate,  turbulence  associated  with  the  flow,  and  influence  of  burning
vegetation  and  houses  on  winds  in  a  community.  For  tornadoes,  it  could  in-
clude better definition of the wind field near the ground surface.

• The  second  area  is  research  directed  at  better  understanding  and  modeling
of  the  interaction  of  the  events  with  the  built  environment.  For  hurricanes,
this would include the influence of wind characteristics and water droplet size
distributions  on  wind  loads  and  water  intrusion,  respectively.  For  wildfire,  it
would include the influence of wind on ignition points, fire intensity and heat
transfer, as well as the ability of firefighters to influence the risks. For torna-
does,  it  would  include  the  influence  of  the  wind  field  characteristics  on  wind
loads and a better understanding of the required strength of components and
connections to resist these loads and effects.

• The third area is the research aimed at improving building codes, developing
effective  mitigation  measures  and  analysis  tools  to  improve  design  efficiency
as  well  as  assess  the  benefits  of  mitigation  measures  or  design  requirements
on both component and system performance. This research also should target
the  resilience  of  transportation  and  lifelines  systems  as  they  are  essential  to
the quick recovery of individuals and communities.

We  would  suggest  that  the  legislation  designate  a  lead  agency  and  provide  more
balance  in  the  suggested  funding  that  will  emphasize  the  mitigation-related  re-
search efforts. Ultimately, we need to reduce the losses and disruptions that accom-
pany these events in order to protect our citizens and stabilize our communities and
economy.  The  NWIRP  should  have  as  its  core  focus  activities  which  support  that
mission.  Consequently,  from  our  perspective,  NIST  should  be  the  lead  agency  but
funding  and  coordination  should  extend  at  least  to  NOAA,  NSF,  FEMA,  HUD  and
the FHWA.

Technology Transfer

The  main  obstacles  to  widespread  implementation  of  windstorm  mitigation  tech-
niques  in  new  and  existing  structures  relate  directly  to  issues  of  complacency,  edu-
cation,  research  and  demonstration  of  cost  effectiveness  of  the  measures.  Through-
out the country, homeowners are, in general, complacent about their exposure to ex-
treme  windstorms  or  they  believe  there  is  little  that  can  be  done  to  provide  protec-
tion  from  the  most  intense  storms  where  people  frequently  are  killed  or  injured.
People who live in central Florida have typically said that the real risk is in South
Florida,  or  the  Panhandle.  Likewise,  builders  and  legislators  who  live  and  work  in
the  Florida  Panhandle  think  that  they  are  protected  by  a  shelf  of  cooler  water  off
their coast and that the real risk in the Keys or in the Carolinas. A major problem
is  that  the  typical  return  periods  between  major  storms  is  such  that  people  do  not
think it will happen to them.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00175 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

172

Because of this low perception of threat from windstorms, consumers are less like-
ly to spend the money required to make their homes more resistant to windstorms—
especially  when  they  can  spend  their  money  on  upgrades  they  can  enjoy  everyday
like  granite  counter  tops  and  hardwood  floors.  The  competition  to  spend  extra
money  on  home  improvements  rarely  results  in  mitigation  efforts  winning  out.
There is a fundamental need to create reliable tools that will provide accurate esti-
mates  of  the  benefits  of  mitigation  measures  as  well  as  the  costs.  There  is  also  a
critical  need  for  social  science  research  to  help  guide  the  mitigation  programs  so
that solutions are also implemented.

Lack of data and research on the benefits of mitigation and strong building codes
also  poses  a  barrier  to  the  implementation  of  mitigation  measures.  The  data  that
insurers collect as a part of the claims process following a major wind event relates
mainly  to  documenting  the  damage  that  the  policyholder  needs  compensation  for
and  making  sure  the  insured  is  compensated  according  to  the  policy  coverage  in  a
timely manner. The role of the insurance adjustor in such a scenario is to document,
estimate  and  pay  or  arrange  for  payment  of  covered  expenses.  Typically  there  are
extreme time constraints placed on the adjustors and the companies they represent
to review properties and act on claims in a short timeframe. Given these responsibil-
ities,  it  becomes  too  onerous  (particularly  in  a  catastrophe  when  large  amounts  of
disaster  victims  need  to  begin  their  recovery)  to  expect  that  the  adjustor  would  be
able  to  determine  and  document  the  actual  causes  of  loss  and  identify  mitigation
measures that could have prevented or reduced the damage. Because of this, insur-
ance data alone provides little insight into the impact that wind mitigation can have
on total losses.

In  order  to  produce  meaningful  data  to  assess  the  effect  of  windstorm  mitigation
activities,  several  things  need  to  be  known.  First,  the  actual  wind  speed  and  the
characteristics  of  the  wind  that  the  building  was  exposed  to  needs  to  be  known.
Then, details as to what parts of the building failed due to excessive wind force need
to be documented and most probable causes of initiation of failure need to be identi-
fied.  By  comparing  the  wind  speed  with  a  careful  study  of  the  failures,  researchers
can  begin  to  make  credible  quantifications  of  the  potential  benefits  of  windstorm
mitigation.

Unfortunately, many of the NOAA Automatic Surface Observing Systems (ASOS)
lose  power  and  stop  recording  or  reporting  wind  speed  data  during  severe  wind
storms. There is a clear national need to harden these systems and provide backup
power so that NOAA and all those affected by these storms have better data on sur-
face winds in various areas impacted by the storms.

A  number  of  barriers  to  constructing  stronger  and  safer  structures  also  relate  to

the adoption and enforcement of building codes and standards.

• First,  a  large  number  of  local  communities  throughout  the  Nation  have  not

adopted any building codes and standards for residential construction.

• Second,  a  large  majority  of  local  communities  have  not  adopted  the  latest
model  building  codes  without  any  local  amendments  that  weaken  the  model
provisions.

• Third,  while  there  is  more  widespread  adoption  of  model  building  codes  and
standards for commercial properties, there are again many local jurisdictions
where code adoption is non-existent or woefully out-of-date.

Uniform  and  strong  enforcement  is  another  key  issue,  even  in  local  communities
that  have  adopted  the  latest  standards.  This  lack  of  uniformity  in  the  baseline  for
construction  of  homes  and  businesses  means  that  the  performance  of  buildings  is
less predictable and the levels of risk vary dramatically from jurisdiction to jurisdic-
tion.  We  find  that  responsible  builders  have  difficulties  competing  in  areas  where
there are no building codes, which leads to building to the lowest denominator. Fur-
thermore,  we  see  national  builders  building  differently  in  areas  with  identical  de-
sign  wind  speeds,  simply  because  the  local  building  code  adopted  in  a  particular
area does not require the same level of construction as the national model building
code being enforced in the other area. All too often, the local building code is treated
as the maximum rather than the minimum.

While  issues  of  States’  rights  and  local  authority  generally  keep  federal  agencies
from trying to mandate building codes, except for federal buildings, there are oppor-
tunities  for  the  Federal  Government  to  initiate  a  number  of  incentives  that  would
encourage states to adopt and enforce statewide building codes without local amend-
ments  that  weaken  the  minimum  requirements.  For  example,  FEMA  could  use  the
adoption and enforcement of statewide building codes as criteria for providing addi-
tional  pre-  and  post-disaster  mitigation  funds  to  states.  Federal  mortgage  agencies

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00176 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

173

could provide lower interest rates or lower fees for mortgages on properties built to
the latest building codes and standards.

Finally, many of the test and evaluation methods available for assessing the wind-
storm  performance  and  durability  of  materials,  components  and  systems  fall  short
in  reproducing  the  true  nature  of  the  loads  and  effects  of  severe  windstorms  and/
or the effects of environmental factors on aging and associated degradation of wind-
storm  resistance.  Federal  agencies  can  play  an  important  role  in  funding  research
and  developing  facilities  that  will  allow  the  more  realistic  simulation  of  windstorm
loads and effects, and in the development of tools and facilities for assessing the ef-
fects of aging. Some efforts along these lines have been supported through the Part-
nership  for  Advancing  Technology  in  Housing  (PATH)  through  research  and  grants
initiated  by  the  National  Institute  for  Standards  and  Technology  and  the  National
Science Foundation. Much more work is needed.

Conclusion

Windstorms  and  other  natural  disasters  happen  every  year  in  the  United  States,
and impact thousands of homeowners and businesses. Yet we do know how to build
homes  and  commercial  structures  so  that  the  losses  and  damage  caused  by  natural
disasters  are  significantly  reduced.  Ongoing  research  teaches  us  more  every  year,
and ongoing communication and public education has the potential to reduce losses
every year. All of the stakeholders can contribute to the creation of a climate where
hazard resistant construction is valued and demanded and where a myriad of incen-
tives  are  offered  that  will  encourage  local  communities  and  states  to  build  hazard
resistant  communities  that  become  known  for  their  resiliency  in  the  face  of  severe
windstorms or other natural and manmade hazards.

There are clear opportunities for the Federal Government to support research and
the removal of barriers to the development of hazard resistant construction. We be-
lieve that the best road forward is through a coordinated multi-agency research ini-
tiative with significant new funds under the umbrella of the NWIRP.

Thank  you  very  much.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  you  may  have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR TIMOTHY A. REINHOLD

Tim  Reinhold  joined  the  Institute  for  Business  &  Home  Safety  in  2004,  as  Direc-
tor  of  Engineering  and  Vice  President.  He  was  promoted  to  Senior  Vice  President
of  Research  and  Chief  Engineer  in  2008.  Prior  to  joining  IBHS,  Dr.  Reinhold  was
a professor of Civil Engineering at Clemson University for 12 years.

His  professional  career  includes  ten  years  as  a  consulting  engineer  with  firms  in
the U.S., Canada and Denmark, and five years at the National Institute for Stand-
ards and Technology. He earned BS, MS and Ph.D. degrees in Engineering Mechan-
ics from Virginia Tech in 1973, 1975 and 1978, respectively.

Dr.  Reinhold  has  conduced  research  on  wind  effects  and  structural  resistance  for
most  of  his  professional  career.  In  addition  to  directing  numerous  studies  to  deter-
mine  wind  loads  for  tall  buildings  and  specialty  structures,  he  has  been  heavily  in-
volved in research relating to the performance of housing and low buildings in hur-
ricanes and other severe wind events.

His  research  includes  post  event  assessments,  model  and  full-scale  laboratory
studies,  and  in  situ  field  structural  testing.  Dr.  Reinhold  serves  on  the  American
Society  of  Civil  Engineers  ASCE  7  Committee,  the  ASCE  7  Wind  Loads  Sub-
committee and the ASCE 7 General Requirements Subcommittee.

He  also  served  for  about  eight  years  on  the  Southern  Building  Code  Congress
International  (SBCCI)  Wind  Load  Subcommittee  and  is  currently  a  member  of  the
Board  of  Directors  for  the  American  Association  for  Wind  Engineering.  He  has  au-
thored  or  co-authored  numerous  journal  papers,  chapters  of  books  and  conference
publications.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00177 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

174

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00178 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

175

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00179 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

176

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00180 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

177

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00181 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

178

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00182 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

179

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00183 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

180

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00184 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

181

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00185 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

182

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00186 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

183

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00187 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

184

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00188 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

185

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00189 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

186

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00190 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

187

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00191 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

188

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00192 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

189

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00193 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

190

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00194 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

191

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00195 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

192

STATEMENT OF DR. STEPHEN P. LEATHERMAN

CHAIR PROFESSOR AND DIRECTOR

INTERNATIONAL HURRICANE RESEARCH CENTER &

LABORATORY FOR COASTAL RESEARCH
FLORIDA INTERNATIONAL UNIVERSITY

MIAMI, FLORIDA

Florida  International  University  (FIU)  in  Miami,  Florida,  urges  Congress  to
promptly pass legislation to reauthorize the ‘‘National Windstorm Impact Reduction
Act  of  2004.’’  The  Committee  is  commended  for  recognizing  the  need  to  establish  a
national windstorm impact reduction program and for holding a hearing on this na-
tionally important topic. FIU strongly urges Congress to take prompt action so that
reauthorization of this Act can occur during the 110th Congress before its 2008 au-
thorization expiration.

We are heartened, thanks to the efforts of Reps. Debbie Wasserman Schultz (FL)
and  Dennis  Moore  (KS)  that  the  FY  ’08  Commerce,  Justice  Science  Appropriation
Conference Report includes $11.3 million to implement the National Windstorm Im-
pact Reduction Act. We are disappointed that neither the National Oceanic and At-
mospheric Administration, the National Institute of Standards and Technology, nor
the  National  Science  Foundation  have  chosen  to  fund  the  Act  as  directed  by  the
Commerce, Justice, Science Appropriations Subcommittee, presumably due to budg-
et  shortfalls  and  different  priorities.  FIU  strongly  urges  the  Committee  to  advise
these  agencies  of  the  importance  of  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Act
and to make implementation of the 2004 law a high agency priority. Likewise, FIU
strongly believes in the need for coordinated programs at the federal level to reduce
the impacts of hurricanes and other windstorms.

If a hurricane of the same category as Hurricane Andrew (which hit South Florida
in  1992)  would  hit  Miami  directly,  it  would  be  a  $100+  billion  disaster,  comparable
to the physical damage New York suffered as a result of 9/11. While the size of the
national  hurricane  mitigation  research  program  that  the  National  Science  Board
outlined  is  significant,  it  only  represents  one  percent  of  the  present  value  of  the
damage caused by Hurricane Andrew. Our research shows that funding for a strong,
coherent  and  united  research  agenda  could  lead  to  significant  loss  reductions  in
structural damage as well as lives saved.

Florida International University—Miami’s public research university—established
in  1972,  has  more  than  38,000  students,  almost  1,100  full-time  faculty  and  more
than 124,000 graduates, making it the largest university in South Florida and plac-
ing it among the Nation’s 25 largest colleges and universities. FIU offers more than
200  baccalaureate,  Master’s  and  doctoral  degree  programs  in  21  colleges  and
schools.  Research  is  emphasized  as  a  major  component  of  its  mission.  The  Univer-
sity  is  ranked  as  a  Research  University  in  the  High  Research  Activity  category  of
the Carnegie Foundation’s prestigious classification system. FIU’s College of Law re-
ceived  full  accreditation  in  2006,  and  it  led  all  universities  in  the  state  with  the
highest  pass  rate  of  94.4  percent  on  the  2007  statewide  Florida  Bar  Examination.
In the Fall of 2009 we will be welcoming our first medical school class.

FIU  is  an  active  member  of  the  national  Wind  Hazard  Reduction  Coalition,  but
as Director of FIU’s International Hurricane Research Center, the state-wide center
for  hurricane  research  in  Florida,  my  statement  will  reflect  our  unique  university
perspective,  largely  as  it  relates  to  hurricanes.  Before  commenting  on  the  need  to
reauthorize  the  2004  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program,  I  wish  to  ac-
quaint you with the work underway at the International Hurricane Research Center
and to explain why it is in the national interest, and indeed the interest of the Fed-
eral  Government,  to  support  the  development  and  implementation  of  a  rational  re-
search  strategy,  focusing  on  the  reduction  of  future  hurricane  and  other  windstorm
damage.

INTERNATIONAL HURRICANE RESEARCH CENTER

The  International  Hurricane  Research  Center  (IHRC)  at  Florida  International
University (FIU) conducts basic and applied multi-disciplinary scientific research to
reduce the potential for damage from hurricane impacts to the natural and built en-
vironments  in  vulnerable  communities  throughout  the  United  States  and  in  other
countries. It was established by the private sector in the aftermath of Hurricane An-
drew.

As  Florida’s  center  for  hurricane  research,  education  and  outreach,  the  IHRC  of-
fers a solid record of interdisciplinary and collaborative research, both basic and ap-
plied,  focusing  on  the  full  spectra  of  hurricane  impacts  and  the  methods  and  tech-
niques for hurricane loss reduction. The work of the IHRC has largely involved Flor-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00196 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

193

ida and the larger Caribbean and Gulf basin, where most of the North Atlantic hur-
ricanes make landfall.

The  knowledge  and  findings  resulting  from  the  work  of  the  IHRC,  and  the  com-
plementary  education  and  outreach  programs,  benefit  not  only  Florida  and  specific
countries in the Caribbean and Latin America, but every hurricane vulnerable com-
munity in the USA and abroad. These capabilities clearly allow the IHRC to support
federal  strategic  objectives  and  priorities,  providing  increased  assistance  to  inter-
national partners while concentrating on the domestic front.

In  fulfillment  of  its  mission,  the  IHRC  has  engaged  in  a  wide-ranging  research

agenda that includes the following areas:

• Research  and  development  of  effective  and  credible  hurricane  loss  reduction
methods  and  techniques  for  housing  in  Florida.  This  involves  the  testing  of
various  building  components  and  assemblies,  development  of  improved  build-
ing  design  criteria,  and  the  analysis  of  various  architectural  and  structural
elements and their role in modifying the performance of buildings under hur-
ricane  conditions.  IHRC  researchers  have  developed  an  innovative  full-scale
structural  testing  facility—the  Wall  of  Wind—to  determine  inherent  weak-
nesses  of  structures  when  subjected  to  hurricane-force  winds  and  rain.  This
research facility, the first-of-its-kind, will revolutionize our building construc-
tion and retrofitting practices. (Funded by Florida Department of Community
Affairs,  Florida  Division  of  Emergency  Management,  National  Science  Foun-
dation,  Florida  Sea  Grant,  Renaissance  Reinsurance  Holdings,  Ltd,  and  AIR
Worldwide.)
• Development  of  a  public  domain  hurricane  loss  model  to  assess  risk  and  esti-
mate  potential  losses.  This  integrated  catastrophe  (Cat)  model  is  particularly
useful to insurers, re-insurers, regulators as well as the financial and housing
industries.  The  model  includes  newly-developed  knowledge  databases  and  an
updated wind field model. (Funded by Florida Office of Insurance Regulation.)
• Implementation of a windstorm simulation and modeling. This project focuses
on  the  use  of  high-resolution  data  acquisition  with  airborne  LIDAR  tech-
nology and IHRC-developed algorithms, enhanced storm surge modeling, com-
puter  simulation  and  visualization  complemented  by  public  education  and
outreach  programs.  (Funded  by  the  Federal  Emergency  Management  Agency
and National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.)
• Assessment  of  beach  erosion,  sea  level  rise  impacts  and  coastal  vulnerability.
This project uses high-resolution elevation data and modeling to assess coast-
al vulnerability at specific locations. (Funded by National Oceanic and Atmos-
pheric Administration and The Andrew W. Mellon Foundation.)
• Assessment of social consequences and the human impact of hurricanes. Eval-
uation of how various social factors such as demographics, socioeconomic stra-
ta or education may affect perceptions and attitudes influencing critical issues
such as hurricane evacuation and the use of mitigation measures. (Funded by
the  National  Science  Foundation,  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Admin-
istration, and Florida Division of Emergency Management.)

To  complement  its  research  program,  the  IHRC  also  engages  in  efforts  of  edu-
cation  and  outreach  to  transfer  critical  knowledge  and  findings  to  potential  users
and policy-makers in various fields. This includes Developing a Culture of Mitigation
through education projects and television programs.

WINDSTORM VS. EARTHQUAKE RESEARCH

The  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program  of  2004  is  similar  in  many
respects to the National Earthquake Hazards Reduction Program, which is regularly
reauthorized  by  this  committee  and  funded  by  Congress.  However,  hurricanes  and
other  windstorms  are  the  most  devastating  and  damaging  natural  hazards  impact-
ing the United States and its territories in the Caribbean and Pacific basins.

The unavoidable seasonality of hurricanes and other windstorms and the damage
they cause underscore our vulnerability to this awesome force of nature. Hurricanes
alone  cause  tens  of  billions  of  dollars  in  damage  annually,  which  represent  65  per-
cent  of  insured  losses  from  natural  hazards  in  the  U.S.  over  the  past  half  century.
Inexplicably, the Federal Government has focused on earthquake research and miti-
gation  with  comparable  little  funding  for  hurricanes.  FIU  urges  Congress  to  recog-
nize  the  significant  damage  caused  by  hurricanes  and  other  windstorms  each  year
and  to  similarly  make  research  and  mitigation  for  these  natural  disasters  a  high
priority.

Extreme  hurricane  events  in  recent  years  (i.e.,  Andrew,  1992;  Opal,  1995;
Floyd,  1999;  Ivan,  2004;  and  Katrina,  2005)  have,  with  an  increasing  sense

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00197 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

194

of  urgency,  reinforced  the  proposition  that  the  Nation  must  continue  to
work  on,  but  also  move  beyond  weather  prediction  and  evacuation  to
achieve significant damage reduction. Against this background, increasing pop-
ulation and urban development in coastal areas highlight the dynamic nature of our
vulnerability  to  hurricanes  and  the  urgency  of  the  problem.  According  to  the  2000
census, population has increased by 20 percent (11.7 million people) in the most vul-
nerable states over the last ten years. This trend is predicted to continue.

Mitigation  offers  the  best  alternative  for  reducing  potential  damages
from  hurricanes  and  other  windstorms.  Merely  being  prepared  to  respond
to  the  inevitable  damage  that  will  occur  from  storms  does  nothing  to  re-
duce  the  ultimate  cost  of  these  dangerous  events.  Effective  mitigation  to
build  a  solid  foundation  for  policy-making  and  construction  practices  can
only  be  achieved  through  increased  research,  vulnerability  assessments,
education  and  outreach.  Hurricane  and  other  windstorm  mitigation  must
continue to evolve by including not only a wide range of damage reduction
tools  such  as  improved  building  design  and  structural  engineering  meth-
ods,  new  construction  technologies  and  materials,  land  use  strategies,  and
building codes, but also new methods of data collection, improved commu-
nication technology, computer modeling, simulation and visualization.

It  is  in  the  national  interest,  indeed  the  interest  of  the  Federal  Govern-
ment,  to  support  the  development  and  implementation  of  a  rational  re-
search  strategy,  focusing  on  the  reduction  of  future  hurricane  and  other
windstorm  damage.  Building  upon  current  programs  and  other  initiatives  with
shared  objectives,  this  strategy  will  be  based  on  leading  academic  research  centers
with the single focused goal of reducing the cost of hurricane impacts to the Federal,
State, and local governments, as well as to businesses and households.

To  contribute  to  the  development  and  implementation  of  a  strong,  coherent  and
united  research  agenda  focusing  on  hurricane  loss  reduction,  the  IHRC  at  Florida
International University (FIU) has brought together the wealth of existing capabili-
ties  and  evolving  expertise  of  the  public  universities  in  Florida  into  an  integrated
multi-year, multi-disciplinary cooperative research effort—the Florida Hurricane Al-
liance. This coordinated effort was launched in 2004 with funding from NOAA.

RATIONALE  FOR  REAUTHORIZATION  OF  THE  2004  IMPACT  REDUC-

TION PROGRAM

Florida  International  University  believes  that  reauthorization  of  the  National
Windstorm Impact Reduction Program of 2004 is essential as there is an important
need for a coordinated program to reduce the impacts of hurricanes and other wind-
storms that account for the bulk of the economic damages from all natural hazards
in the United States.

Hurricanes  alone  have  resulted  in  tens  of  billions  of  dollars  in  damages  annually
on average over the last decade, and currently there is insufficient funding to reduce
these  levels  of  impacts,  which  will  likely  increase.  FIU  is  concerned  that  because
no  new  money  is  authorized  by  this  legislation,  federal  agencies  will  continue  to  be
reluctant to fund hurricane and other windstorm-related research and will resist im-
plementing this new program.

Much  of  the  development  along  the  U.S.  East  and  Gulf  Coasts  was  constructed
during  a  lull  in  hurricane  activity.  As  we  are  now  just  13  years  in  a  20-  to  30-year
cycle of increased Atlantic hurricane activity, FIU is concerned that funding for na-
tional  windstorm  and  hurricane  research  and  mitigation  will  become  even  more  in-
sufficient  at  a  time  when  the  losses  from  hurricanes  and  other  windstorms  will  be
increasing in the future years. FIU strongly encourages the Committee to authorize
new  funding  for  the  wind  hazard  program.  We  believe  that  federal  investment  in
this  program  will  pay  large  dividends  in  the  near-term.  For  example,  the  cost  of
Hurricane  Andrew,  which  hit  South  Florida  over  a  decade  ago,  was  $30  billion  dol-
lars. That figure would be approximately $80 billion in today’s dollars. Our research
shows  that  funding  for  a  strong,  coherent  and  united  research  agenda  focusing  on
hurricane  loss  reduction  will  lead  to  a  significant  reduction  of  this  figure.  We  view
reauthorization of this Act as a good first step, and offer our expertise and services
to the Committee in this regard.

FIU  strongly  believes  that  any  windstorm  reduction  program  should  include  ap-
propriate  attention  to  social  science  research  and  implementation,  such  as  emer-
gency  preparedness  and  response,  public  and  governmental  adoption  of  mitigation
measures,  and  linking  disaster  recovery  to  mitigation.  Lessons  learned  from  the
Earthquake  Hazards  Reduction  Program  have  proved  the  importance  of  research
into socioeconomic issues as essential to a successful hazard reduction program.

We support the Act’s provision to establish a national advisory committee and are
anxious  to  participate  with  the  other  key  sectors  to  develop  a  comprehensive  na-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00198 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

195

tional windstorm mitigation program board based on the latest research and sound
public policy strategies.

Finally,  we  believe  that  effective  mitigation  can  only  be  achieved  through  in-
creased  research,  vulnerability  assessments,  education  and  outreach.  FIU  reminds
the  committee  of  the  unique  contribution  that  the  higher  education  community  can
play in helping to build a solid foundation for policy-making and for reducing poten-
tial impacts and damages from hurricanes and other windstorms.

While the Windstorm Impact Reduction Act was initially enacted in 2004, agencies
did  not  pay  attention  to  it.  Attempts  to  obtain  funding  have  worsened  as  time  has
passed.  FIU  feels  that  this  reauthorization  is  of  particular  importance  this  year  of
predicted  high-level  hurricane  activity  as  evidenced  by  four  named  storms  so  early
in the season. The 2008 hurricane season is expected to have six to nine hurricanes,
two  of  which  being  major  hurricanes.  FIU  not  only  supports  the  reauthorization  of
this critical Act but urges the agencies to fund it.

BIOGRAPHY FOR STEPHEN P. LEATHERMAN

Education
Ph.D., Environmental (Coastal) Sciences, University of Virginia, 1976
B.S., Geosciences, North Carolina State University, 1970

Publications

16  books  and  National  Academy  reports,  including  Hurricanes;  Sea  Level  Rise:

History and Consequences; and Barrier Island Handbook.

Over 200 journal articles and technical reports authored, including articles in both

Science and Nature.

Expert  testimony  for  the  U.S.  Senate  and  U.S.  House  of  Representatives  ten

times.

On-screen  host  and  co-producer,  ‘‘Vanishing  Lands’’  film,  1992,  winner  of  three

international film awards, including the Golden Eagle.

Professional Presentations

Over  200  speeches  at  national  and  international  scientific  conferences  including
Antigua,  Argentina,  Bahamas,  Brazil,  Canada,  China,  Denmark,  Egypt,  England,
France, Hong Kong, Iceland, Ireland, Italy, Japan, Mexico, Micronesia, Netherlands,
Norway, Puerto Rico, Thailand, Venezuela and Wales.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 19:47 Nov 02, 2008 Jkt 043529 PO 00000 Frm 00199 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\072408\43529 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

